RLD 3











Blacknail, the hobgoblin, snarled as the unidentified humans in front of him drew closer. They had weapons in hand and looked ready for a fight. Well, if it was a fight they wanted then that was what they were going to get. No stupid humans would be getting their dirty hands on his tasty cheese without a fight!

“We must defend the loot!” Blacknail growled loudly to his companions.

Behind the hobgoblin, those of his fellow bandits that hadn’t already taken out their weapons did so. The ranger Wyre pulled out a bow and hurriedly strung it. It wasn’t a particular long bow but next to his short stature it looked large.

“Why are we listening to the bloody hobgoblin?” one of the bandits whined with an edge of panic in his voice. “When did that start to make sense? They’re murderous savages! Maybe the horse has some tactics it would like to share as well?”

“We’re not listening to the hobgoblin. We’re doing what Herad ordered us to, bring this wagon back to base,” Wyre responded in a harsh commanding voice.

“We should leave the wagon and head into the forest. This must be a trap! There are probably more of them coming up behind us,” the scared bandit said as he threw a nervous look backwards down the road.

Blacknail growled. If the coward was allowed to run then the others would follow, and that was no good. The humans had to stay here and fight to protect his cheese!

“I don’t hear anyone behind us and they haven’t surprised us. How could it be a trap, stupid human?” the hobgoblin pointed out scornfully.

“What does a beast like you know? We need to run!” the man shot back.

Blacknail growled again in annoyance, and stepped up beside the man.

“If you run-ss you’ll never make it. Something terrifying out in the woods will kill-ss you slowly and painfully, me!” he whispered to the cowardly man.

The bandit paled and took a step back from the hobgoblin. He then threw a nervous look towards Wyre. The scout was too far away to have heard Blacknail, but he noticed the other man’s reaction.

“Stand your ground, both of you,” Wyre ordered. “There’s no need to run yet. Blacknail’s right. I see no sign of us being encircled and they seem just as surprised as us to have run into company here.

Blacknail did as he was told. Not because Wyre was his boss, he wasn’t, but because it was what he wanted to do anyway.

Up ahead, one of the unidentified people detached from the rest and walked forward. His hand was raised up to shield the sun from his eyes. He appeared to be trying to get a good look at Blacknail and the bandits.

“Hey, I think that’s Boots!” the female bandit standing next to Wyre exclaimed. “They’re not enemies at all; they’re from Herad’s camp. We’ve got reinforcements!”

Blacknail turned and looked. He squinted at the approaching man but could only make out the blurry outline of a face. Well, most humans looked alike anyway.

“It seems we hit a spot of good luck after all. Come on, get the wagon moving. Let’s see what brings our fellows out this way. Not that I’m complaining,” Wyre announced as he started to walk forward.

There was a loud neigh and the creaking of straining wood as the horse hitched to the wagon was signalled into motion again. Blacknail and several other bandits put away their blades and followed after Wyre.

Most the tension from earlier had already faded away. Now everyone seemed relieved and excited.

Soon, the other group came into focus, and it became obvious they were from Herad’s camp. Blacknail recognized several of them, even if he had never bothered to learn most their names. Most bandits with less status than him weren’t that important.

Blacknail quickly recognized the man leading the other group, though. It was his master, Saeter. The hobgoblin perked up and smiled happily. Now he could brag about all the amazing things he had done on this mission! His master was sure to proud of him!

“You’re early. Did you forget to pack enough food or something? ” Saeter yelled their way.

“And you’re not supposed to be out here at all. We almost ended up charging you!” Wyre shot back. “Did Herad finally kick you out, or did you just miss us?”

“Bah, more likely you were about to piss yourselves and run, and who would miss your faces? Blacknail’s the best looking out of all of you,” Saeter replied. “No, one of the patrols ran across some signs of movement so we’re checking it out.”

Blacknail grinned smugly to himself after hearing his master’s words. He was an amazingly handsome hobgoblin after all. Obviously, none of the humans could match the beauty of his long pointy nose. It was just the perfect length and shape.

“We...” Wyre started to say before Blacknail cut him off.

“I’m right here, master,” the hobgoblin shouted as he waved enthusiastically in his master’s direction. “I saved everyone’s lives like twice! I also killed some enemies, snuck around a lot, and found some cheese!”

“I’m glad you had fun,” the old scout replied as he rolled his eyes and signalled for Wyre to speak up.

Blacknail’s feelings were a bit hurt, but he would have plenty of time to talk to his master later.

“As I was saying, on our way back we ran into some unexpected company, which would explain the signs of activity you found. It seems Werrick is on his way here,” the other scout explained.

Saeter frowned as he and Wyre met in the middle of the road. The pair began talking and comparing notes. Neither of them looked happy.

Blacknail found their talk boring. He already knew all that stuff. As he idled away the time, the hobgoblin saw a hint of something that might be a berry bush off to one side of the forest. All the walking had made him hungry, so he decided to investigate.

“Stay here,” Saeter commanded the hobgoblin, after only a brief glance his way.

Blacknail sighed in annoyance but did as he was told. He spun around and made his way back over to the wagon. He had some snacks tucked away on it. No one could complain if he ate those now.

A few minutes later, after Blacknail had finished shoving half a loaf of bread down his throat, Saeter and Wyre decided on a course of action. The pair of scouts called all the other bandits over, and they gathered around.

“There’s no point sticking around,” Saeter told everyone. “We have no idea how many men Werrick has here. That camp may not be the only one, and we need to get the wagon back to base.”

“Later, I’m sure Herad will want to send a few squads out to watch and harass the enemy, but that’s not our job right now,” Wyre added.

No one argued with them. All the other bandits simply nodded or said nothing. Most of them were deserters, and they hadn’t left the army because it didn’t fight enough.

After a bit more instruction, everyone got moving again. The two groups of bandits melded seamlessly into one and started back down the road towards camp.

Saeter had a rearguard put together to protect the wagon but no one attacked them. The only sign of the enemy was a single horseman off in the distance that observed them for awhile before disappearing. It was rather disappointing to Blacknail, really.

The walls of thick bushes and trees that flanked the road eventually widened to reveal a barricade of tall, lashed together stakes. Blacknail gave the men guarding it a friendly wave, they were also part of Herad’s tribe.

Behind the crude wall lay Blacknail’s home, the camp of the bandit chieftain Herad. The barrier was pulled to the side and the captured wagon rolled in, along with all the men and women accompanying it.

Saeter and Blacknail took a minute to unpack their gear and settle down after the trip. The hobgoblin had to make sure all his prizes and tasty treats were hidden away where he’d left them.

“You’re all back early,” Red Dog commented as he walked over to them. “Should I be concerned?”

Blacknail looked over from where he was prying open one of the sacks on the wagon.

Red Dog was the lieutenant whom Herad had left in charge of the camp when she had gone to Daggerpoint last fall. Red Dog had been very disappointed to see Blacknail return with her. He had hoped that the hobgoblin had run off into the wild, never to be heard of again except in unsettling campfire stories.

“We need to talk to Herad. Things are moving quickly and not in a good way. It looks like some of Werrick’s men are moving into our territory,” Saeter told him.

“So I should be concerned,” Red Dog replied with a sigh. “Damnation, I was hoping for another easy spring of robbery. Shit like you’re talking about is how honest bandits like myself get themselves killed.”

“Honest bandits?” Wyre asked in amusement.

“I don’t pretend to be anything else,” Red Dog replied with a shrug.

“And here I thought you were without virtue,” Saeter commented. “But enough chitchat, we need to report to Herad.

“I’ll let you talk to her,” Wyre added. “She seems to like you best.”

The older scout gave the younger one an annoyed glare but didn’t say anything. Instead, he turned back to RedDog.

“Where is she?” he asked the other man.

“The boss is at Vorscha’s cabin, right now. They’re talking about supplies and stuff,” Red Dog answered. “I might as well go with you. It sounds like this is going to throw all our plans up in the air.”

“Come along then,” Saeter grunted as he started off towards Vorscha’s cabin.

Blacknail followed his master as they marched though the camp. Crudely constructed wooden cabins of various sizes littered the clearing. They had all been built last year as shelter from the winter that had just passed.  Many of them were large barracks-like structures that housed groups of bandits.

The grass that had once dominated the clearing had long since been trampled down into dirt that was dusty in dry weather and muddy after the rain. In the center of the camp stood the old farmhouse Herad had taken as her own. Along the edges of the camp the tall trees of the northern forest loomed, reminding everyone that they were far from true civilization here.

Herad was indeed talking to Vorscha. The pair of them were standing out front of her cabin as they conversed. Of the two women, Herad was very much the smaller. She was only of average size.

When Saeter and the others came around the corner of another building, Vorscha saw them and pointed their way.

“What brings all you lazy bastards back so quickly? I hope for your own sake that you actually followed my orders,” Herad asked as she turned towards the new arrivals.

“I certainly did, as always. The men you sent with Blacknail ran into some trouble after taking their spoils and hurried back here with news,” Saeter explained in a carefully neutral tone.

By the time he had finished a cold look had appeared on Herad’s face. Well, colder than usual. Herad always looked like she was one step away from violence. Blacknail tried to attract her attention as little as possible, unless he had something to brag about.

The Bandit chieftain ran her fingers through her short black hair as she considered Saeter’s words. Her dark eyes stood out from her pale skin and were narrowed in thought.

“Well, this isn’t completely unexpected. We thought it likely that Werrick, and the fucking bloody bastards that he has backing him, would move against us,” the bandit chieftain replied as she scowled.

“They’re moving very quickly, though. Faster than we thought they would,” Vorscha pointed out.

The large brunette women spoke with a hint of concern in her voice. She was wearing a loose cloth shirt, and crossed her arms in front of her in a way that highlighted both her lean muscles and her ample chest.

“Doesn’t matter,” Herad responded. “The longer he waits the more men and equipment Werrick can rally. Having him move this early is to our benefit, not his. The impatient fool is underestimating me.”

“You’re right, and that has me worried. Why is Werrick moving so quickly? He knows you won’t be easy to beat in your own territory. He must be very confident for some reason,” Saeter pointed out.

“I’d be confident to if I had the kind of backing he did,” Vorscha countered. “With those crooked merchants behind him he can probably afford to lose his entire army and then just buy a new one. Manpower isn’t hard to come by out here, with all the deserters feeling the southern wars.”

“True, in Daggerpoint his lieutenant Zelena used mercenaries. I would be very surprised if Werrick hasn’t hired a few more,” Saeter added.

“If he relies on outside forces too much the other bands will never accept him,” Herad replied with a disdainful sneer. “He can’t just buy himself an army and use it to control the North. That would make him too much like a conquering outsider out to crush all banditry.”

“That won’t do us much good if we’re dead,” Red Dog muttered.

“If Werrick does come against me with a mercenary host then I’ll retreat and wait," Herad replied as she drew one of the many daggers she had tucked around her person. Idly, the bandit chieftain toyed with it as she spoke.

“He’ll have to leave eventually to deal with other bands and then we’ll raid the forces he leaves behind. He won’t be able to conquer the North with strength of arms alone. He needs to convince the other bands to follow him, and to do that he has to convince them he’s one of them,” she told her subordinates.

Saeter nodded in agreement. A flash of annoyance gleamed in Herad’s eyes for a second in response. The old scout’s approval always seemed to anger her for some reason.

“Most the outlaws I’ve worked with came North to escape the rule of Kings,” Saeter explained. “They wouldn’t fall to their knees and accept Werrick as their master if he looked like a southern puppet out to destroy their livelihood and freedom.”

“Which means we just have to worry about Werrick’s band and maybe a little outside support. He must have left some men behind but he undoubtedly still has more than us,” Vorscha pointed out skeptically.

“I’m not too worried if that’s all he brings to the table,” Herad said. “We have the defensive advantage. We know the terrain, have fortifications up, and are building more. I’ve outmaneuvered him before and this time will be no different.”

“We need to be prepared. We should speed up construction, double our patrols, and cancel all leave. Every man in camp should be assigned to a job until Werrick is defeated,” Vorscha suggested.

“Practical as always, Vorscha.” Herad responded approvingly. “I’ll leave organizing that up to you."

Off to one side, Red Dog sighed regretfully and grimaced to himself. Blacknail took a not so casual step behind Saeter, where he was harder to notice. He wanted avoid being given a job.

The talk lasted for a few more minutes before Herad dismissed everyone. Saeter and Blacknail were given the rest of the day off, and they headed back towards their camp site.

They lived in a pair of tents off to one side of the encampment, near the forest, instead of one of the larger buildings. Both of them had spent the winter in Daggerpoint and liked to live simply. Everything Saeter owned could be packed up in a few minutes.

As soon as they arrived, Blacknail happily ran over to his tent and began to unpack all his stuff. All the yummy snacks, shiny trinkets, and hard won loot he had acquired from his last mission had to be put away. If he just left it out then a despicable thief would probably steal it! Some people were just savages.

The hobgoblin took off his cloak and outer garments, flipped open the door to his tent, and crawled inside. The interior was small, but once inside Blacknail’s body heat immediately started to heat the place up. Beneath him a small collection of blankets carpeted the floor, and his own familiar scent filled the air.

The hobgoblin gave out an unexpected yawn and collapsed onto the ground. He leisurely shifted the blankets beneath himself as he closed his eyes and smiled. It was so comfy and warm here. If it wasn’t for the need to eat and drink he would never leave.

Blacknail gathered up a clump of blankets and rested his head on them like a pillow. One of the sheets was little more than a beat up rag but the hobgoblin didn’t care. In fact, that rag was his favourite by far. It had been given to him by his master when Blacknail had been nothing more than a little goblin.

His memories from way back then were blurry and confused but when he held the blanket close and smelled it he was overcome by a sense of security and... something else. Was it comfort and appreciation? It was a nice feeling anyway. It made him feel warm inside.

A few seconds later, Blacknail let out a deep breath and opened his eyes. He wanted to rest some more but knew he had things to do. Reluctantly, he reached into his pockets and started removing the best of his new acquisitions.

A small metal figurine was taken out and placed off to one side. The tiny warrior’s bronze surface was dull but it still had a slight shine to it. Next, a glass eye was put down beside it. Blacknail snickered to himself as he remembered how he’d gotten that. Fun times!

Oh, there was also a little bit of biscuit in there. Blacknail pulled the chunk out of his pocket and shoved it into his mouth. He chewed on it as he slipped out of his tent and back outside.

Up in the sky, the sun was a fair bit past midday peak. Small fluffy clouds were scattered around it but they didn’t block its light.

The hobgoblin looked down and at the human dwellings around him. He had a thoughtful expression on his face.

The first thing that had to be done was chores, so Blacknail went to find the person he’d told to do them all.











RLD 4












The hobgoblin threw his cloak on and went to find Elyais. Before he’d left to go on his last mission, Blacknail had given his minion a list of chores to complete.

Blacknail had saved Elyais life, or something, back in Daggerpoint. He'd forgotten the details but the important bit was that he’d taken the man in as his minion. All the other important bandits had minions so Blacknail needed at least one.

Eventually, Blacknail found Elyais outside one of the barracks. The blonde young man was standing several feet from a group of men playing dice. There was a small crowd around the players, watching them play. Elyias was at the very back.

“What are you-ss doing?” the hobgoblin asked as he stepped up right behind the young man.

Elyaias hadn’t seen him coming. He rose almost half a foot into the air as he twitched in fear. A look of unrestrained terror appeared on his face for a split second before he got control of himself.

“Ah, what the hells?” he gasped in shock. “You! You’re not supposed to be back yet.”

Several other bandits noticed Blacknail and gave him wary looks, but they soon turned back to the game. They were used to him.

“Some enemies showed up, so we came back quickly,” Blacknail explained cheerfully.

“Damnation, what’s with my luck? I can’t ever catch a break,” Elyias muttered to himself in a muted manner that Blacknail could totally hear.

“Have you been a good-ss minion and done the jobs I gave you?” the hobgoblin asked him.

Blacknail knew it was important to keep your minions occupied. His master had certainly made sure he had been busy all the time. You also had to be firm but fair with minions.

“Err, ya. I did, Blacknail,” the young man answered. “Your firewood has been replaced, and I made sure no one went near your tent.”

“What about all the traps? You emptied-ss them?” Blacknail asked coldly as he stared into the man’s eyes.

“Ah, no... I was going to but when I got out there something had torn most of them apart,” Elyais replied uncertainly.

Blacknail scowled at the man and stared him down. He was disappointed in his minion. The young bandit wilted under his gaze.

“Then you fix them-ss!” Blacknail suddenly hissed angrily in explanation. “I know you can make the string and set up the traps!”

The hobgoblin’s long tongue wormed its way out from between his teeth as he spoke. Elyais paled and furtively glanced around for anything that would help him or distract the hobgoblin. He didn’t find it.

Meanwhile, Blacknail had to fight to suppress a smirk. He wasn’t actually that angry. He’d been the one that had destroyed the traps, and he’d known Elyais wouldn’t fix them. It was all part of the teaching process.

“I’ll get right on it, I swear,” the blonde young man exclaimed fearfully. “Just let me grab my gear.”

“Fine, but I’m checking the snares-ss tonight and if they're not done...” the hobgoblin drawled threateningly.

Blacknail then snorted disdainfully and stomped away with over exaggerated anger. He could feel Elyais watching him leave.

A few seconds later, the hobgoblin walked around the corner of a building. Once he was out of sight, Blacknail stopped and swiftly turned back around. He then peeked stealthily back at the group of people around Elyais and listened in. He was pretty sure Elyais was going to be bad and slack off.

“There’s got to be some way I can give that creature the slip,” the young man complained to the bandit next to him.

His compatriot was a tall man with a pot belly and long black beard. He was dressed in rough furs. Unlike Elyais, he had been part of Herad’s band since before Blacknail had joined.

“I wouldn’t try it if I were you,” the large man replied with an unfriendly smile. “Just do what he says and don’t piss him off. Let me tell you, some extra work is nothing. Fresh meat like you usually goes through much worse.”

“That’s right,” a bald woman with a vicious scar across her face added. “I’ve seen pretty boys like you forced to do all sorts of things. Although, maybe you’re the type that wouldn’t mind having a big strong guy to look after you and keep you warm at night.”

“No, thanks,” Elyais responded as he grimaced in distaste.

“Ha, then get to work,” the bearded bandit laughed.

“I will, right after this round is finished. I want to see who wins so I know who to play with when I join in later,” Elyais replied distractedly as he watched the gamblers in front of him.

There was a clatter of wooden dice and then murmurs of appreciation from the crowd as one of the players got a good roll.

“You’d be much better off not playing. Even if you somehow ended up winning that would be worse than losing for you,” the bearded bandit told him.

Eylias muttered vaguely in response and stepped closer to get a better look at the players. He seemed too focused on the game to pay the other man much attention.

From his hiding spot, Blacknail sighed and shook his head. Elyais was going to get himself in trouble. He obviously wasn’t that smart. It was a good thing he had Blacknail to look out for him!

Well, that was a problem, or entertainment, for later. Blacknail didn’t feel like harassing Elyais anymore right now. It would be more educational, and amusing, to punish him later when he didn’t fix the snares in time.

The hobgoblin turned around and headed back to his tent. It had been over an hour since he had last eaten a full meal so he was hungry again. Time sure went by quickly when you were having fun!

On the way back, Blacknail passed by Vorscha’s home again. Herad and Vorscha were both long gone, but the large woman’s minion and mate Geralhd was now outside. The skinny human was leaning against the building’s entrance way while talking with Red Dog and another man.

Red Dog’s hands were moving energetically as he spoke to Geralhd, and their conversation was loud and boisterous enough that it drew Blacknail’s attention. Maybe something important was going on?

“Fuck, and I was planning on going to town soon. I guess I won’t be getting roaring drunk and visiting the brothels after all,” Red Dog cursed.

“Get yourself a lover in camp. It’s cheaper and you won’t spend so many cold nights alone,” Geralhd told him.

“No thanks. I prefer my women to be... less dirty and not so well armed. Give me a flower scented whore over the women in this camp any day,” Red Dog replied with a wince.

“I find that comment to be more than a little insulting,” Geralhd replied as his face took on an affronted expression.

“Ha, who cares? Everyone knows you only shack up with Vorscha for protection. Although, I wouldn’t mind feeling up those big tits of hers once or twice myself,” the third bandit interjected with a laugh and some rude hand gestures.

The speaker was a man of average height but he looked to weigh a fair bit. His arms and legs were thick, if somewhat soft looking instead of muscled. His round face was covered by a short, patchy, brown beard.

Geralhd glared at the bandit angrily. They were about the same height, but Geralhd was much lighter and his face was clean shaven. He was one of the few bandits in camp that bothered with shaving regularly.

“I’ll have you take that back, Urick. You shouldn’t talk like that about Vorscha or me,” Geralhd exclaimed furiously.

“Are you going to make me, pretty boy? Because I don’t think you can,” Urick replied with disdainful sneer.

From where he was watching, Blacknail sighed and rolled his eyes. Why did Geralhd keep picking fights with people bigger than him? It was stupid. He should just stab them from behind.

“Don’t start a fight, Urick. I’ll be very pissed if you make me intervene,” Red Dog told the other man.

“Bah, I haven’t started anything,” Urick spat. “Pretty boy here is the one that’s getting too big for his boots.”

“If he doesn’t apologize then were going to have a problem,” Geralhd told Red Dog.

The bandit lieutenant just looked amused by his comment. A smirk appeared on his lips.

“It’s not my job to make people say sorry,” Red Dog replied dismissively. “If you want a nice flowery apology then that’s your business. I’m not too worried about it, or Urick.”

“Hear that? This is your problem, pretty boy,” Urick announced cockily. “You don’t realize that, besides the gal you’re shacking up with, no one likes you or has any use for you.”

Soundlessly, the hobgoblin walked up behind Urick and put a hand on his shoulder. His touch caused the big man to flinch in shock and turn his head around to see who it was.

“I like Geralhd. He feeds me so that I don’t get hungry,” Blacknail interjected meaningfully as he stared into Urick’s eyes and grinned toothily.

The unwashed man’s green eyes widened and went completely still. His mouth hung slightly open as he stared uncomprehendingly at Blacknail. While Urick’s brain was trying to catch up the hobgoblin turned and flashed Red Dog a grin.

“Hello!” Blacknail announced cheerfully.

“Apologize, Urick,” Red Dog said grimly as he narrowed his eyes and scowled at Blacknail.

“I don’t want...” Urick began to say.

“Shut your trap and apologize!” Red Dog hissed.

The bandit hesitated for a second and threw Red Dog a confused look, before complying. Blacknail just kept on smiling.

“I take back what I said,” Urick muttered grudgingly.

“Your apology is accepted,” Geralhd replied gratefully as he grinned cheerfully.

The two other bandits scanned his face for any signs of smugness but didn’t find any. He seemed genuinely happy to have the conflict resolved.

Blacknail smiled and patted Urick on the shoulder in a friendly matter. They were all friends here, for now! The bandit looked confused; he still hadn’t managed to completely close his mouth.

“Come on, let’s go,” Red Dog told Urick as he pulled the other man away.

“See you around,” Geralhd told them.

“See, we can all get along if we try!” Blacknail announced joyfully.

“I don’t know how that idiot has survived this long. He must be the luckiest fool in all the North,” Red Dog muttered to himself as he walked away.

Blacknail thought that was kind of mean. Red Dog needed to relax more.

“Why did you make me apologize?” Urick asked the other man peevishly.

The big man looked annoyed and his hands were balled up into tight fists. Red Dog gave him cold glare.

“Geralhd’s harmless, but you shouldn’t give the hobgoblin a reason to dislike you. That monster will kill you for giggles and you won’t see him coming. It would also get away with it just fine. It’s smart enough not to leave proof and to make itself useful to Herad,” Red Dog explained quietly.

The hobgoblin wasn’t able to hear anymore because a beaming Geralhd took a step down from the doorway and spoke up.

“Thanks for the support, Blacknail. It was nice of you to stick up for me and show Urick that I have lots of friends,” the unusual bandit told him.

“No problem,” the hobgoblin replied as he waited expectantly.

“Here, have a treat,” Geralhd announced as he reached into a pocket.

The man withdrew a piece of candied meat and tossed it to Blacknail.

“Thanks,” The hobgoblin replied as he smiled smugly and caught it.

He had been pretty sure Geralhd would have a treat on him and that showing up would earn him it. He had the man well trained, so there was no way he was going to let some big stupid human injure him.

“Urick is such an asshole. I don’t know how Red Dog can stomach being around him. Someone should stick a knife in his back,” Geralhd muttered darkly to himself.

“Sure,” Blacknail replied distractedly as he chewed.

Urick was now on the list, which meant the hobgoblin would get to him eventually. Blacknail didn’t mind killing him for Geralhd, but why was he so bloodthirsty? Whatever, humans were weird.

“Since you’re here, do you mind running an errand for me?” Gerlahd asked. “I have some letters I need delivered. Mahedium is constantly sending out packets, so could you give mine to him?”

“No problem,” Blacknail answered happily as he finished chewing and wiped his hands on his shirt.

A chore like this was sure to earn him another treat and it would only take a second. The hobgoblin grinned as he was handed several pieces of folded paper.

“What are these for?” Blacknail asked curiously.

He had never really understood the point of writing. Remembering things and sending people with messages worked fine for him. Most humans must have terrible memories if they felt the need to write so much down.

“I keep in contact with some my family. I may be in exile but I hope to one day return when my bounty expires. Who knew killing a twat in a fair duel could get someone in so much trouble?” Geralhd explained with a frown. “Also, I left some of my clothes and other stuff with my friends. I have to keep reminding them I’m still alive so they don’t sell it.”

That sounded very complicated to Blacknail. Why hadn’t Geralhd just buried his stuff somewhere no one would find it?

“Alright, I’ll give these to Mahedium,” the hobgoblin told the young bandit.

If he let Geralhd start talking too much the man would never stop.

“See you soon,” Gerlahd replied as he waved Blacknail goodbye and stepped back into his home.

Felling happy to be helpful and fed, Blacknail wandered his way through the camp toward Mahedium’s lab. The log cabin stood apart from all the others and most of the bandits avoided it.

Many of the humans were superstitious and wary of the mage. There were a lot of rumors about the dark sorcery that went on in his cabin, but mostly they avoided the area because of all the explosions. The roof of Mahedium’s lab had caught fire three times.

After making sure Mahedium wasn’t doing any dangerous experiments, Blacknail made his way up to the cabin’s door and stepped inside. If he knocked it might disturb the mage, so he just stepped inside.

The first room of the house was the living quarters. It was a rectangular room with a scattering of furniture. A bed, a table, and a bookshelf dominated the room. Loose papers and open books lay on all the surfaces.

Blacknail ignored it all and walked over to the door on the opposite wall from where he’d come in. That was where Mahedium would be, in his lab. As he moved a familiar yet unexpected scent reached his nose.

The smell really didn’t belong. Blacknail’s lips curled up into a grimace and his fingers curled up slightly as he contemplated the smell.

Quickly, the hobgoblin pushed through the door and entered the lab. It looked like it usually did; only a few items had been rearranged inside.

Tables and shelves full of equipment filled the room. Glass beakers, metal tubing, and crystals were everywhere. There were no windows, light was provided by glowing mana crystals hanging from ceiling or set in tabletop lamps. Mahedium had made them himself.

The mage himself was leaning over a table and staring at a glass jar full of bubbling liquid. Beneath the beaker a small fire was burning steadily.

The hobgoblin ignored all that and continued looking around for the source of the smell. A quick look from the door didn’t work, so he took several steps in to the room.

“Blacknail, what are you doing here?” Mahedium asked as he stood up and removed the spectacles he had been wearing.

The mage blinked several times and looked confused to see the hobgoblin. He was an average looking man with short brown hair. Mahedium didn’t even seem particularly old or young, just average.

He was dressed in heavy trousers, a tan shirt that with long sleeves, and a thick leather apron. The apron was covered in burn marks and several unidentifiable stains of various colors.

Blacknail stepped over and handed Geralhd’s letters to the mage. He briefly looked them over before taking them.

“From Geralhd,” Blacknail explained distractedly.

The hobgoblin peered past the mage and continued to scan the surroundings for his target.

“Ah, of course. I had mentioned to him that I was going to send a bunch of letters out to Daggerpoint and other places, and he said he might slip a few letters in with my own,” Mahedium thought aloud.

Blacknail ignored him and kept peering around the room. The mage noticed his odd behaviour and frowned.

“Are you looking for something?” the mage asked.

“Yes, I smell it,” Blacknail replied grimly as he sniffed the air again.

A look of comprehension suddenly appeared on Mahedium’s face. He turned away from Blacknail and glanced toward one corner of the room. The hobgoblin followed his gaze and noticed a small cage sitting on a table.

“Ah, I had Varhs capture one for me,” Mahedium told the hobgoblin. “I wanted to run some experiments on Scamp but he wouldn’t let me. So, I had him trap some wild ones and test them for the mage gift.”

Blacknail peered into the darkness that concealed the contents of the cage. There was as shuffling sound from within as something moved. The hobgoblin’s eyes adjusted to the darkness and the form of small creature became visible. It was a goblin! This was unacceptable!

Why did people keep bringing goblins into camp without asking him? It was incredibly rude! How would they like it if he brought in a bunch of random humans and let them spread their scent, wander around, and pee everywhere?











RLD 5













Blacknail stared at the goblin in the cage before him. The creature was hard to see in the shadowy corner of the lab. The only light was pale and came from the magic crystals across the room. Beside him, Mahedium continued talking.

“I keep it locked up most the time,” Mahedium explained casually. “I was afraid I was going to have to drug it or have it trained, but that hasn’t been necessary. For some reason it seems mostly content as long as I keep it up high where it can see most of what’s going on.”

The small creature in the cage was thin for a male goblin, but not unhealthily so. Its lanky form was hunched over as it regarded the hobgoblin that had suddenly appeared in front of it.

Its eyes were what drew Blacknail’s attention. Not only were they bright red but they shone with something more than animal cunning: patient intelligence. Blacknail didn’t like that one bit.

As the two stared at each other, a smug grin suddenly appeared on the goblin’s lips. Blacknail growled softly in response. How dare this pipsqueak smirk at him! He was like three times his size!

A second later, the goblin turned away and laid down in the far corner of the cage. The hobgoblin frowned at the unexpected action. Was that a sign of submission? Was it just crazy? Blacknail wasn’t sure...

Anyway, why had Mahedium brought this weird goblin here? This was Blacknail’s territory. Humans shouldn’t be bringing goblins into camp without asking him!

He wanted to yell at the stupid human but he tried to keep calm. He had seen the mage blow up buildings before and set dozens of men aflame. There was no telling what type of Mana crystals he had tucked away on him and Blacknail didn’t want to find out the hard way. It would be better to keep things polite.

“Stupid human! Why do you need a goblin? There are enough goblins here!” Blacknail asked with a hint of anger in his voice.

“Red Dog would agree with you,” Mahedium chuckled. “Don’t worry, I only take it out for short walks and experiments. I have to keep it healthy if I want to draw blood from it. It’s very convenient to have another source of mage blood and not have to constantly cut myself. Maybe I should get an apprentice? Anyway, my fingertips haven’t been this smooth in years!”

Blacknail glanced at the lock on the cage door. It was a double latch. There was no way the goblin didn’t know how to open it! The only reason it was still in the cage was because that was where it wanted to be!

“It just watches you do magic-ss and stuff?” Blacknail asked doubtfully as he turned to face Mahedium.

“I guess. It’s just a feral goblin though, so it probably doesn’t even know what magic is. It probably just likes the fire and flashing colors,” the mage replied with an indifferent shrug.

Blacknail threw a quick glance over his shoulder, back towards the cage. The goblin within was staring intensely at Mahedium’s bubbling glass jar and the crystal inside it, but it quickly looked away when it noticed the hobgoblin’s attention. The complete fascination and intelligence in that gaze unnerved Blacknail.

The hobgoblin was more than willing to bet that the goblin understood a lot more than Mahedium thought it did. Stupid humans! How could they be so blind?

“It even responds to one or two basic commands,” the mage added appreciatively.

“I see,” Blacknail replied flatly.

This goblin was deeply suspicious! Goblins didn’t normally act like that!  The hobgoblin squeezed his fist shut as he tried to rein in his anger.

“I don’t like it. Can I kill it?” the hobgoblin asked politely.

Killing the goblin would simplify Blacknail’s life greatly.

“What? There’s no need for that. Here I’ll show you,” the surprised mage replied.

The mage then reached down and unlatched the cage. The door swung open with a creak but the goblin didn’t attempt to leave. Instead, it just looked up and gave Mahedium an inquisitive look.

“Out. Heel.” The mage ordered it.

Almost immediately, the little goblin stepped out of the cage and scampered over to Mahedium’s side. It looked up at him with a dutiful expression, which didn’t fool Blacknail for a second. Suspicious!

Much to the hobgoblin’s surprise the goblin then raised a green arm and offered it to the mage. Mahedium just shook his head, though.

“Hmm, I don’t need to draw a blood sample today. Good boy, back into your cage now,” the mage said as he pointed towards the pen.

Sure enough, the goblin quickly hustled back into the enclosure it had just come out of. It kept its eyes downcast in a sign of submission to both Blacknail and the mage the entire time.

“See, the little thing is remarkably well behaved and incredibly beneficial to my research. Including the production of your Elixir,” Mahedium told the hobgoblin proudly.

Blacknail sighed in annoyance. The new goblin was a lot more obedient and useful than Scamp. Of course, Blacknail couldn’t shake the feeling that it was just bidding its time until it could murder everyone in their sleep. No one was perfect, though.

The goblin was more of a prisoner than a member of the tribe, no matter how well it behaved, so Blacknail didn’t feel the need to beat the snot out of it so it understood the hierarchy. He was just going to have to keep an eye on the creepy little thing.

Anyway, he’d delivered the letter so he didn’t see any reason to stay around here. Blacknail eyed the bubbling liquid on the table warily. Something might explode, and not in a fun way but more likely in a burning liquid in your eyes kind of way.

“Fine, it’s your problem-ss. I’m leaving,” Blacknail told the mage.

The hobgoblin then threw the little goblin an annoyed grimace and stalked out of the room. It was getting late now, so he decided to look for Saeter. His master should be starting to cook supper soon.

By the time Blacknail arrived back at his tent, he’d somehow managed to pick up a few new interesting trinkets, including a small coin pouch. It was weird how people just left them laying around everywhere...

Blacknail found Saeter seated next to his campfire. The old scout was stirring the contents of a big iron pot with a wooden spoon. The smell that rose from the pot as it cooked above the flames was heavenly. The hobgoblin’s mouth immediately began watering.

“You’re making stew!” Blacknail exclaimed happily.

The hobgoblin loved his master’s cooking! Usually, he had to make his own food, and it was never as good as the stuff Saeter could cook.

“We’ve done a fair bit of walking recently, so I thought we should put some weight back on our bones,” the old scout replied.

Blacknail eyed the big iron pot. It was almost full. That was a lot of food! It was time to stuff himself silly.

His delicious thoughts were interrupted by the sound of people approaching. Blacknail had to fight a sudden urge to spin around and hiss threateningly. It was his food! They would have to fight him for it!

Instead, Blacknail just looked over his shoulder and scowled at the newcomers. It was Geralhd and Vorscha. What did they want?

Vorscha was his sword instructor, so he knew fighting her could only end badly for him. Geralhd also had to be handled carefully. The man kept Blacknail well supplied with snacks. Blacknail didn’t want to scare him away. Hopefully neither of them was after his food.

“What are you two doing here?” Saeter asked suspiciously as he looked up from the pot.

“Do we need a reason to visit a good friend such as you?” Geralhd countered courteously.

“Yes,” Saeter grunted in reply. “You weren’t invited.”

“It’s too nice of an afternoon for anyone to be spending it alone. We just felt like stopping by and enjoying the pleasure of your company,” the younger man explained with a smile.

“Plus, you make really good stew, and I’m hungry,” Vorscha added. “we could smell it from across the camp.”

“Too bad,” Saeter told them. “Leave.”

“Blacknail wants us to stay,” Geralhd told the old scout.

The hobgoblin frowned. He really didn’t want any such thing.

“I doubt that,” Saeter replied gruffly.

“Do you?” Vorscha asked as she grinned smugly and winked at Geralhd.

“Blacknail, we brought cheese scones!” her lover announced.

The hobgoblin ears perked up and oriented themselves towards Geralhd. The rest of his head quickly followed. His eyes instantly locked onto the bundle of cloth the younger man had just taken out from behind his back.

“They can-ss stay!” Blacknail declared quickly.

Saeter glowered at both visitors, highlighting the lines of his weathered face. He looked like he was trying to think of some way to get rid of them.

“Ugh, fine,” he sighed in defeat a few seconds later.

“Yeah, scones!” Blacknail giggled happily.

This meal was going to be so great, maybe even the best ever! Rabbit stew with cheese scones! He couldn’t wait.

Vorscha smiled and Geralhd placed the rolled up cloth on a rock next to the fire. The pair grinned at each other as they settled down on the other side of the campfire from Blacknail and his master.

Saeter’s fire pit was a quite large, even if it was just a shallow hole in the ground surrounded by a ring of round stones. Two nearby flat rocks could be used as chairs, and there was also a nearby collection of cut up logs for people to sit on.

Wait, why did his master have so many seats around his campfire if he didn’t want visitors? Blacknail couldn’t figure it out. Was the old scout going to use them for something?

“Bah, I suppose I cooked enough food to share,” Saeter grunted as he started stirring the stew again. “It goes bad quickly, anyway.”

His master’s speech, and the intense stare Blacknail was directing towards the yet unwrapped scones, distracted the hobgoblin enough that the voice from behind him was a surprise.

“What’s going on here?” a newly arrived woman asked.

“No!” Blacknail hissed in alarm as he realized who it was and spun around.

It was Khita! She had probably come to steal some of his delicious scones and stew. Well, he wasn’t going to let her! She was useless.

“There you are,” Vorscha announced as Khita walked closer. “Take a seat.”

“I didn’t say she could-ss come,” Blacknail whined.

“She’s with us,” Vorscha replied as she gave the hobgoblin a flat stare.

Blacknail froze under her gaze. Good natured or not, there was a steely edge to her gaze. She clearly wasn’t going to accept any complaints from him.  Why was the big woman always sticking up for Khita? She was useless.

“What’s one more mouth to feed? She may as well join us,” Saeter remarked sarcastically as he sat down on his favourite stump.

“Thanks, your stew usually tastes nice,” the young woman remarked.

Saeter frowned at Khita and pursed his lips. Clearly, he was insulted.

“Nice...” he huffed as he shook his head. “I’ve been perfecting this recipe since before you were a fire in your father’s loins.”

“It’s the nectar of the gods itself, if that’s what you want to hear,” Vorscha told the old scout as she rolled her eyes.

Khita took a seat next to Blacknail. The hobgoblin groaned and shuffled away. The cheese scones had better be bloody delicious!

“Hey, Blacknail! How did your last mission go?” Khita asked Blacknail. “Herad and Vorscha never let me go on any important missions. I’m either stuck here in camp or Vorscha is watching my every movement.”

“It was alright. I snuck around, met a new friend, and killed a bunch of people,” Blacknail remarked offhand as he waited for stew.

He didn’t mention the food he’d looted from the wagon. He wouldn’t put it past Khita to steal it.

“Sharp! That’s what I’m talking about,” the young woman exclaimed happily. “I want to go on a mission like that!”

“I don’t think killing people is a good measure of success,” Geralhd interjected unhappily.

“It is if you’re a hobgoblin,” Saeter told the other man.

“Is the food ready? The smell is making me hungry,” Khita suddenly asked.

“Close enough,” Saeter replied as he got up.

The old scout reached into a sack and pulled out a bunch of wooden bowls. One by one he filled them with stew from the pot and passed them out.

While he was doing that, Gerlahd finally unwrapped the cloth bundle he had been holding to reveal the scones within. It only took a few seconds for him to toss them around. Blacknail grinned as he caught his and took a bite. They were bloody delicious, so cheesy and yet so smooth and rich.

There was silence as everyone ate, if you didn’t count the hobgoblin’s smacking. Blacknail thought that this was fine, but Geralhd apparently found it awkward. The young man looked thoughtfully around at everyone else seated by the fire.

Up in the sky, the sun was starting to set behind the western clouds. The clouds glowed a deep red as darkness started to set in. All around, the shadows grew thicker as flickering firelight filled the camp.

“So Saeter, what do you think of our current situation? From what I hear, Werrick is coming and he’s bringing more than few men,” the young man asked to break the silence.

“I think there is going to be a fight,” Saeter replied stonily.

“Ugh, I don’t want to discuss fighting right now,” Vorscha interjected sourly. “Here we are enjoying a great meal among friends! Why bring up violence?”

“Imagine what will happen if she wins, though,” Gerald pointed out. “She’ll basically hold dominion over all the North! All its wealth will be at her fingertips and part of that will be ours!”

“That’s a good point,” Vorscha remarked as she smiled. “Retiring from the bandit life with a chest full of gold sounds great to me. I could really use a nice mansion full of servants.”

“That does sound nice,” Geralhd mused.

“It would have to be in Daggerpoint, or somewhere else beyond the King’s writ, but it would still be much nicer than my current cabin. Especially if you were there with me,” Vorscha told her lover.

He looked uneasy and smiled sadly before responding.

“That does sound wonderful. Unfortunately, as you know, I need to be heading home as soon as possible. My parents and sister need me back down South,” Gerlahd replied.

“You’re still a wanted man,” Vorscha pointed out.

“The warrant for my arrest will eventually expire, especially if I get my hands on enough coin to grease the right hands. Bribes are the only reason I was ever charged in the first place. All I did was win a fair duel!” the young man complained.

“And kill a man,” Vorscha added dryly.

“There are duels all the time where I come from, back in Eloria proper. Some of them are even to the death, yet rarely is anyone arrested and sentenced to life imprisonment,” Geralhd exclaimed angrily.

“Ha, you’re all lazy or cowards. I don’t plan on retiring ever! I’m going to work my way up to become Herad’s most trusted lieutenant and maybe even eventually be her successor!” Khita bragged.

There was a lot of eye rolling and skeptical looks from everyone else present. Blacknail tried to picture Khita as the leader of anything and failed. How could anyone ever be stupid enough to accept her as their chieftain?

“I don’t think Herad trusts anyone, especially not her lieutenants,” Saeter grumbled to himself as he got up and refilled his bowl.

“I don’t think that’s very likely. Everyone retires eventually,” Vorscha told Khita. “You really should be trying to figure out how to escape the criminal life.”

“It will be an adventure!” Khita replied defensively. “Besides, I won’t be alone. Blacknail won’t be retiring to some stuffy mansion. He’s a hobgoblin and they know how to have fun!”

Blacknail looked up from where he was eating the last of his scone. Bits of crumps fell off his chin.

“I’ll go where Master Saeter goes,” he replied simply.

This caused everyone to look Saeter’s way. The old scout just frowned and sat back down.

“Bah, having dreams like yours is just a good way to be disappointed. Only fools believe in happy endings. You’re better off just accepting things the way they are,” he told the others.

Blacknail put his empty bowl down and gave his master a questioning look. He seemed to remember Saeter saying something else a while ago.

“I thought your wanted-ss to make Herad Queen of the North and kick the southern king person in the balls. Didn’t you say that? I think-ss you did...” Blacknail mused aloud as he tried to remember.

Gerlahd suddenly snorted in amusement and a huge grin appeared on Vorscha’s face. For some reason, Saeter’s face grew noticeably redder. The old scout winced and looked off to the side.

“I never said anything like that! Stop lying, Blacknail. You’re imagining things, you stupid hobgoblin,” he quickly argued.

“Ambitious, but I like it,” Vorscha remarked.

“Ha, so much for not having any dreams!” Geralhd laughed. “I should have known you had a reason for sticking around here.”

“I wouldn’t mind kicking a king or two in the nuts,” Khita mused as she smirked. “Those fancy bastards have never done anything for me.”

“That was just something I said once as a joke,” Saeter protested.

“Of course it was. Don’t worry, Saeter. We all know you didn’t mean it,” Vorscha joked.

As Saeter glowered, Blacknail looked around at everyone’s smirks. He didn’t get it. What was so funny?

It quickly grew dark as the bandits talked and laughed. Soon, the only light was from their campfire or that of other nearby groups. By the time Saeter’s guests left, almost everyone else in the camp had turned in for the night.

With happy yawn, Blacknail went to bed. An owl hooted off in the trees as he walked over to his tent and crawled inside. Feeling comfortable, Blacknail curled up and fell asleep.

However, his rest was disturbed by unpleasant dreams, and Blacknail tossed and turned in his sleep.

A green maze of twisted trees surrounded him, and there was only a single path through it. Skulls and swords littered the ground as he walked. Coins slipped from his fingers no matter how hard he tried to hold them and eventually he was all alone in the darkness. The hobgoblin looked up and saw a white light shinning down the forest path in front of him. He reached out towards it...

















RLD 6














Blacknail smiled as his knife opened the helpless man’s throat. Blood poured out of the raw jagged wound and spilled down his chest. The man’s body jerked and twitched but the hobgoblin held it still. A few seconds later, he went limp and Blacknail let the body fall.

With an annoyed sigh, the hobgoblin bent over and began to roll the corpse over into a nearby clump of bushes, where it would be hidden. When that was done, he scuffed the dirt with his boot to conceal the blood trail. Cleaning up after himself was always such a pain.

This was the second sentry he’d taken out today, and it was probably far from the last. There were undoubtedly a few more around the perimeter of the enemy camp.

A lot of humans seemed to think that if they simply had lots of guards everywhere it would make up for the fact that they were all incompetent. It didn’t work that way.

The forest around Blacknail was full of thick green vegetation, and small hills lay scattered in every direction. This made spotting people difficult and hiding easy. To keep one step ahead of his prey the hobgoblin needed a better view.

Quickly, Blacknail pulled his boots and socks off. He took a second to wiggle his toes and flex his fingers before sinking his claws into the bark of a tall tree beside him. Then, he began to climb up into the higher branches to find a vantage point.

The tree swayed ever so slightly in the wind once he got higher but that didn’t bother him. Up there among the leaves, Blacknail made himself comfortable and looked around. His flexible light body gave him excellent balance.

Herad, Blacknail’s great and deadly chieftain, had ordered the hobgoblin to head out and scout around the base Werrick’s men had set up. The other bandit chieftain’s encroachment on her territory would be met with blood and fire.

Blacknail had spent two days skulking around the forest by himself to get all the information his mistress had wanted. He’d been told to avoid being seen at all costs, and he hadn’t even been allowed to kill anyone!

This was the North! Who would notice one or two missing humans?  There were hundreds of ways they could have gotten themselves killed or vanished. Most humans were so dumb Blacknail was constantly surprised they lived long enough to breed.

Not his humans, though. They were remarkably intelligent, almost hobgoblin-like, really. Of course, Blacknail had only ever met one other hobgoblin, and he’d stabbed him to death several minutes after their first meeting. Still, that meant half the hobgoblins he’d ever encountered had been incredibly smart and handsome. He could not say the same thing about humans.

Well, that was the past. He certainly had permission to kill now. The time for scouting was over. Herad’s attack was underway.

Blacknail balanced on a long branch as he studied the terrain below him. From his high perch, he could see the steep hill that concealed the enemy camp. It looked like the way there was clear. However, a pair of Werrick’s men stood off some distance to his left.

“Hmm, difficult,” Blacknail mused.

It was practically impossible for someone to take down two sentries by himself without making any noise, and that meant it was sort of difficult even for Blacknail. The hobgoblin preferred easier targets, though. Why work hard?

With this in mind, Blacknail swung below the branch he was sitting on and climbed back down the tree. Once on the ground, he brought his fingers up to his lips and whistled. The sharp cry of a bird echoed out through the forest as he blew.

A few moments later, an answering bird call rang out from the wild greenery around him. Blacknail smiled as Saeter slipped out of the forest and walked over.

The old scout was dressed in brown leathers with a dirty green cloak. He held a bow in his hands and there was a full quiver on his back.

“We’re all clear here?” Saeter asked.

“Yes-ss, there are no enemies around-ss until we get closer to their camp,” Blacknail replied eagerly.

“Good, then let’s go together in case we run into a larger group,” his master suggested.

Blacknail opened his mouth to agree, but he was interrupted by the sound of another bird whistle. His mouth snapped shut in surprise. That was their signal!

“What? It’s not the right season for real grey warblers to make that cry...” Saeter remarked. “...and no one else could possibly know we were using it.”

“I don’t know,” Blacknail replied nervously. “Maybe-ss it’s an ambush.”

Together, the pair peered off into the forest in the direction the sound had come from. Slowly, Saeter drew an arrow and strung it on his bow. Nothing moved in front of them.

Instead, there was fluttering noise behind them. Blacknail flinched in surprise and jumped around. His long knife slid out of its sheath as he pulled it free in one smooth motion. Beside him, Sater moved as well.

The hobgoblin’s heart pounded as he scanned the forest for the cause of the noise. There was nothing there, or at least he didn’t see anything. Something had made the noise, though.

Suddenly, movement made Blacknail look up at the side of a tree trunk. Perched there was a harpy. Its human-like face looked down at Blacknail and Saeter with amusement. It flashed them a toothy smile and then a familiar mocking bird cry issued forth from it lips.

“Shoot it,” Blacknail hissed in alarm.

Harpies were dangerous. The large bird-like creatures had long talons on their feet and the tip of their wings. They were also very cunning.

Saeter raised his bow to take the shot. Before he could do anything though, there was another flutter from the direction they had just turned away from.

“Shoot it,” someone or something said.

Blacknail’s head whipped around and he raised his dagger defensively. A second harpy was standing on a tree branch not too far away.

“There’s another harpy behind us, isn’t there?” Saeter asked flatly.

The old scout hadn’t turned around. He had kept his arrow aimed straight at the first harpy.

“Yes, but two harpies aren’t much of threat-ss. I’ll take one and you can-ss take the other,” Blacknail replied as he took a step toward the second creature.

Before he could get near it though, the beast let out a muted screech and flapped its wings. Blacknail froze. They were still near the enemy camp. Raising a commotion would draw attention, and that would be bad.

“Don’t let it make so much noise!” Sater hissed.

“Fine, you shoot both of them,” Blacknail replied angrily.

What did his master expect him to do? The hideous creature could fly!

“I can’t get both of them at the same time,” Saeter grunted in annoyance.

“So much noise!” squawked the first harpy merrily.

“You shut the hells up,” Saeter told it.

“Ya, no one asked you,” Blacknail added angrily.

Both, Saeter and Blacknail stood there silently for a few seconds as they contemplated their next step. The hobgoblin scratched his nose as he warily eyed the harpies. They didn’t appear to be doing anything...

“What should we do?” Blacknail asked his master.

“I don’t know. The fucking things are probably just messing with us. I don’t think they’ll attack us,” Saeter replied cautiously.

The first harpy, who still had Saeter’s arrow pointed at it, slowly hopped down from the tree. It landed on the ground and then eyed the hobgoblin and his master. Blacknail thought it looked smug.

“I want to kick it in-ss the face,” the hobgoblin muttered to himself.

The harpy ignored him and began to crawl across the ground using the claws on its wings as another set of legs. Its motions were smooth and purposeful as it headed towards a familiar set of bushes.

“Oh,” Blacknail remarked in surprise as he watched.

The harpy slipped into the bushes and there was a tearing sound as it ripped into the corpse within them. Saeter’s eyes widened as he realized what the beast was doing. He spun and pointed his arrow towards the second harpy, which was still sitting in the tree.

“In the face!” the beast laughed merrily as it licked its wing feathers.

It didn’t seem concerned about the bow and arrow at all. Instead, it just continued cleaning itself while studying them out of the corner of its eye.

“The bloody fuckers!” Saeter growled quietly as he realized what was happening.

Blacknail’s eyes narrowed as he came to the same understanding as his master. The creatures were extorting them!

The harpies wanted the human corpses Blacknail had left in his wake, and if he tried to stop them they would create enough noise to raise the enemies’ alarm!

The hobgoblin grimaced and flexed his clawed fingers. Human corpses were worthless to him but he still didn’t like the idea of being outsmarted and bullied by a bunch of bird brains!

“Let’s kill them!” he hissed furiously to his master.

“No, stop Blacknail,” Saeter commanded him coldly. “Leave them be. They’re no threat to us and we have a job to do.”

The hobgoblin stared at the grey feathered creature that was up in the tree. It seemed to have completely dismissed them as threats and was busy cleaning itself.

“Ugh, fine. Let’s get out of here,” Blacknail replied broodingly.

Saeter nodded and the pair cautiously made their way away from the feasting harpies. The old scout kept his bow nocked but he let the string go loose.

“Job to do!” a shrill voice whispered mockingly from behind him as he walked away.

Blacknail clenched his fist but kept on walking. He’d killed harpies before and he would do it again. Next time, he was going to enjoy every moment of it, though.

Soon, they were away from the flying pests. Blacknail and his master scanned the forest for further threats. While the harpies hadn’t made too much noise they still had made some. It was possible they might have alerted someone. The pair of sentries he had seen from up above in the tree might not be the only ones around.

“We’re good,” Saeter remarked quietly a few moments later as he motioned Blacknail forward.

The hobgoblin ground his teeth together as he stalked forward through the forest. The base Werrick’s men had built lay before him and he fully intended to take his frustration out on its occupants. Oh yes, there was going to be blood! He might even booby trap the corpses as a surprise for greedy harpies.

Blacknail stepped up to an old thick tree that sat atop a hill. From there its branches hid him and he could look down on the enemy camp. Saeter joined him a second later.

The base was nestled in a large clearing. The tall dark trees of the forest surrounded it on all sides. The ground below was slightly sloped towards a small creak that ran through the middle of the clearing before disappearing into the forest.

The camp itself was mostly a massive collection of blue tents. They filled the center of the glade. Off to one side lay a hitch post were dozens of horses were tied up, and men could be seen walking everywhere.

“Hmm, it’s weird how they have all those tents. They look new. Did Werrick buy them all just for this attack?” Saeter mused.

“Does it matter? Let’s just find-ss the sentries and kill them,” Blacknail hissed.

It wasn’t the hobgoblin’s job to worry about such things. Herad could deal with it later. He just wanted to work out his bad mood.

Saeter turned and gave Blacknail a critical look.

“Keep your emotions under control or you’ll fuck this up and we will be the ones getting killed,” the old scout told him.

“Fine, sorry,” Blacknail grunted sourly in reply.

The hobgoblin knew he was letting his rage slip out of control. Having the harpies steal his trophies was simply infuriating. It didn’t matter that he hadn’t actually wanted a bunch of human bodies. They were still his!

“There is a sentry over by that log,” Saeter remarked as he pointed down below.

“I’ll go take him out so we can slip closer,” Blacknail whispered in reply.

The hobgoblin mentally worked through a few basic sword forms to calm himself down, as he turned towards his destination. Discipline had been beaten into him by his master during his sword training.

Suddenly, there was an outcry from below which caused the hobgoblin to flinch.

“Intruders! To arms! We’re under attack!” someone in the camp yelled.

A chorus of answering shouts soon joined it. As Blacknail watched in dismay, the enemy camp came alive and dozens of men emerged from tents. The sentry below was quickly reinforced by a fully armed squad of bandits, and together they all disappeared into the forest.  Uh oh, this wasn’t good.

“We need to leave. Let’s get to the fallback route,” Saeter announced as he spun around.

“What? No! They couldn’t have seen us!” Blacknail whined in exasperation.

He wanted to hunt! This wasn’t fair. What had just happened?

“Less moaning, more running,” Saeter replied as he started moving.

Blacknail growled in frustration before following his master back into the forest. As the pair ran through the woods, Blacknail managed to get his emotions under control.

“What’s going-ss on? How do they know we are here?” Blacknail asked his master.

“They probably don’t, we aren’t the only ones here, remember,” Saeter huffed back as he ran.

Oh, right. Blacknail had actually forgotten that.  Herad had sent several teams of scouts. Blacknail had just sort of assumed they would all hang back while he and Saeter did all the real work.

Shouting could be heard behind them as Blacknail and his master ran through the woods back to their rendezvous point. The hobgoblin’s long pointy ears also detected some closer voices.

“This is all your fault!” a female voice whispered angrily off to Blacknail’s left.

“Me? How could it be mine? I’m the scout here, not you!” a deeper male voice answered.

Blacknail sighed when he recognized the voices. He now knew why the enemy had been put on alert: incompetent people.

Saeter apparently heard the sound of nearby people trudging through the forest but not their voices because he turned to the hobgoblin and questioned him.

“Who is it? Enemies?” the old scout asked.

Blacknail grimaced in distaste before replying. He wanted to say yes.

“No, they’re... allies,” the hobgoblin replied hesitantly.

Saeter nodded in acknowledgement and then dodged left. Blacknail jumped over a fallen tree and followed him, as they both veered off towards the newcomers. A few seconds later, the pair slipped out of the greenery and met up their comrades.

Running out in front was the scout Varhs. His pet goblin Scamp was scrambling alongside him, and trailing them both was the young redhead Khita. Varhs looked shocked for a second as Saeter and Blacknail appeared, but he quickly calmed down when he recognized them.

“Ah, Saeter! Don’t surprise me like that,” the younger scout exclaimed as he kept moving.

“Oh, the boss is here,” Scamp commented excitedly. The little goblin had obviously heard them coming.

Blacknail squinted at the three running figures before him. He was pretty sure he knew who to blame for this mess and who had alerted the enemy. Varhs was a good ranger and at home in the forest. Scamp was annoying but he could at least stay hidden, especially if there was work to do. That left Khita, the most useless one.

“Why are you here? You’re not a scout,” Blacknail asked her.

“I convinced Varhs to let me come,” Khita replied. “Staying around camp was boring.”

The hobgoblin threw Varhs a questioning look. He was disappointed in him. Varhs seemed like a half decent ranger but he kept surrounding himself with idiots.

“She said she could keep up,” Varhs muttered in reply.

Saeter gave the other scout a cold glare.

“Next time don’t let a pretty face sway you,” he told him. “For now though, just keep running and follow me. It sounds like there are people right on your tail.”

Sure enough, Blacknail could hear the sounds of pursuit. Several people were yelling and crashing through the underbrush behind them. The hobgoblin made sure he was running near his master at the front, where it would be safest.

“Where are we going?” Khita asked.

“The rendezvous point. Just slow down for a second,” Saeter replied as he gulped down air.

The old scout was beginning to look worn out. His pace had slowed and he was wheezing for breath. Blacknail frowned in concern for his master. They hadn’t been running all that fast...

“Is that a good idea with this many people chasing us?” Varhs asked as he looked back over his shoulder.

“Don’t worry, I have a plan. A good ranger always has an escape route prepared,” Saeter explained. “Just make sure you follow my steps exactly.”

Up ahead, the forest opened up to reveal a sunny clearing. The old scout headed straight towards it.

“Oh, this plan...” Blacknail remarked uncomfortably.

He remembered this plan, it was terrible. He really hoped his master knew what he was doing...

“Did you place traps here or something?” Khita asked as she ran up beside Blacknail.

The young woman was studying the long grass that lay ahead of them suspiciously. They’d reach it and be out of the forest within a few seconds.

“Or something-ss,” the hobgoblin hissed in reply.

He was too busy running to answer her more clearly and didn’t really care anyway. Although, if she wandered off the trail she would ruin everything... even more than she already had.

“Stay close behind me and you’ll be fine,” Blacknail added reluctantly.

“Alright, thanks,” the young woman replied.

The mismatched group charged out of the forest. Blacknail pushed a leafy branch away from his face and winced as the light from the sun hit him.

Saeter was ahead of him and already stomping through the grass. Blacknail frowned and looked nervously around as he followed his master. Behind him came Khita. Much to the hobgoblin’s annoyance, she seemed to be making a game of only stepping in his footprints.

Holding up the rear was Varhs and Scamp. The other scout didn’t question Saeter’s plan, but he had drawn his bow and was watching carefully for pursuers. Scamp was scampering along beside his master. The goblin looked more than a little spooked and hesitant to enter the clearing.

“Danger everywhere!” he moaned as looked over his shoulder.

Together, the group worked their way into the clearing. They were surrounded by long green grass and thick plants. Clumps of taller bushes and small trees spotted the glade, but Saeter led them away from those.

They had barely made it halfway through the clearing when their enemy caught up. There was shouting as over two dozen men burst out of the forest and stepped into the grass. The leader instantly spotted Blacknail’s group.

“There they are. The grass is slowing them down. There’s no way they can escape!” he yelled as he pointed towards them.

Unfortunately, Blacknail had to agree. The hobgoblin felt his stomach twist nervously. Saeter wasn’t moving fast enough, and cutting a path through the clearing was slowing them down. They wouldn't be able to get away without a fight.












RLD 7













Enemy troops spilled out of the bushes at the edge of the forest and into the clearing. Like Herad’s own men, they wore a rough collection of leather armor. Hatred filled eyes glared towards Saeter’s party from unshaven faces framed by long messy hair.

Those few that didn’t already have weapons in hand drew them. Swords hissed free from sheaths and one of them pulled a war axe from off his back.

“Don’t let the bloody vermin get away! Charge!” their leader ordered his minions.

Varhs immediately raised his bow to pick the man off, but Saeter put a hand on his shoulder and stopped him.

“Hold your fire until they get closer,” Saeter ordered the other scout. “I don’t want them to scatter just yet.”

Varhs did as he was told but he gave Saeter a doubtful look. The front ranks of the enemy contained over a dozen men and were closing in on them. They only had a few minutes until Werrick’s men caught up.

There were only four people in Saeter’s group, four and a half if you included Scamp. If you didn’t count Khita as a full person then you only had like three and a half, or something... Counting wasn’t Blacknail’s strongest skill.

Scamp was sticking close to his master’s heels and he looked terrified. His normally large eyes were huge as he gazed around nervously. He looked like he was going to run at the slightest provocation.

“Fine, but I hope your plan is a good one,” Varhs grunted at Saeter.

“So do I,” the grey haired scout replied sourly.

This didn’t make anyone feel better. Khita just looked puzzled, but Blacknail groaned and Varhs looked like someone had just slapped him across the face.

“Running away would be a lot safer than this,” the hobgoblin muttered to himself.

Sure, not all of them would survive if they ran, but he would. He was the fastest runner here by far. Also, killing everyone else would probably slow the enemy down enough for Saeter to escape.
“Hey, they’ve got bows of their own,” Khita suddenly interjected.

Everyone looked over to see three of the enemies nocking arrows to their bows. They stood back as the rest of their group advanced. The enemy fighters were getting uncomfortably close. The tall man with the war axe was leading the way and there was a wicked grin on his face.

“Perfect. This way,” Saeter told them as he turned away.

“Perfect? How is this situation anywhere near perfect?” Varhs remarked in exasperation.

Saeter didn’t reply. He immediately led the others towards a clump of tall bushes off to one side. Before they reached it though, there was a whistling sound and three arrows tore through the air towards them.

The first one was aimed too high but the others were more on target. One arrow zoomed a few feet wide of Varhs’ chest. The other flew through the group and passed right by Khita’s face before slamming into the ground with a thud.

The young redhead went completely still when she realized what had just happened. Slowly, the color drained from her face. She lifted a hand up to wipe her cheek and drops of blood appeared on her fingers. She stared in shock.

The arrow had grazed her and given her a shallow cut. If it had been an inch to the left she would have died.

“Don’t stand there. Get down, you idiot!” Varhs growled angrily as he pulled her toward the bushes.

Within seconds, they were all behind cover. Blacknail peered at suspiciously at the nearby bushes and the tree in the middle of them. When he didn’t detect anything off, his healthy paranoia then focused on all the men with swords coming to kill him.

His concentration was broken though, when Khita’s back pressed up against his side. What was she doing?

He turned around and saw the young woman trembling slightly beside him. She still looked more than a little pale. As he watched, she shuffled even closer up against him, and accidently jabbed him with her elbow. Blacknail winced as his ribs throbbed painfully. Ow, she was sure was bony.

Saeter noticed the young redhead’s behaviour and the hobgoblin’s confusion.

“She’s in shock. Comfort her!” he whispered.

“Why?” Blacknail asked in surprise. That didn’t sound like something he’d do.

“Because I said so...” his master hissed back. “...and she might slow us down.”

“I don’t mind doing it,” Varhs interjected hopefully.

The scout was crouched next to Blacknail on the opposite side from Khita. He had been keeping watch on the advancing bandits. Now he was staring at Khita with a thoughtful expresion, though. Saeter gave him a hard look that was completely devoid of amusement.

“Keep watch! You wanting to show off is what got us into this mess!” he hissed at the other scout.

Varhs looked reluctant and glowered at Blacknail for a second, but he turned back around. Blacknail had no idea why the man was angry at him! What had he done? This was obviously Khita’s fault!

“How do you comfort people?” the hobgoblin asked his master doubtfully.

“Tell her she’s safe,” Saeter answered.

“Would slapping her work?” he inquired. That would be quicker.

“No!” his master replied with an angry glare.

Blacknail sighed in annoyance and turned to look at Khita again. She was huddled up next to him. Gently, he reached around to hold her shoulder.

“You’re safe-ss now,” he told her as he patted her on the head reassuringly.

A good pat on the head always made him feel better. In fact, he kind of wanted one now. Why had he suddenly become the person that gave out pats instead of receiving them? When had that happened?

“Thanks, but I just needed to catch my breath, Blacknail. That’s all,” Khita replied with a forced smile. “Ha, I guess I’m lucky those arrows missed me.”

Her shivering had stopped but she still looked pale. Well, that was good enough. Blacknail quickly withdrew and took a step back from her.

“Your idea-ss of luck is different from mine,” Blacknail replied dryly. “If I was lucky-ss I wouldn’t be here with you.”

For some reason, that totally truthful statement earned him a glare from Saeter, but Khita just smiled. Her eyes looked a little wet.

“Ha, you remind me of my brother, Blacknail,” she told him. “You joke around just like him. You also look after people.”

“I’m better looking, though,” the hobgoblin commented.

He had obviously never met her dead brother but that didn’t matter. Humans were pink after all, and that was a really stupid color to be. Green was just a much better color all around.

The nearby bushes suddenly shook. Everyone flinched and ducked down low. A pair of arrows tore through the plants and slammed into the ground. Leaves were knocked loose and rained down over Blacknail and the others.

After making sure he hadn’t been shot, Blacknail turned and gave Scamp a kick. The startled goblin had tried to squeeze between him and Varhs, so he could use them as a meat shield.

“Why are we still sitting here?” Varhs asked urgently. “They’re almost upon us.”

Saeter got up and looked towards the mass of angry bandits stomping towards their hiding spot. He scrutinized them carefully, as he pulled out his own bow and nocked an arrow to it.

“Alright, now!” he ordered the other man. “Aim right towards their center.”

Immediately, both scouts rose and loosed their arrows. The shots skimmed through the air above the grass and slammed into the approaching enemies. Two of the men fell with shafts sticking from their chests.

Blacknail had pulled out his own sling as well, so that he could help. He spun it and his stone projectile was launched into the air a second later. It hit the arm of an advancing enemy and caused him to drop his sword.

“Bloody hells, you bastards!” someone screamed hoarsely.

“Get to cover but keep advancing. Spread out and surround them!” a tall blonde bandit who had been standing near the back yelled.

The other enemy bandits followed his orders. The mass of armed and dangerous looking men split up into smaller groups. A few of them kept coming forward but most headed off to the sides where they could find cover behind the nearby clumps of trees and bushes.

Before Saeter and Varhs could get another shot off, the enemy archers opened fire. The two scouts had to duck back out of sight as the arrows flew over their heads.

“Now what? They’re circling around,” Varhs asked as he crouched down low.

“Now we wait for a reaction,” Saeter replied.

“They are reacting! They’re running everywhere,” Varhs pointed out.

“I’m not talking about the men,” the older scout answered.

Suddenly, a sharp crashing noise filled the clearing. Something snapped and there was a hollow thud. Khita flinched and beside her Blacknail jumped slightly. However, the hobgoblin quickly grinned as screams of surprise and pain filled the air. It was music to his ears.

Saeter’s plan had actually worked! They most likely weren’t all going to die!

The enemies that had headed into the thickets to find cover were under attack, by the bushes themselves. The tallest of the nearby trees had reached out and slashed at several nearby bandits.

Familiar angry hissing reached Blacknail’s ears, as the trees transformed before his eyes into mimics. They looked angry too. The giant, spindly, insect like creatures tore into the bandits that had approached them with their many long clawed limbs.

Werrick’s men were too surprised to put up much of a fight. Even the bandits well away from the fighting had stopped moving and were gaping at their distressed allies. They didn’t seem to know what to do.

A few of the enemy soldiers started to retaliate, but their blades either missed the mimics’ flailing limps entirely or bounced off their hard carapace. One of the tree creatures grabbed a man and then tossed him violently aside. Leaves cascaded down as the mimic moved to smash aside a new target.

“Alright, now it’s time to run again,” Saeter informed his companions.

None of them argued with him. Almost instantly, they were all on their feet and headed away from the fight. The end of the clearing and the way back into the forest loomed ahead of them.

“What in all the hells are those?” Khita gasped in surprise. “Did you bring those trees to life?”

The young woman kept as close as possible to Blacknail as she ran. Which annoyed the hobgoblin. Her eyes were wide with surprise and more than a little excitement.

“No, they’re just beasts, mimics,” Saeter replied dryly as he ran.

“How did you know they were there?” Khita asked next.

“Obviously, I scouted this path out in advance,” the old scout told her.

“How did you know...” the redhead started to ask before Saeter cut her off.

“Stop asking me such stupid questions and run,” he growled at her.

Behind them, the sounds of battle continued. Someone screamed and there was a thrashing sound, like branches colliding.

Blacknail risked a look over his shoulder. None of the enemies were chasing Herad’s minions, and no arrows flew their way. The surviving thugs were backing away from the mimics, and the creatures were letting them.

Saeter’s party soon reached the far edge of the clearing. A wall of bushes and younger trees blocked their way.

“Are you sure there are no mimics here?” Varhs asked Saeter.

“There weren’t yesterday,” the old scout grumbled in reply before pushing his way through.

After a few tentative steps, everyone else quickly followed him back into the woods. The barrier of thin branches and greenery gave way to reveal a dark expanse of tree trunks under a shadowy canopy.

“Are we safe now?” Khita asked when they were all out of sight of the battle behind them.

“No, they’re not bloody idiots, girl,” Saeter told her scornfully. “They will have sent men around to cut us off.”

“Oh,” the young woman remarked unhappily.

“But you have a plan right?” Varhs asked. “Preferably something better than sitting in the middle of a bunch of mimics and hoping the enemy walks into them before we do!”

“Yes, we keep running,” Saeter told him.

Blackail hadn’t stopped. The hobgoblin ducked under a low branch as he continued jogging through the forest. He wasn’t stupid enough to think they were out of danger, even for a second.

The others were right behind him. It wasn’t like he was slowing his pace to keep an eye on them or anything. He just knew it would be dangerous to run ahead alone...

Rows of trees surrounded them on all sides. The ground was almost completely bare of anything but dark earth. Only a few short leafy plants and small ferns grew around the base of the thick smooth tree trunks.

The group was silent as they ran between the trees, until Khita spoke up.

“Um, There’s a...” she suddenly mumbled.

“Save your breath,” Varhs huffed from beside her.

“But there’s a dead guy right over there!” Khita shot back angrily.

Varhs’ eyes widened as he turned in the direction Khita was pointing. Both Saeter and Blacknail’s gaze quickly followed.

A human body lay strewn over a tangle of roots at the base of a tree. The cause of death was obvious. An arrow jutted out from his back and his brown scout’s cloak was red with blood. It was undoubtedly one of Herad’s men, although without getting a better smell Blacknail wasn’t sure exactly which.

“Shit,” Saeter swore. “They’re ahead of us.”

Both scout’s cloaks swished behind them as they turned to survey the surrounding woods. Blacknail’s gaze lingered on the fallen man’s corpse for a moment. Maybe he should go through his pockets, in case there were any clues there?

“Incoming! Get down!” Varhs yelled a second later.

There was a shrill whipping sound. Instantly, Blacknail was laying face first on the ground with his arms shielding his face. He didn’t have to be told twice. Stopping to think could get you killed!

Arrows hissed through the air where he had been standing a second ago. There was a dull crack as one embedded itself into a nearby tree trunk, and Blacknail flinched in pain as the sound stabbed into his ears. Ah, that was too close!

The hobgoblin didn’t take any chances. From on the ground, he lurched sideways and started rolling towards the base of a tree where the roots would shield him.

When he didn’t hear any more arrows, Blacknail looked up and peeked out from behind his hands. His companions were on the ground around him, and none of them seemed to have feathered shafts sprouting out from uncomfortable places. That was good.

Even better, Scamp was nowhere to be seen. The cowardly goblin had been running behind Varhs but had disappeared after his master had yelled. With luck something had already eaten him. More likely though, he had run off somewhere.

The next thing Blacknail noticed was the squad of enemy archers stomping through the woods towards him. Several of them were already reaching for new arrows.

“We need to get to the road!” Saeter yelled as he jumped to his feet.

The old scout immediately dashed forward and placed a wide tree trunk between himself and the archers. Blacknail scrambled up and ran after his master. Varhs and Khita sprinted for cover together, sort of. It looked like both of them were trying to outrun the other so that they could use each other as human shields.

Blacknail easily kept ahead of both of them. Losers!

Another arrow flew past and cut through the forest. It didn’t come close to hitting anyone, so everyone just kept running.

A ledge came into view up ahead. Past a few trees, the ground suddenly fell away. Down below, the road could be soon on the other side of some bushes.

“Damnation, I meant to go around this,” Saeter growled.

The fall couldn’t have been more than ten feet but it was still an uncomfortable jump. They didn’t have a lot of choices, though.

Blacknail put on a burst of speed and raced ahead. A second later, he jumped off the edge and plummeted down. He felt his bones shake as he landed in a crouch on the ground. The hobgoblin ignored the feeling. He quickly stood up and glanced backwards at the ledge.

Khita and Varhs were right behind him. The pair jumped over the ledge. They seemed to hang in the air for moment before plummeting back down to earth. Both of them landed feet first and then rolled straight past the hobgoblin. However, Saeter hesitated a moment before jumping.

Sensing a problem, Blacknail gritted his teeth and reached down inside himself to burn any Elixir left in his system. There wasn’t a lot but it would have to do.

“Jump and I’ll catch you,” he told his master.

“What? You don’t need to do that...” Saeter grumbled.

Blacknail gave his master an annoyed glare, but before he could say anything shouting broke out on top of the ledge. It sounded like the enemy was very close. Saeter threw a look over his shoulder and then immediately jumped.

The hobgoblin froze for a split second in surprise before reacting. He then spun to the side and reached out to scoop up his master’s legs. As Saeter’s weight descended Blacknail cushioned it.

Then he lost his balance. The impact knocked him backwards, and Saeter landed on top of him.

“Ack, toad piss,” Blacknail coughed painfully as he lay flat on his back.

His master had landed right on the hobgoblin’s chest. The impact had squeezed his ribs and knocked the air out of him. His lungs burned painfully when he tried to draw in a breath.

Saeter got up, brushed himself off, and immediately started running towards the road again. It was only a few dozen feet away.

“Hurry up, Blacknail!” he shouted. “Don’t just lay there like a log!”

The hobgoblin coughed again and pulled himself to his feet. He then quickly began following the others. As he picked up speed, he glared hostilely at his master’s back.

“Some thanks-ss would nice!” he hissed to himself.

When they got back to camp Blacknail was going to make sure Saeter paid him back! If he didn’t then the hobgoblin was sure Vorscha and Geralhd would find the story amusing. Yes, he was definitely going to get something tasty or shiny...

Khita and Varhs were already pushing through the bushes. Saeter was right behind them. Blacknail brought his hand up to shield his face as he stepped through the brush and out of the forest again.

“Your plan sucks,” Khita remarked as she looked around the empty road.

“What now?” Varhs asked. “Do we make a break for the other side?”

Saeter scowled as he studied the surroundings. The wide dirt road was empty. It cut through the forest but there was nothing to see in either direction.

The bushes a bit down the road shook as several enemies stepped out. They raised their weapons.

“Shit, we’re right back where we started,” Varhs cursed.








RLD 8









More enemies stepped out of the bushes, until Blacknail counted ten of them. The hostile bandits marched up onto the road and eyed Saeter’s group. All of them were armed with swords and looked dangerous, like hardened killers.

“Capture some of them alive!” their leader ordered the rest. “We need to interrogate them.”

Blacknail weighed the odds. He had some Elixir on him but he wasn’t sure he could fight this many people and protect Saeter at the same time. The old scout looked worn out and Khita wouldn’t be any help. That left most of the work up to him and Varhs.

Unfortunately, he couldn’t sneak his master away from the others so it wasn’t like he had a choice. The hobgoblin drew his blade and reached into his pocket to grasp his vial of Elixir. Varhs and Khita both took out their own short swords.

“Are we fighting?” Khita asked Saeter.

The old scout didn’t reply. He was frowning and seemed to be staring straight ahead at the enemy, but Blacknail could tell he was scanning their surroundings out of the corners of his eyes. He was looking for something.

“That one looks like a girl!” one of the larger enemies said as he grinned at Khita. “I’m taking her.”

“Just make sure they don’t get away,” the leader responded.

The big brute raised his sword and stepped forward, just as an arrow took him in the chest. Blood sprayed from his mouth as he coughed and collapsed. A hail of arrows quickly followed the first. They slammed into the enemy bandits until most of them had fallen.

“Fucking hells, an ambush!” the leader cursed as he backed up and raised his sword defensively.

A new group of human bandits rose from where they had been hiding in the ditch along the road, but these were Herad’s men. There was the sound of shaking leaves as more of them stepped out of the forest behind the ditch, including Red Dog. The bandit lieutenant scanned the remaining enemies.

“Swordsmen forward, take them down!” he bellowed confidently.

At his command, the men from the ditch drew their blades and jumped onto the road. They charged forward and engaged the now vastly outnumbered and injured enemies.

“Thank the gods!” Varhs exclaimed as several of Herad’s men ran past him.

Blacknail let his sword drop. It didn’t seem like his help would be necessary.

“We didn’t really need their help. I could have taken the big guy...” Khita remarked assertively. “...and Blacknail could have taken the rest.”

The hobgoblin gave her a skeptical look. How could she possibly believe that? Blacknail had seen Khita fight. She wasn’t that good at it! Also, why did he have to do most of the work?

There was the sound of blades clashing as Red Dog’ s men fought. Only a few of Werrick’s men were left standing and they were quickly surrounded. Seconds later, they were all cut down. No prisoners were taken.

“Is that all of them or are there more hiding in the trees?” Red Dog asked as he walked over to Saeter.

“That’s all the ones that were chasing us,” the old scout answered him. “I was beginning to think you had gotten lost and missed the rendezvous point.”

“I just had to wait until they were all out in the open,” Red Dog replied with an indifferent shrug. “It wouldn’t have been a very good ambush if I didn’t get them all.”

“But the ambush would have worked fine if we all died? What if they had used bows?” Varhs grumbled to himself.

“Did you get your job done?” Red Dog asked Saeter as he ignored Varhs.

“I certainly did my part, and Blacknail did his,” the old scout replied. “We took out quite a few sentries before being discovered and led several more right to you. I’m not sure about Varhs, though. He let himself get distracted.”

“I can see that,” Red Dog said as he eyed Khita disdainfully.

Varhs coughed and looked away. There was slight embarrassed flush to his cheeks.

“Hey, I did more than you!” Khita interjected as she glared angrily at Red Dog. “I was out there fighting and risking my life. All you did was stand here and order other people to fight for you.”

“That’s the burden of command,” the bandit lieutenant replied.

“Burden my ass; you’re just lazy,” Khita told him.

Saeter reached over and swatted the side of her head. Khita stepped back and glowered at him.

“Don’t argue with the commander in the field,” he told the young woman. “There will be plenty of time later to tell Vorscha all about how he put you in danger.”

Red Dog frowned at the old scout’s words. He looked slightly nervous for a second but then he just scowled in annoyance. It was quick, but Saeter grinned smugly for second in response.

“Since you feel so hard down by, let me escort you the rest of the way then,” Red Dog said as he motioned towards one of his men.

“You there, make sure the small redhead stays safe. She might trip in a pothole and hurt herself. Also, you should watch out for squirrels,” he told the man.

The man in question froze and stared in confusion as Red Dog and Khita glared furiously at each other. He didn’t know how seriously he should take the order. Either option could backfire on him.

“So, we’re moving on then?” Saeter asked to break the tension.

“Since you seem to have drawn the enemy sentries out of position so well, we should go join up with Herad. The main attack has probably already begun,” Red Dog replied.

“What about the rest of the scouts sent out with us?” Saeter pointed out.

“Most of them have already returned. I’ll leave a few men here in case more show up, but I’m not going to risk sending men into the forest after them,” Red Dog explained.

As soon as he was done talking, Red Dog led the group down the road towards the enemies’ camp. A wedge of sword wielding bandits went first. Behind them came the archers, and in the middle were Blacknail and his companions.

They arrived at their destination within a few minutes. The once hidden path that led from the road to the enemies’ camp was now plainly obvious. Corpses littered the ground and boot prints were everywhere. The bushes on either side of the side trail had been hacked down to create a gaping hole that led into the dark forest beyond.

“I’m not a scout, but I think we should go that way,” Khita announced as she pointed towards the mess.

This earned her more than a few glares. However, no one took a step towards the looming entrance. The group came to a stop and took a moment to study the scene before them.

Blacknail could hear the sounds of battle down the path, although the forest canopy muted the noise. He briefly scanned the nearby bodies. Most seemed to be enemies but he did recognize one of the fallen men. There was definitely a fight going on here. He hoped his side was winning.

“I don’t suppose you’d mind taking a look around?” Red Dog asked Saeter and Varhs. “That brush there would be an excellent spot for an ambush.”

“I think we’ve done enough of that today, don’t you?” Saeter replied coldly.

The bandit lieutenant shrugged and motioned his men forward. The lead bandits carefully made their way down the path. When they weren’t ambushed, attacked by wild animals, or maimed by traps everyone else was quick to follow.

“And we’re back into the woods,” Varhs commented darkly as he stepped into the shadows. “I hope Scamp catches up with us soon.”

The path itself was narrow but moving through the forest was easy. The ground was sparse and mostly bare from the lack of light. The only real obstacles were the trees and they were easy enough to go around.

Blacknail followed the other members of his tribe up the shallow hill that rose in front of them. Shouting and screams could be heard on the other side of it, so that was probably where Herad was. She enjoyed that sort of thing.

When they reached the top of the hill, Red Dog and Blacknail stopped and looked down. A lot had changed since the hobgoblin had seen the enemy’s camp. It was in shambles. The mass of blue tents were still there but many of them had been flattened. Several were on fire.

Herad was leading a push through the very center of the camp. Close to a hundred of her men fought beside as she cut her way in deeper. The enemies’ resistance was scattered and failing. Her sword flashed through the air and bandit after bandit fell before her.

“Damned fools, they’re getting crushed,” Red Dog remarked. “They let their sentries get pulled out of position and then their rear was assaulted.”

“This fight was already over once Herad got past the chokepoint back behind us,” Saeter added. “They should have defended it better.”

“Doesn’t seem like there is much left for us to do,” Varhs observed without a trace of disappointment.

Red Dog nodded in agreement. Across the valley, an enemy captain appeared to be trying to rally the defenders. He waved his sword above his head as he shouted orders.

“We’ll stay here and pick off any stragglers that try and make it back to the road,” Red Dog told everyone.

The enemy captain didn’t manage to assemble much of a force before Herad reached him. There was brief struggle as he was overwhelmed by Herad and her minions. With him dead there was no organized resistance left.

The remaining enemies lost all will to fight. They fled. Herad screamed something that sounded both bloodthirsty and triumphant as her organized formation split up to pursue them. Bandits streamed throughout the camp in every direction and slaughtered each other. From so far away it was hard to tell who was who, especially since most humans looked the same.

“What about our share of the loot?” one of Red Dog’s men asked suspiciously. “How are we supposed to get it from up here?”

“You’ll get it, don’t worry. I certainly plan on getting my cut,” Red Dog answered as he continued to stare down at the carnage below.

Blacknail frowned in disappointment. He wanted to be down there with Herad. It looked like everyone there was having fun and that was where the best loot was. He didn’t trust most the humans in his tribe. They would squirrel away all the good stuff and keep it for themselves!

“Ha, if all of Werrick’s men are this soft then winning this war is going to be easier than pinching a fat man’s purse!” Khita chuckled.

“Do you remember-ss being chased through the woods?” Blacknail asked her in dismay. “I do! It was just a few minutes ago!”

“That wasn’t so bad,” the young woman replied calmly. “They fell into our trap.”

From off to one side, Varhs took a step closer to Khita and smiled at her.

“Yep, I had the situation completely under control. Rabble like the men chasing us were no match for me,” he bragged confidently.

“The fucks?” Blacknail exclaimed in disbelief.

They had almost died several times! What were these morons saying? Khita was an idiot, and he had no idea what was wrong with Varhs! The scout didn’t usually act this stupid. Maybe Khita was infectious...

As Blacknail watched, a small group of Werrick’s men broke away from the camp and headed his way. They had been hiding in some of the tents off to one side.

“It looks like we’re going to have company,” Varhs observed as he noticed them.

Red Dog gave the approaching men a disgusted look. He didn’t seem too concerned. There were less than a dozen of them and several of them didn’t even appear to be armed.

“Idiots. Even if they made it to the road unmolested, how do they think they are going to survive in the woods without any gear? There isn’t any shelter nearby,” Saeter remarked condescendingly.

“They’re cowards, what do you expect?” Red Dog answered him.

Blacknail just smiled and started humming to himself. These humans seemed to be acting pretty normally to him. Fear did strange things to men’s heads. It made them easy targets.

“Sharp!” the hobgoblin purred happily as he watched the fleeing enemies draw closer.

He had been worried for a second, but it looked like the loot was coming to him! How lucky.

Blacknail’s group was waiting for the cowards when they crested the hill. After a very brief struggle, Red Dog’s men put them down. Taken by surprise and unarmed, they didn’t put up much of a fight. The hobgoblin killed two without even bothering to use Elixir.

Blacknail had made sure he was right at the front when the fighting started. That gave him an excuse to loot the bodies.

Sometime after the hobgoblin had finished increasing the size of his bauble collection, the entire group of bandits he was with headed down to rendezvous with the others. The battle had ended a while ago and things seemed to have settled down.

Blacknail led the way down the hill and through the trees. When he stepped out into the clearing one of the first people he saw was Vorscha. Several other people were nearby as well including Geralhd.

The female warrior was seated on a crate someone had left next to a tent. Her armor was covered with mud and several bloodstains, but she looked unharmed. She had obviously seen combat but instead of resting she was busy cleaning her gear. A large long sword was balanced on her knees and she seemed focused on wiping it down with a cloth.

Geralhd was standing next to her and was inspecting a pair of daggers. Unlike his lover’s, his armor looked perfectly clean.

“Hail the camp,” Red Dog announced as he stepped out behind Blacknail.

At the sound of his voice Vorscha looked up and smiled their way.

“There you are. I was wondering how long you were all going to hang out up on that hill,” she said.

“Just as long as we needed to,” Red Dog replied with a shrug.

The rest of his men and Saeter walked up as well. Khita was directly behind the old scout and Varhs was holding the rear.

“It’s good to see you’re all alive. I was a little worried when Khita disappeared,” Vorscha told them.

“And I was worried when she showed up,” Red Dog added dryly.

“I can take care of myself,” Khita interjected in an irritated tone.

“Maybe,” Vorscha replied doubtfully.

Red Dog ignored the exchange and turned to his men.

“You can all stay here. I need to find the boss and make a report,” he told them before walking off towards the middle of the camp.

“I don’t really need them. I have sentries out and everything else has been wrapped up already. They can go where they want,” Vorscha announced before Red Dog had gone more than a few steps.

Immediately, most the men either found somewhere to sit down or wandered off. Blacknail started off to find something interesting as well. There had to be something nearby worth eating or at least something entertaining.

“Not you,” Saeter told the hobgoblin. “Stay here. I still remember all the trouble you got into last time you wandered off in place like this.”

The hobgoblin froze and scowled. He wanted to go look around but his master seemed determined that he stay here. That was no fun!

“Stupid naked lady!” the hobgoblin muttered irritably to himself.

It wasn’t like he was going to run into another one. That sort of thing wasn’t common, was it?

“So, did you see any action? We had quite a bit here,” Geralhd asked Saeter politely.

“You could say that?” the old scout huffed.

“We got chased through the woods, shot at, and attacked by bunch of trees,” Khita bragged.

“Is that right?” Vorscha asked Saeter as she threw him an annoyed glare.

“I didn’t ask her to come,” Saeter replied as he shrugged.

His words caused Vorscha to sigh and turn back to her blade. After a few more wipes she resheathed it.

“Well, thanks for bringing her back in one piece,” she said as she looked back up.

“You need to stop worrying about other people. You’re not responsible for every hopeless case that wanders by. The girl needs to take care of herself,” Saeter told Vorscha.

“Ya, stop,” Blacknail added irately.

It was annoying how Vorscha kept forcing Blacknail to look after Khita. The girl was constantly getting herself into trouble and she never even learned from her mistakes! Why did he need to be involved? That wasn’t fair.

“Ya, stop,” Khita said in imitation of the hobgoblin. “I can take care of myself.”

Everyone ignored her. Geralhd coughed and politely changed the topic of the conversation.

“I must say, this is quite the victory for us and our capable leader. I hope the rest of this little backwoods war ends like this battle did,” he observed aloud.

“It was foolish of Werrick to leave this force unsupported. We cut it to pieces like a hog on a slab,” Saeter told him.

“Maybe he didn’t plan on us finding them or maybe he just didn’t care,” Geralhd guessed.

“Logistics is a bitch,” Vorscha explained. “Werrick has to move quite a few men from several different places to here. It can’t be easy to do all that at the same time. Most likely he just made a mistake or one of his subordinates did. It’s not like he’s an experienced general and the man in command here didn’t seem all that smart.”

“Still, that’s just another advantage Herad has. She’s already emplaced and doesn’t have to worry about being picked off in detail,” Geralhd added.

“We’re going to need every advantage we can get. We’ve won this battle but not the war. Even after losing this many men Werrick will still outnumber us. Werrick can afford a mistake or two,” Vorscha explained as she cleaned her blade. “All he needs to do is win one major battle and Herad’s position will be shattered.”

There was a grim silence as everyone considered her words. However, Blacknail wasn’t too worried. Herad had one other advantage that no one had mentioned. She had him! He was the greatest killer in the North, if not the world! Let the human named Werrick come. Death was waiting for him.











INT: WOM









Mahedium stared at the liquid solution in front of him. It had been hard to find sulfur pure enough but it looked to be working now. The contents of the glass beaker were a nice rose color and bubbling satisfactorily. The hot coals beneath the beaker were keeping the temperature just right.

Yes, he had a good feeling about this batch. With some luck, a new type of crystal would soon start to form within the solution. With even more luck, it would be useful and easily reproducible! If the gods were truly looking down on him then it would be something even the guilds hadn’t gotten their hands on yet.

Wouldn’t that be a grand twist of fate! For all their money, connections, and corrupt hoarding of knowledge he could still get the better of them! It would just take hard work and a lot of luck.

Mahedium turned away from his work and headed over to his desk. He was in his personal lab within Herad’s camp. It was an adequate facility and he had filled it with all the tools he needed to do his research. Shelves lined the room. They were full of books, glass containers, and strange metal devices.

The room was dark and only lit by several small lamps. A multitude of shadows lay thick upon every surface, but there was enough light to see by.

The mage passed by a small wooden cage as he walked, and there was a shuffling sound from within. Mahedium instinctively looked towards the noise. The small goblin captive inside the cage was staring out at him. Its gaze was calm and steady without a hint of fear.

“I know what you want,” Mahedium said as he reached into a pocket and took out a bit of sausage.

The mage reached down, opened the cage, and then tossed the morsel inside. The meat had been part of his lunch but he hadn’t been hungry enough to finish it off. Sometimes he forgot to eat at all when he was working on a promising experiment. There was always so much to do.

He didn’t bother to close the cage door again. His goblin helper, and that was how he had come to think of the creature, was always very well behaved after it had been fed. Why wouldn’t it be? It had shelter and food here.

“Yes, goblins are very simple creatures after all,” the mage mused to himself as he continued on over to his destination.

When he got to his desk, the mage reached over to grab a lamp stand. With practiced ease, he pulled the transparent crystal out from the top. As he was working, he heard the soft pitter-patter of footsteps behind him.

Mahedium ignored the sound and took a second to examine the crystal, both with his eyes and with his mage sense. Since he was holding it against his bare flesh he could feel the power within the small mana stone.

Its power tickled and warmed his skin. Mana stones had always felt almost alive to Mahedium, like they wanted to be used. It wasn’t a very scientific belief but it was one he had never been able to get completely out of his mind.

“But then how much do we really know about such things?” he mused to himself.

Mentally, he reached toward the transparent crystal in his hand and ignited it. It flared to life and white light washed out across the room. The mage almost seemed to be holding congealed light aloof. It wasn’t even warm.

After a second, Mahedium grunted contentedly and then placed the stone back within the lamp. He had flared the stone just enough to light his desk. He could have burned it brighter but then it would have lost power quicker and have to be replaced sooner. There was no known way to recharge a mana stone.

He hadn’t needed to actually take the stone out of its casing to light it, but he had felt like reveling in simple success for a second. He had felt so few of those moments recently. He was still alive and pursuing his research though, so he couldn’t complain.

Normally, to ignite a mana stone you needed physical contact. Mages had long ago developed ways around this, though. Activating magic by touch wasn’t usually very practical.

Certain metals conducted mana. If a conductive path was created between a mage and a stone then it could be ignited without direct contact, and from a safe distance.

“You could have done that, although not with my finesse and control,” Mahedium said as he turned to look at the goblin behind him.

As usual, the little creature was placidly standing behind the mage and watching what he did intently. He was probably attracted to the bright colors, unique aromas, and other distracting by-products of magical research.  It was rather amusing how easily true intelligence could be imitated.

“Magic runs in your blood, just as it does mine. We are not similar in any other regard but in that we are brothers. Have we been chosen or is it just luck? Where does our gift come from?” the mage asked himself contemplatively.

A few seconds later, Mahedium sighed and turned back towards his desk. He didn’t have time to think about such things, no matter how interesting.

His work desk was covered in paper. Most of it was letters from various correspondents. Several of the messages were even in code. It wouldn’t do for their secrets to be exposed.

He had made quite a few useful contacts during his visit to Daggerpoint. The renegade mage known as Avorlus was particularly useful. His speciality might be Elixirs but he was in possession of more than a few interesting tidbits about mana stones as well.

The mage stared at one letter in particular. It wasn’t from Avorlus, although it had passed through his hands. The sender had offered Mahedium an exchange of knowledge and favors. If they were telling the truth then his research would be able to leap years ahead, if not decades.

His thoughts were interrupted by the creak of a door opening. Mahedium frowned and glanced over his shoulder. A young man, barely out of adolescence, stood in the door. He was carrying a sack over his shoulder, and was obviously straining to support its weight.

“Master, I have the charcoal you wanted,” the young man announced.

He was sweating from exertion and strands of his short brown hair were sticking to his forehead. He looked to be about 16 or so years of age.

“Ah, thank you. Just leave it there by the door please,” Mahedium told the new arrival.

“Yes, master,” the youth replied as he did as he was told.

The mage had recruited his assistant in the nearby city of Riverdown. He was just a young man who had been down on his luck and seemed to have more intelligence than most street trash. Honest work was hard to come by these days, especially in the North.

He had the mage gift too, of course. Mage blood was a crucial component of all aspects of magic, and Mahedium had grown really tired of cutting himself. He was lucky he used to be an herbalist and thus knew how to deal with infections.

Now that he had both an assistant and his pet goblin he almost never had to slice open his own fingers for a few drops of blood. Keeping the wounds clean had been such a pain.

“Come over here, Ressus. I want to show you how to take care of this,” Mahedium told the young man.

“Yes, master,” his assistant replied quickly as he walked over to the mage.

On his way, the young man noticed the goblin standing over to Mahedium’s left. He paused and stared at it suspiciously.

“Should that critter really be left out?” he asked.

“Sure, why not?” the mage replied absentmindedly. “It’s never been a problem before and it’s quite useful really. I haven’t seen a single mouse or rat around since I started letting it out of its cage. The bloody vermin used to get into all my herbs. I even found a nest in one of the pots a while back. That isn’t sanitary.”

“Alright,” his assistant commented as he walked over to peer over his master’s shoulder and see what he was doing.

“I started this culture while you were gone,” Mahedium explained. “It should be done in a few hours. During that time, the heat must be kept steady so you have to replace the charcoal if it gets low.”

“As you wish, master. That sounds simple enough,” his assistant replied unenthusiastically.

Mahedium sighed and shook his head. Why did Ressus sound so apathetic? They were studying magic!

“You have no idea how lucky you are!” the mage accused the young man. “You’re learning secrets here that men would kill to possess. If you were to join one of the mage guilds you would end up as combat fodder and would never be allowed anywhere near real magic like this.”

“Yes, master. Sorry,” Ressus quickly replied as he flushed in embarrassment.

“The guilds keep all their secrets locked up in their colleges. Unless you’re of noble blood or politically connected you would never be able to create your own spell stones, no matter how intelligent you were!” Mahedium ranted. “They would keep you reliant on them, and you would be nothing but a pawn in the games they play amongst themselves.”

“I am very thankful, sir,” his assistant replied but it was obvious the mage wasn’t listening.

“The petty quarrels of the mage guilds are almost as harmful as their squandering of magical knowledge,” the mage continued irately. “It was right before the old empire’s collapse that the guild’s first came into power. Now, they have benefitted more than anyone else from all the constant warfare. They have grown rich and influential by selling war magic...”

Mahedium lost his train of thought and froze. His hands were held up above his head dramatically and there was a confused look on his face. Why where they discussing history? Didn’t he have research to do?

“What was I just talking about?” he asked Ressus.

“You were showing me how to take care of the crystal culture here,” his assistant replied dryly.

“Ah, yes. That’s right. Just check in on it every few minutes and to make sure the heat is kept steady. If a mana stone starts to form within it inform me at once,” the mage told the young man.

With that done, Mahedium made his way over to a different table. What looked to be a disassembled staff lay upon it. Small metal bits and gears were scattered around a long wooden rod. The staff had holes of various sizes in it and seemed to have a metal core.

“Right now, however, take a look at this. I’m in the process of creating a new focus device. It’s important that you understand at least the basic concepts involved in such a thing,” the mage explained excitedly.

Ressus was just hired help. He wasn’t being trained as a researcher but he needed to know enough to lend a hand and fetch the correct tools.

“There is practically nothing magical about a staff or amulet,” the mage added. “Their purpose is to simply hold mana stones and channel their power in the correct direction, although they are sometimes reinforced by materials from crystal caverns. Most mana stones are far too dangerous to ignite by hand, and the results would be unpleasant anyway. Even a simple heat stone would burn the user.”

“What does this staff do?” his assistant asked.

Mahedium smiled smugly before responding. He had been working on this idea for a while.

“My army staff is fine for producing light, heat, or explosive force but now that I have mastered producing other types of crystals I need something with more... punch,” he answered.

The young man just frowned thoughtfully and threw his master a questioning look. This just made the mage feel even smugger.

“I’ve had problems piercing hard targets recently, such as giant mutant snakes,” Mahedium explained. “Once finished, this staff is designed to fire crystalline spikes. A force stone located here will propel the projectiles created by a second mana stone in this chamber.”

“Giant mutant snakes?” his assistant asked in surprise. “You’re kidding, right sir?”

“Hmm? No that was just a few months ago. The Deep Green is full of such things, or so I hear,” Mahedium answered absentmindedly as he stared at the disassembled staff before him. “It’s unlikely another one will show up, but it would make a great weapons test.”

Behind him, the goblin had turned to look at the beaker of liquid Mahedium had set up earlier to grow a crystal in. While the mage and his assistant had been talking it had turned black and started to boil with ever increasing fervor. The goblin eyed it for a second and then hurriedly backed away. Less than a second later, he was back in his cage and the door was firmly shut.

The noise attracted Mahedium’s attention as well. He looked up and stared at the beaker.

“You were supposed to keep the heat steady. Quickly, remove the coals,” the mage ordered his assistant.

The young man quickly spun around but he froze when his eyes took in the sight of the black boiling liquid. He clearly didn’t want to go anywhere near it.

“Don’t worry it’s perfectly safe,” the mage reassured him.

Ressus reluctantly stepped forward, and Mahedium reached into one of his pockets. Carefully, the young man picked up a small rod and pushed the metal charcoal tray out from under the beaker.

There was a loud bang as it exploded. The glass container instantly shattered and the liquid expanded outwards in a black cloud. Shards of black crystal shot out of the smoke.

They flew around the room and several of them slammed into Ressus. His eyes went wide with shock and he crumpled bonelessly over backwards.

Mahedium had been ready, however. His hand came out of his pocket holding a small steel amulet. The gem set in its center glowed. A see-through barrier appeared in front of him and the crystal shards headed his way shattered against it.

Mahedium dropped his shield and tucked the amulet back away. He hadn’t really expected the beaker to explode. Something like that had actually had been a very low probability outcome, but it paid to be prepared.

Ressuss’ body was lying on the lab floor. Several long black crystalline shards were impaled in him. One of them had pierced his left eye, so he was obviously very dead.

The mage looked at his deceased assistant and sighed regretfully. He had actually liked the young man. He had shown a glimmer of promise, if only a glimmer.

Oh well, it wouldn’t be too hard to find a new assistant. He would undoubtedly be moving around a lot soon anyway, so having him underfoot might have been an inconvenience. Better to use disposable helpers for now.

The knowledge he could glean from his experiments was worth the lives of a few assistants. They were just uneducated and unmotivated mage-gifted anyway. There were always more of them around.

Mahedium threw a glance back towards his desk. There was a big battle coming and he had a crucial part to play. As a mage, the power he commanded could easily turn the tides of war, and he was just getting stronger as he learned to harness new spells. One day his magic would change the world!

Now though, he had better call someone to remove the corpse from his lab. It might contaminate something. When that was done, the mess from the explosion had to be cleaned up and the experiment restarted. Even magic could be tedious sometimes.










CTW 1












Blacknail watched the enemy march down the road towards him. There were hundreds of them. The impact from their boots hitting the hard earth of the road filled the air with a thudding sound and caused dust to billow up into the sky.

The savage looking fighters formed a long serpentine line of moving bodies. More and more of them came into sight as they marched past a bend in the road and out from behind a mass of greenery.

The lead elements drew to a close out of bowshot. They were plainly visible under the noonday sun because a gentle wind carried all the dust away and over the forest. Werrick’s main force had arrived.

Blacknail watched from the forest nearby as their commanders started ordering them to stop and rest their feet. Herad had sent the hobgoblin and Saeter out to keep an eye on the invaders.

“So many pathetic cowards,” the hobgoblin hissed angrily.

He was perched atop an old dead tree trunk that had fallen over in the forest. It lay on a angle so that the end Blacknail was seated on was several feet above the ground. Saeter was standing beside him. Together, the pair peered out past the edge of the woods at the enemy on the road before them.

“They’re not doing anything. How can they be cowards?” Saeter remarked with irritated uncertainty.

“It’s because they aren’t doing anything!” Blacknail answered him.  “They should-ss attack already. There are so many of them already, but they are just sitting there. It’s boring!”

“It would be nice if they were that stupid,” his master mused aloud in reply.

“Ah, I have so many things to do!” Blacknail whined as he glared at the humans that had entered his territory uninvited. “But I need to stay here and watch them! They might try something tricky-ss if I leave.”

Saeter was dressed in his forest greens. The wrinkles on his weathered face were plainly visible as he eyed the hobgoblin critically. As usual he was clean-shaven and his grey hair was kept practically short.

“You don’t need to watch them, and besides, what is it that you need to do so badly? If I didn’t get you moving in the morning you’d sit around all day like a pig in the mud,” he replied dryly.

“Stuff. Important stuff, that is what I need to do,” Blacknail responded carefully as he fidgeted uncomfortably.

Usually, he did a daily round of the camp to make sure nothing had changed but he hadn’t had time today. There were also a few items that he had hidden away and he liked to check in on them every once and a while. Not being able to do that was making his brain itch. What if a thief found them and hid them somewhere?

“Stupid humans,” Blacknail hissed to himself as he continued to stare out at the enemy troops.

“What was that?” His master asked.

“Nothing-ss,” the hobgoblin quickly responded.

His master would probably misunderstand the comment. Sometimes Blacknail forgot that Saeter was technically a human. He was a lot smarter and sneakier than most other men.

“I think I’ve seen enough. Let’s head back,” Saeter told the hobgoblin. “I don’t see any signs that they are planning on leaving the road or circling the camp.”

“Sure, sure,” Blacknail murmured distractedly back.

The hobgoblin didn’t budge. He remained perched on a log at the edge of the forest where he had a good view of the road. He knew that any second now the enemy humans were going to do something important and he didn’t want to miss it.

“Come on, Blacknail. If that army starts to move then you’ll bloody know, trust me. You don’t have to watch it yourself,” Saeter said as started walking into the forest.

The hobgoblin wasn’t so sure. His personal experience was that all human sentries were completely useless. He snuck by them all the time, it wasn’t even that hard. He didn’t think it unlikely that they could miss an army or two.

“It’s about time for lunch, anyway,” Saeter remarked loudly as he ducked under a low tree branch.

With a sigh, the hobgoblin got up and followed his master. Watching the enemy was important but there was no way he was going to skip a meal.

Together, the pair slipped through the forest back towards their camp. Saeter whistled a signal before stepping out onto the road in front of the gate. The entrance to their bands’ camp was heavily guarded.

Herad had received plenty of warning of the enemy’s arrival. She had used that time to build up her defenses. The barrier of long wooden spikes that had run along the side of the camp facing the road had been expanded to encircle the entire base and raised platforms had been set up for archers. Trenches had also been dug to slow invaders down.

Saeter and Blacknail carefully made their way up to the entrance. A dozen bandits were guarding the narrow gap in the wall. The closest one gave the pair a brief nod when he recognized them and signalled them forward.

On the other side of the wall, several more squads of bandits were waiting and ready to reinforce the gate in case of an attack. They were armed and armored more heavily than usual. The sunlight from above occasionally glinted off shields, helmets, and bits of armor.

Off to one side, Herad stood at the base of a watchtower. She was issuing orders to several other bandits around her. Tension and the acrid smell of human sweat was thick in the air as Saeter headed over to talk to her. Everyone was waiting for the attack they knew was coming.

“I just came back from taking a look around,” Saeter told the bandit chieftain when she noticed his approach.

“Oh, did you see anything important?” Herad asked him derisively. “You must have if you’re bothering me about it. I’m very busy right now.”

“It’s what I didn’t see that matters,” Saeter replied. “I see no sign of Werrick being here yet. The enemy appears to be waiting for him.”

“You’re probably right about that,” Herad huffed darkly. “If he was here we would know about it. Werrick is an arrogant braggart. He would announce himself with the  subtlety  of a charging ogre.”

“I also haven’t seen any sign of mercenaries or anything unexpected,” Saeter told her.  “It seems like they are planning on treating this like a straight up brawl.”

“And that bothers you? Why? They could be with Werrick or on their way,” Herad replied.

“Maybe, but something isn’t sitting right in my gut,” the old scout explained as he grimiced. “This whole campaign feels slapdash. We took out that exposed first group too easily and this next attack is too straightforward. It’s like Werrick isn’t even trying.”

“I think you’re overestimating Werrick,” Herad countered.

“He could do better than this,” the old scout responded darkly.

“I can’t afford to be jumping at shadows now, old man,” the bandit chieftain said as she rolled her eyes. “If you do find something then feel free to inform me. If not, then keep out of my way and stop wasting my time with useless conjecture.”

“Very well. As you wish,” Saeter grumbled in reply as he turned and started walking off.

“Are we going to have lunch now?” Blacknail asked his master as he followed behind him.

“Yes, because we bloody well earned it,” Saeter replied crossly.

“Are you going to cook something?” the hobgoblin asked hopefully.

When he cooked or ate rations it was never nearly as good as the fare Saeter made. For instance, the worm stew Blacknail had made yesterday should have tasted a lot better than it had...

“No,” the old scout answered as he looked around the camp.

A few seconds later, he started stomping over towards Vorscha’s cabin. Geralhd and her were seated out in front of it.

“It’s someone else’s turn to whip up some grub,” Saeter grumbled.

The hobgoblin and his master circled around a large group of bandits resting next to a pile of crates. When they got to the other side, Vorscha noticed them.

“Oh, Saeter! Geralhd and I were just sitting down to eat. Care to join us?” she asked him cheerily.

“Is Khita going to appear out of nowhere?” Saeter asked her suspiciously.

“Not likely. She’s apparently fooling around with Varhs right now. The little vixen has that man wrapped around her little finger,” the muscular woman replied with a knowing wink. “I taught her how to do that.”

Saeter blinked and mentally digested that remark for a second before replying.

“I’ll accept your invitation and join you then,” the old scout replied neutrally as he walked over. “I hope you aren’t having rations or such shit.”

Vorscha smiled at both him and Blacknail. There was a delicious meaty aroma coming from their fire-pit. They had something roasting the flames on a spit. It obviously wasn’t any kind of trail ration.

“All we have is a bit of venison and some fairly fresh bread but you’re welcome to it. You may have even brought the meat in yourself,” Geralhd explained as he gestured towards the fire.

“It smells great,” Blacknail told him as he sniffed the air and licked his lips.

“What do you think of this mess we're in?” Saeter asked Vorscha as he sat down across from her.

“The fight with Werrick you mean?” she asked.

“Of course, what else could I mean?” Saeter grunted back.

“I think I’m tired and want to rest for a bit. It’s important to keep rested up before a battle,” Vorscha replied.

“This is important. Things have been too easy. Herad doesn’t see any problems but my instincts are telling me something is wrong,” Saeter told her.

“It might be because there is a large army a few hundred feet that way intent on killing us all. That bothers me!” Geralhd commented dryly.

“Then you should go do something about it,” Saeter told him sarcastically.

That caused Blacknail to giggle. The image of Geralhd trying to fight off an army, or even more than one person, was hilarious.

“It’s not like we’ve been winning every battle,” Vorscha pointed out. “Werrick has pushed us back all the way here. I’m still sore from the fight at the river.”

“That’s just weight of numbers,” Saeter told her. “Herad wasn’t seriously planning on stopping him before he got here. Those fights went exactly the way Herad wanted them to.”

“We could have held the river for quite a while if that mage hadn’t frozen it. It would have nice to have done a bit more damage there,” Vorscha countered as she grimaced in distaste.

Blacknail remembered the fight at the river. It had just been a few days ago. Mostly, he had just stood back and shot a few arrows at the enemy. Not that he had been counting, but he had managed to hit two enemies. He had even been aiming for one of them!

Vorscha had led a large group and tried to stop the enemy from crossing the river. At first it had been easy to pick off anyone trying to make the crossing. However, when the river had started to freeze over they had immediately retreated.

“Even that was a victory for Herad. She drew that mage out into the open and now she has a better idea of the tricks he has at his disposal,” the old scout countered.

“I think you’re logic is a little flawed there, Saeter,” Geralhd interjected. “It sounds to me like you’re trying to twist things to fit your argument.”

“It’s a good thing that I don’t care then,” Saeter commented before turning back to Vorscha.

“The thing is, we both know things are going too smoothly,” the old scout told her. “It doesn’t seem like Werrick is really even trying! Hells, he hasn’t even bothered to show up yet!”

“Maybe he just likes to sleep in. If I was the boss I’d sleep in all the time,” Blacknail contributed.

How great would it be to sleep in to noon every day? He could stay curled up in his blankets and minions would bring him breakfast...

Vorscha took a few seconds to think. The tall woman frowned and poked at the fire with a stick. There was a crack as a hot coal shifted and a small shower of sparks rose into the air.

“It does seem like he is doing exactly what we expect him to,” she admitted. “That’s not something I would anticipate from a man of his reputation. He hasn’t become the most powerful bandit chief in the North by being an idiot.”

“Exactly, he’s basically just throwing bodies at us!” Saeter announced. “We’ve bled him quite a bit so far by making him fight for every choke point on the way here, but what if he doesn’t care? What if it’s not only Herad’s plan that is going perfectly but his as well?”

“I don’t like that idea, but it makes a lot of sense. It would explain why we haven’t seen much from the man himself. There has been no need for him to change his plans or get involved,” Vorscha mused sourly.

“But that would mean he wants to fight us here?” Geralhd remarked with a voice full of doubt. “I can’t see the logic in that. We have all the advantages here! He doesn’t outnumber us all that much and we have a solid defensive position. How does he expect to get through our walls?”

“I don’t know what he is planning. My gut is just telling me he has a plan, and that we won’t like it,” Saeter told him.

“You sure know how to ruin someone’s appetite, Saeter,” Vorscha remarked. “No wonder you don’t get invited over to eat by many people.”

Blacknail nodded in agreement. Even he got invited over more than his master and he wasn’t the most popular member of Herad’s band. It was probably because Saeter was so grumpy and because hobgoblins were so handsome.

“Werrick doesn’t need to have some sort of complex machinations in the works,” Geralhd added. “Maybe he simply thinks he has the blades and mages to swamp us under. He is known to be quite the arrogant ruffian.”

“Just right, we have a few tricks up our own sleeves as well,” Vorscha commented as she raised a fist and grinned confidently. “The enemy isn’t going to be getting inside our walls without a hell of a fight.”

“I should just stab this Werrick man,” the hobgoblin mused. “All this waiting for battle is getting annoying.”

A leader as powerful as Werrick probably also had a lot of great stuff to loot. There was no way he would be able to get his hands on it during a battle but if he was the one that killed Werrick it would be very different.

“It’s probably best if you don’t try that,” Geralhd told Blacknail. “Werrick is a skilled Vessel. They say he has killed hundreds of men.”

“I’ve killed Vessels before,” Blacknail said without concern as he shrugged.

It hadn’t even been that hard. Everyone needed to sleep and human guards were usually lazy. The trick was to stab them in the back a few times before the fight started.

“Not like the Wolf, you haven’t,” Saeter interjected. “If skilled assassins could get anywhere near him then he would already be dead. He will have heard of you and won’t be taking any chances. You weren’t exactly subtle back in Daggerpoint.”

“I was the sneakiest! No one saw me coming,” Blacknail bragged as his master rolled his eyes.

“Maybe, but they sure noticed the bloody carnage you left in your wake. You went through Daggerpoint like a troll through a barn,” the old scout replied.

Suddenly, the sound of trumpets blared from the other side of the walls. Geralhd and Blacknail both jumped in surprise.

The hobgoblin dropped the bit of bread he had been holding, but he quickly picked it off the ground and shoved it into his mouth. The dirt didn’t even make it taste any worse. It was almost a seasoning, really.

Shouting immediately followed the sound of instruments, from both outside the camp and within it. Bandits all round the camp began to move.

“Vorscha get over here! I need you at the wall,” Herad called out of the din.

The tall woman was instantly on her feet. She grabbed the long sword that had been lying at her side and started running towards Herad’s voice.

The others were quick to follow. Men and women were rushing around everywhere but they managed to find a way through the crowds. Together, they ran over to the closest stretch of wall and peeked through the gaps in the posts. The lookout platforms were already crowded.

It was immediately obvious what had raised the alarm. Werrick’s army had started to move. As the trumpets blared, banners rose above the enemy host. A white wolf’s head flew on a black field.

There was a chorus of shouting as the lead elements of the enemy army began to march forward towards Herad’s base. The sound of the footsteps echoed off the trees. Before they got into bow range, shields were hoisted up to form a protective barrier. The attack had begun.

There could be no doubt, the Wolf himself had finally arrived.











CTW 2















The enemy shield wall drew closer. It contained hundreds of men and spanned the road from one end to the other.  The approaching formation of soldiers only ended where the edge of the forest got in the way.

“First rank, fire!” Herad yelled.

A swarm of buzzing arrows leapt into the air. They rose from all along the wall and then descended upon Werrick’s men. The sound of all the arrows hitting the enemies’ shields was almost like the patter of raindrops on a roof, only with more screaming in the background.

Unfortunately, while some of Werrick’s men did fall as arrows slipped through the gaps in their defensive barrier, most of the enemies remained unharmed. They continued marching towards the wooden barricade Herad had erected to block their way.

“Second rank, fire!” Herad yelled.

Another cloud of arrows hit the enemy, with much the same effect.

“Should we do something?” Geralhd asked Saeter as he stared at the enemy.

The hobgoblin and them were standing at the wall and peeking between the crude wooden posts that composed most of its length.

“Feel free to run out there if you want,” Saeter replied sarcastically. “I plan on staying right here unless I’m ordered to move.”

“I think-ss I should go scout something out in the woods,” Blacknail added. “Just in case the enemy attacks... somewhere else.”

The hobgoblin's guts felt a little watery as he stared at the approaching army. Standing in its way didn’t seem like a great idea.

“You’re staying right next to me,” Saeter ordered Blacknail as he turned to give him a level stare.

The hobgoblin grinned nervously back but nodded in affirmation. He would have to wait until things got more chaotic before making a break for it.

“Do you think he will want to parley?” Geralhd asked.

“Who, Werrick? What would be the point?” Saeter answered condescendingly.

“To settle his differences with Herad without getting hundreds of people killed?” the other man asked with uncertain hope.

“Ha, neither of them will give ground. They have nothing to talk about. This is a fight to the death,” Saeter replied.

“Why are we even fighting again?” Geralhd wanted to know. “I know Herad and Werrick hate each other, but how does Werrick profit from a huge fight like this? Shouldn’t he be more concerned with robbing people and other bandit activities?”

“Feelings have very little to do with this,” Saeter told the other man. “Things in the North are changing and there isn’t room for two top dogs.”

“Wait, I thought the boss was just protecting our territory from intrusion. She never said she wanted to rule over any of the other bands!” Geralhd remarked in surprise.

“You don’t know Herad very well,” Saeter explained knowingly. "Holding this patch of land and setting herself up as its ruler was always but the first step. With a firm footing here she could quickly expand all through the North.”

“That’s just great,” Geralhd remarked sarcastically before sighing deeply.

“Yep, if you can conquer more land why would you ever stop?” Blacknail exclaimed excitedly. He had always assumed that Herad was going to kill all her rivals.

“So that you don’t get killed in a stupid battle in the middle of nowhere?” Geralhd countered as he frowned at the hobgoblin.

“Everyone dies, but not everyone gets the pick of all the best loot,” Blacknail pointed out.

Geralhd sighed and looked back at the wall. He didn’t seem convinced. In the background, another volley of arrows flew into the air at Herad’s command.

“This is an enlightening conversation but perhaps we should focus on the battle that is about to be joined,” he said. “I’m still not sure what I should be doing right now.”

“If Vorscha didn’t order you to do anything then just stay back,” Saeter huffed. “You can join one of the reserve units if you want, but it’s not like you’re even properly equipped,”

Geralhd turned and gave the old scout an annoyed glare. The younger man was dressed in lighter clothes than most of the nearby bandits. Instead of armor he was wearing a long cloth shirt and a thin leather vest. Even the leather jackets Blacknail and Saeter wore offered much more protection.

“I like being able to move freely, and I don’t see you manning the walls,” he remarked dryly.

“Not my job,” Saeter countered. “I just got back from a scouting mission. I’m not a grunt.”

“I’m not a grunt either,” Geralhd replied.

“Oh, then what are you? A camp follower?” the old scout joked as he grinned with obvious amusement.

The younger man stared at Saeter coldly. It looked like he wanted to say something but he bit his tongue instead and remained silent. After a few seconds he turned to look at the approaching army.

“Why doesn’t Herad just have Mahedium blast their formation? They are all tightly packed together,” Geralhd asked to redirect the conversation.

“Do you think Werrick doesn’t know we have a mage? This entire attack could just be bait,” Saeter told him. “If Mahedium shows himself then Werrick’s own mages will bombard him with everything they have.”

“Oh, I had forgotten about them. Why is Werrick even bothering with an assault? His mages could just blast our barricade to smithereens,” Geralhd asked.

Blacknail turned to look at the wooden wall that was a mere three feet away from him. He could easily picture it exploding into a hail of deadly splinters.

“Why are we standing here?” he asked his master doubtfully. “This seems like a bad idea.”

Saeter shook his head and rolled his eyes condescendingly.

“He doesn’t want to lose his own mages,” he told Geralhd. “Herad probably has Mahedium lying in wait, ready to drop a ton of war magic on Werrick’s mages the second they try and assault our barricades. The first side to reveal its magic users is at a disadvantage in a fight like this.”

“So both Herad and Werrick are holding back in hopes of forcing the enemy to commit their mages?” Geralhd mused.

“Or whatever other tricks they have tucked away,” Saeter confirmed.

“Obviously,” Blacknail added smugly as he took several large steps away from the wall, just in case it suddenly exploded.

A squad of Herad’s men ran up beside the hobgoblin’s group. The enemy was only a few seconds from the wall now. Herad could be heard yelling for reinforcements at the gate.

Both Blacknail and Geralhd turned to look at Saeter for guidance; he was the only one who knew what was going on. However, the old scout didn’t appear to be in a hurry. He seemed content to just stand there.

There was a furious scream. Blacknail winced as he instinctively covered his head and ducked. Werrick’s men hit the wall; their formation seemed to ripple as it halted their advance.

“What are they...” Geralhd stared to ask before he was interrupted by a chopping sound.

He flinched as an axe blade hit the barrier. It was swiftly followed by many more blows as the enemy started chopping their way through the barrier. Ladders appeared from out of the mass of enemies and were thrown up against the wall.

Arrows continued to fall on Werrick’s troops but men with shields stopped most of the deadly projectiles. Several bandits near Blacknail started using spears to push ladders down or to stab through the wall at the axemen, but most of Herad’s minions didn’t seem to know what to do. They could only wait for the enemy to make their way through or over the wall.

More intense fighting was happening at the entrance to the camp. A mass of enemy troops were trying to force their way through the gap in the wall there. However, that was also where Herad had most her troops.

Both friends and foes were pressed closely together as the wall channelled Werrick’s troops towards the entrance there. Bandits hacked and slashed at each other relentlessly as they fought for space.

Herad wasn’t fighting on the front lines. She was watching and yelling orders from behind as her minions fought to push the enemy back.

Blacknail took a step back as an axe head burst through the wall near him. As a pair of bandits stepped forward to deal with it, the hobgoblin noticed the top of a ladder appear above the barricade. It began to shake as someone started to climb it.

His first instinct was to let someone else deal with the problem but then an amusing idea occurred to him. After a quick look around, Blacknail jumped onto the wall and began to climb. His claws had no problem gripping the wooden posts and they easily supported his weight.

Once he got to the top, Blacknail waited a few seconds. Soon enough, a man’s head popped up and looked around. He froze when he noticed the hobgoblin staring up at him from only few inches away.

Blacknail smiled and sliced one of the hands the man was using to cling to the ladder. His knife cut cleanly through several fingers.

The man yelped in pain and flinched backwards. His face was an agonised red and his eyes were wide with terror as Blacknail pushed over the ladder he was standing on. The hobgoblin smiled as he watched the man crash into his fellows below.

With that done, Blacknail scampered back down the wall to safety. He’d had his fun and hanging around would be dangerous.

Saeter and Geralhd were still standing in the same spot, so Blacknail walked back over to them. The hobgoblin gave his master a happy smile. Saeter just rolled his eyes.

“Unless either of you feel like joining the defense here, I see no reason to stay,” Saeter commented before turning and striding away. “I want to get a better view and right now I can’t see the forest for the trees.”

“I don’t think I’d be much help here. Lead the way,” Geralhd quickly replied as he threw a nervous glance over his shoulder at the fighting going on near the wall.

The young man then quickly hurried after the old scout. Blacknail didn’t feel the need to stick around either, so he joined them.

Saeter led the other two over to a small hill that lay closer to the camp’s entrance. The old scout stepped up onto one of the crates there and began looking around.

At the gate something was happening. The fighting slowed down as the front rank of the enemy split. A man with a chainmail shirt and a steel helmet that covered his face stepped forward.

Wielding a long sword in one hand and large round shield in the other he began cutting down all of Herad’s men within reach. The effortless way he swung his heavy weapon around seemed to indicate he was a Vessel.

The forces Herad had guarding the entrance to her camp hesitated. As the Vessel stepped forward, none of them went to meet him, instead they held back.

“Cowards, all of you!” the Vessel bellowed arrogantly. “Will none of you face me? Not even your useless bitch of a leader, Herad?”

The bandit chieftain didn’t budge. She simply glowered at the enemy without answering. After a few moments she began yelling out new orders.

“Is that Werrick?” Blacknail asked inquisitively. Maybe things were finally coming to a head!

“No, Werrick is taller than that and would never expose himself so early,” his master explained.

“Ah, Herad should just go kill that human,” Blacknail remarked as he frowned in disappointment. “He doesn’t look so tough and she’s scary strong.”

“That’s what Werrick wants, you green idiot,” Saeter countered gruffly. “What do you think will happen if Herad steps out onto the front line?”

“Er, something bad?” the hobgoblin replied uncertainly.

The old scout reached over and smacked the side of the hobgoblin’s head.

“She will be roasted like a feast day duck! Werrick will bombard her with all the magic at his disposal and that will be the end of us,” Seater explained heatedly.

“Okay, she shouldn’t do that then,” Blacknail replied sheepishly as he rubbed his sore head.

When no one appeared to challenge him, the enemy Vessel charged. His sword slammed into the neck of a bandit and then he stabbed the chest of another. He wasn’t alone either; a squad of heavily armed soldiers protected his flanks.

“I hope Werrick doesn’t have many more Vessels at his disposal,” Geralhd remarked. “We only have Herad and um... Blacknail.”

“Herad has trust issues when it comes to other Vessels, but it seems like the Wolf doesn’t,” Saeter explained.

“Except for me, because I’m so loyal and handsome. I’m the boss’ favourite!” Blacknail added cheerfully.

Herad’s minions seemed incapable of stopping the enemy Vessel's advance. As the flow of the battle turned against her, Herad yelled out a new series of orders. Suddenly, the center of the bandit formation defending the gate began to pull back.

Werrick’s men surged forward unopposed, especially the Vessel and those around him. Rather than fight him, Herad’s minions retreated.

The Vessel lunged forward to attack, but his sword smashed harmlessly into the shield of a defender. The bandits nearby all raised shields and stuck together as they fell back.

“Cowards!” the Vessel roared.

However, he didn’t chase them further. He was already too far ahead of most of his companions. Only a few of Werrick’s men had kept up with him.

The Vessel raised his shield and banged his sword hilt against it angrily, as he held his position and waited for reinforcements. Before that could happen though, Herad yelled another order and flight of arrows descended upon him.

Most the projectiles missed as the Vessel dove to the side and then raised his shield defensively. His companions weren’t all so lucky; several of them fell to the ground with bloody wounds.

However, the rest of the arrows bounced ineffectively off the Vessel’s shield and armor. For a moment, he hesitated, unsure of whether to advance or retreat.

Herad ordered another volley and the man made up his mind. He roared a challenge and charged forward. A horde of Werrick’s men raced after him towards the defenders.

The enemies stepped through the gap in the wall and into the bandits’ camp. Before they could steady themselves though, more of Herad’s troops emerged from both sides. They slammed into the attackers.

A fierce melee erupted at the entrance of the camp as the defenders attempted to encircle the Vessel and the men near him.  More attackers poured through the gate in an attempt to stop them until the fight was a chaotic mess.

In the center of it all, the sword wielding Vessel continued to batter Herad’s men around. It seemed like he would hold his ground long enough to create a hole in Herad’s defenses and allow the attackers to gain a foothold in the camp.

That was when Herad joined the fight. She drew her sword and charged towards the melee, with her bodyguards at her back. Her minions quickly got out of the way as she raced forwards.

The enemy Vessel was fighting hard to hold his ground. He bashed one of Herad’s men aside with his shield and then slashed at another. His sword battered another man’s weapon aside and it went flying.

That was when Herad attacked. The bandit chieftain dashed out from behind a group of her minions and struck. Her blade lashed out towards the enemy’s neck with viper-like speed.

He managed to step back and block the first blow but then Herad smoothly launched a barrage of lighting fast attacks. He could only stumble backwards and try to hold his shield up in front of himself.

As Herad kept the Vessel busy, two of her bodyguards charged in from the side. They were big men in dark leather armor and they held long spears, which they stabbed towards the enemy’s chest.

The Vessel had no option but to try and block this new attack, and Herasd took full advantage of this. She ducked under a swing of his sword and then slashed his groin. Crimson blood splashed onto the ground and the enemy stumbled.

Herad tripped the stunned warrior and he hit the ground with a metallic crash. She then drew a knife from a sheath on her belt. Its oddly thin blade glinted in the sun as she stabbed it down through his chainmail shirt and into his heart.

“She did it!” Geralhd observed happily.

“Of course she did. That was the easy part,” Saeter grunted in reply.

Without wasting a second or reclaiming the dirk, Herad immediately turned and started running away. Her body guards were right behind her.

From somewhere at the back of the enemy formation, several dozen feet outside the camp, a ball of energy suddenly appeared. It hung in the air and glowed with an odd green light. Then, without warning, it arced off towards where Herad had been fighting.

The crackling orb flew over the heads of fighters from both sides before hitting the ground a few feet from the fallen Vessel’s body. A second later, it exploded into green flame.

Dozens of men were thrown off their feet and the smell of burning flesh filled the air. Herad was well out of the blast zone though, and most the victims were Werrick’s own men.

From atop one of the archer platforms behind the wall, a blast of fire descended at the origin of the magic. Mahedium had revealed himself.

The scarlet flame flew towards the location of the enemy mage, only to be stopped by an invisible barrier. However, the flame didn’t completely disappear. Tongues of flire slid of the barrier and rained down on the men below. More screams of pain and horror filled the air.

Immediately, Mahedium launched another attack. This time, there was a screeching sound as a blast of energy hit the ground beneath the barrier. The earth beneath the target burst open. Jagged shards of rock flew into the air as the ground tore itself apart in a violent eruption. All the nearby troops were thrown off their feet as the earth sliced into them.

There was no way to tell if the enemy mage had been hit or not, but no more obvious magic was cast by them. Mahedium also stopped his attack. Blacknail saw the mage jump down from the platform and quickly hurry away.

More magic wasn’t necessary, though; the enemy’s advance halted. They had managed to cut their way into Herad’s camp but they had lost their Vessel and been hit by several damaging magical blasts. Herad’s troops redoubled their efforts and started to push the intruders back. The enemy’s morale had been crushed.

Someone else had noticed the attackers’ poor position as well. Trumpets called out from across the battlefield. It was the signal to retreat, and Werrick’s men began to disengage from the fighting.

The first day of fighting was over but there would be more. Off in the distance, the wolf head banner continued to fly above a still mostly intact hostile army.











CTW 3








Well, that’s all over,” Saeter remarked. “I’m going to go sit down.”

“You didn’t do anything,” Geralhd pointed out. “We just stood here and watched the battle.”

“Wrong, I was out scouting before the fight. That’s my job,” the old scout replied. “You are the only one here that didn’t do anything.”

“I fought one enemy,” Blacknail added proudly. “He won’t be climbing the wall again without-ss the fingers I cut off.”

Geralhd didn’t have anything to say that. He sighed in dissatisfaction before turning away and looking at the retreating enemy. Blacknail thought he should have been used to being useless by now.

The hobgoblin also took a second to look over the battlefield. This hadn’t been the first human battle he’d ever seen, but he had been impressed by it nonetheless. Not only had there been more fighters than he could count but the way they fought all together was overwhelming. Also, the magic was scary. What could a normal hobgoblin do against that sort of power?

Goblins would be climbing all over each other if they had been packed that tightly, and that was only if they didn’t start fighting among themselves. Even if they did stay loyal they would most likely forget which side they were supposed to be on.

Below them, Mahedium was still moving away from the wall, in case the enemy retaliated against him for his earlier magic, but he had slowed his pace. The mage noticed Saeter and the others atop the hill and headed their way.

“Can you see what’s going on from there?” Mahedium asked as he approached.

“Most of it,” Saeter grunted in reply. “The enemy is retreating.”

The old scout looked annoyed at this new interruption. He had been about to leave before Mahedium called out to him.

“That was some spectacular magic and a great improvement over your earlier works,” Geralhd congratulated the mage. “You certainly put some fear into the enemy.”

“Thank you, that means something coming from an educated man such as yourself,” Mahedium replied. “I am always striving to advance my craft.”

“I’ve seen both better and much worse,” Saeter noted objectively.

“I imagine you have, and I’ll take that as a compliment,” Mahedium replied graciously as he glanced at the old scout.

Blacknail was fairly sure his master’s words hadn’t been a compliment. Saeter didn’t give a lot of those out.

“I liked the explosions,” he commented. “You should blow people up more often; it’s hilarious. I wish I could do that!”

The hobgoblin waved one hand dramatically in the direction of the enemy and made a fake sounding explosion noise.

Everyone took a second to consider what would happen if Blacknail ever gained such an ability. Judging by the pained look on his face, Mahedium in particular found the idea unsettling.

“Anyway... do you think you got that enemy mage?” Geralhd asked Mahedium.

“I don’t know,” the mage admitted. “Things were very chaotic there at the end. He was too far away for me to see clearly.”

“Hopefully you got him. You certainly blasted everything around him beyond dust and death,” Geralhd replied happily.

“Herad’s plan was effective. I’m simply grateful that she knew what she was doing and that she obviously values me,” Mahedium commented. “If she had been less worried about my safety and had ordered me to attack first I might not have survived that fight.”

“Oh, she won’t throw away someone so useful,” Saeter agreed as he grinned unkindly at the mage.

“Ah, yes. I heard that battles where both sides have mages can be complicated and dangerous,” Geralhd interjected carefully.

“Indeed, the key to hostile exchanges between mages is twofold,” Mahedium explained. “Firstly, you have to hit hard and fast. It is easier to attack than defend. Secondly, if that fails, you need to analyze your opponent’s defenses and find a way around them. Having a multitude of attack spells is important.”

All of Mahedium’s long winded chatting didn’t interest Blacknail. He glanced away and observed the activity going on all around him. Maybe there was something interesting going on, or free food around.

There were certainly a lot of human corpses littering the ground. It was a shame that humans didn’t approve of their dead being made into snacks. Well, they didn’t taste all that good, anyway.

On the other side of the barrier that blocked the way into camp from the road, Werrick’s troops had come to stop. They were well out of bow range and had returned to their own encampment. Their camp, most of which was out of sight beyond a twist in the road and a barrier of trees, was swarming with activity. The fight might be over for now but wounds had to be tended and order had to be restored.

That was certainly what Herad was doing. The bandit chieftain was yelling orders as she stomped up and down the length of the wall.

“Let’s move, it’s windy here,” Blacknail suggested to the others as he watched her.

Standing up on the hill made them very visible, and the hobgoblin didn’t want to catch Herad’s attention. She might give him work.

“Good idea,” Saeter replied as he started down the hill.

Geralhd and Blacknail immediately followed the scout towards his campsite, but Mahedium hesitated. He remained where he was and glanced towards his cabin.

“I should really talk to Herad and then get back to my lab,” the mage announced.

“Good, you do that,” Saeter grunted as Blacknail waved goodbye.

Without further interruption, the two men and the hobgoblin walked the short distance to where Blacknail and Saeter’s tents were set up. The camp was oddly empty. No one was near the cabins or tents at the back of the clearing. Almost everyone was still over by the wall.

“Why did you follow us? I didn’t actually invite you,” Saeter asked Geralhd as he took a seat on a chair by the fire pit.

“I don’t really have anywhere else to go,” Geralhd replied as he shrugged. “Vorscha is probably busy off doing something important and I don’t want to get in the way.”

Blacknail smiled as well. It was obvious the thin human had grown used to Saeter’s grumpiness and was ignoring it. That was fine with Blacknail; he enjoyed having Geralhd around, it usually meant more food for him.

The hobgoblin and Geralhd took seats near Saeter. The old scout ignored them. He reached over to grab a large sack and began going through its contents.

“I don’t suppose you want to play some dice to help spend our time more quickly?” Geralhd asked Saeter.

“No,” Saeter grunted without turning away from the bag he was rummaging in.

“I suppose I could teach Blacknail to play...” the young man mused to himself thoughtfully as Blacknail’s ears perked up.

Before the hobgoblin could reply though, someone yelled in their direction. They all turned to see who it was and saw Varhs approaching.

The other scout was dressed in his leather armor and was wearing his forester cloak. Behind him, Scamp plodded along happily. The goblin was wearing a pair of brown human sized trousers that had been cut short and secured with rope.

“It’s good to see you all intact,” Varhs greeted them as he grinned and waved cheerfully in their direction. “Although, I never doubted for moment that you were fine, Saeter. If mere mortal blades could pierce your old hide it would have happened years ago.”

Geralhd smiled at the joke. Blacknail glared at Scamp. The little goblin had disappeared for a while during a fight with some of Werrick’s men out in the forest. Since then, the hobgoblin had been sure that he had smelled traces of him around, but he had never laid eyes on Scamp until now. Obviously, the goblin had been avoiding him.

Saeter saw the other scout, frowned, and then did a quick double-take. He glanced behind the man and seemed relieved that there was no one behind him except Scamp.

“You’re alone, right?” he asked. “That red-haired pest isn’t following you?”

“What? No, Khita had some stuff to wrap up,” Varhs remarked in surprise. “She seems to go wherever she wants.”

The younger scout looked a little troubled when he talked about Khita. He winced and pouted slightly. Maybe they had gotten into a fight, or maybe he had finally realized being around her was making him stupid.

Blacknail hoped she was dead. Khita was useless and annoying.

“As long as she isn’t here,” Saeter replied. "I see your goblin came back,”

This new comment seemed to cheer Varhs up. His frown quickly became a self-satisfied smile.

“Scamp came back the very next day,” Varhs answered. “He’s a great companion and very well trained. He just got lost in the forest for a bit after that chase.”

“Trained by me, not you,” Blacknail muttered in disgust.

Scamp was an undisciplined nuisance! Blacknail had no idea why the scout had gone out of his way to find and train a goblin. Varhs let Scamp do whatever he wanted and he had never taught the goblin how to behave.

When Scamp had caused a huge mess a while ago he had almost been executed by Herad. He had only survived because Blacknail had promised to help train him.

The hobgoblin had selflessly tried to beat some sense into Scamp in exchange for the occasional snack. However, the hobgoblin had eventually grown too busy to continue the training. The snacks hadn’t been very good either.

Blacknail had more important things to do now, like keep an eye on Elyias, his new minion. Wait... he had forgotten about Elyias.

“Oops,” Blacknail muttered to himself.

He hoped his minion hadn’t managed to get himself killed. That would be inconvenient. The man was amusing.

“So are you here for a reason, or are you just trying make a nuisance out of yourself?” Saeter asked as he scowled at the younger scout.

“I just got back from watching the forest paths,” Varhs replied. “Herad told me to check in on you and make sure you were going back out soon.”

“There are plenty of other scouts that can do that job. Why do I need to go out?” Saeter asked sourly.

“I’m not the one you need to convince. Go argue with Herad and see how that works,” Varhs replied brusquely. “I can only guess that the boss values your skills and Blacknail’s nose.”

“It is very nice looking.” Blacknail bragged happily as he wiggled his nose.

There was a chuckle from Varhs and Geralhd. Even Saeter grinned. Blacknail took this to mean that they agreed with him and that the very idea of someone disagreeing was hilarious. He was an undeniably handsome hobgoblin.

“I have some chores to finish before I head back out. I’m not leaving right away,” Saeter told Varhs as he scowled in annoyance.

“Again, it’s not me you have to worry about. I’m just the messenger,” the other scout replied with a shrug.

“Then, she should be here telling me herself,” Saeter muttered angrily.

Blacknail frowned. He was fairly certain that wasn’t how the chieftain and subordinate relationship worked. His master was getting dangerously grumpy again.

“Let’s just go out. It’s quieter out there anyway. You like the forest,” Blacknail interjected.

The hobgoblin took it upon himself to prevent any conflict between Herad and his master. Saeter was usually very wise but when it came to the chieftain he was stupider than Scamp after he had been kicked in the head a few times.

“Fine. I have some stuff to do first, though. I need a few minutes,” Saeter replied reluctantly.

While everyone else had been talking, Scamp had wandered over to Geralhd. The bandit noticed the goblin and reached into one of his pockets. A second later, he pulled out bit of dried meat.

“There you go,” Geralhd said as he handed the morsel to the little goblin.

“Traitor!” Blacknail involuntarily gasped as his mouth fell upon in shock.

Geralhd was supposed to give treats to him! Scamp didn’t deserve tasty things! Even if Scamp was behaving himself it was only because Blacknail kept him in line.

The hobgoblin was so going to give Scamp a good kicking, and the next time Geralhd needed help he was on his own! They had betrayed his trust!

“Hm, what was that, Blacknail? I bet you want a treat too,” Geralhd commented as he turned towards him.

The man then pulled something out of his pocket and tossed it to the hobgoblin. Blacknail quickly snatched the gift out of the air and studied it. Was it... candied fruit! Joy!

“Yummy, thank you!” Blacknail exclaimed happily as he shoved the treat into his mouth and began chewing.

“Of course I have something for you, my favourite hobgoblin,” Gerahld told him.

As he scoffed the treat down, the hobgoblin smirked smugly and eyed Scamp.

The goblin was staring at Blacknail, with obvious jealousy, as he chewed on his pathetic piece of meat. That cheered the hobgoblin up completely. Fine, he would forgive Geralhd and Scamp.

Scamp could keep his tiny morsel. Blacknail knew how to make dried meat himself anyway and could do it anytime. He was practically throwing the stuff out. Candied fruit was so much better than meat, just like he was superior to Scamp!

“I need to go get back a dagger I leant someone. You can wait here, Blacknail,” Saeter announced as he got to his feet.

Blacknail was too busy chewing to do more than nod as his master walked away. Geralhd invited Varhs to play a round of dice, and the scout agreed. Varhs took a seat and the pair started a game. Apparently, Geralhd had been carrying the dice in his pocket throughout the entire battle.

Instead of watching, Blacknail took advantage of the humans’ preoccupation to sneak up behind Scamp and place a hand on his shoulder. When the goblin turned around, Blacknail smiled toothily down at him.

“Hey, boss,” Scamp nervously addressed the hobgoblin.

He had flinched at Blacknail’s touch and didn’t seem happy to have his attention. That was fine with Blacknail.

“So, you’ve been getting tasty treats from Geralhd,” the hobgoblin mused aloud.

He wasn’t upset at the goblin anymore, not really, but there was a certain pecking order that had to be enforced. Blacknail was at the top.

“Have you been avoiding me?” the hobgoblin inquired with false cheer. “Maybe, because you did something bad?”

“No, boss!” Scamp whined. “I um... was looking for stuff to give you!”

“Really?” the hobgoblin replied skeptically.

“Ya, look,” the goblin said as he rummaged through the pockets of his pants.

After a few seconds of searching, the goblin withdrew a collection of small items and held them up to Blacknail. The hobgoblin studied them. He saw a few coins, some shiny rocks, a mouse skull, and a twisted bit of metal.

“Alright, fine. I believe you,” Blacknail told Scamp reluctantly, even though he knew the goblin was lying through his crooked pointy teeth.

It was just useless junk and no good to Blacknail at all, but it was the act of giving that was important. It showed who was in charge, even if the hobgoblin already had much shinier rocks than these.

“Is this everything?” Blacknail asked Scamp.

The goblin froze before looking off to the side thoughtfully and scratching his head. He seemed to remember something after a moment, because he reached back into his pockets.

“I did meet that goblin in the mage’s house,” Scamp admitted.

As he listened, Blacknail’s eyes grew wide from shock. They were organizing against him! The goblins were conspiring behind his back to overthrow him! He had to do something. The hobgoblin’s claws inched towards Scamp’s neck.

However, his murderous intent was delayed when Scamp withdrew a thin shard of black crystal. Its murky surface looked oily and seemed to shift as Blacknail stared at it in fascination.

“You haven’t been stealing from Mahedium again, have you?” the hobgoblin asked in surprise.

Stealing a crystal was what had gotten Scamp into so much trouble before. The goblin could apparently set them off, because he had been born without a limit to how annoying he could be.

“No, boss! This was given to me, to give to you, from the goblin in the mage’s house. It’s tribute from him. He said no one would be missing it,” Scamp explained in an excited burst as he hurried to clear his name.

“Or at least I think so. He doesn’t speak good; I think he’s stupid,” Scamp added as he anxiously watched the hobgoblin.

Blacknail took a second to mull this new development over. Maybe he had misjudged the goblin that Mahedium had captured. If he was willing to pay Blacknail his respects in such a way then he might not be so bad after all, even if he was a creepy little thing.

It was a rather nice looking piece of crystal, and it didn’t look like the kind that exploded. Yes, if the goblin was offering tribute then he would be allowed to stay. Organizing the goblins in Herad’s tribe would be useful...

“Fine, I accept his gift. He is now one of my minions, like-ss you,” the hobgoblin announced as he took the crystal from Scamp. “You both have to keep paying tribute, though. Just don’t steal from the mage.”

“Sure thing, boss,” the goblin replied enthusiastically. “Finding good stuff is easy. The humans forget things everywhere, and if you beg they give you stuff!”

After cursing a bad roll of the dice, Geralhd looked over at Blacknail and Scamp. Varhs was laughing in delight.

“Hmm, what are you two up too?” Geralhd asked.

“Nothing,” Blacknail hurriedly replied. “We were just... talking about candy.”

“Yum, candy!” Scamp added as he forced an awkward smile.

With a distracted frown, Geralhd turned back to his game. Blacknail uncurled his claws and let Scamp go. Good, the humans suspected nothing.










CTW 4











It only took a few minutes for Saeter to come back. After shooing Geralhd and Varhs away from his campsite, the old scout led Blacknail off into the bush again. Herad wanted them to watch the enemy and make sure they didn’t circle around, so that was what they were going to do.

The hobgoblin and his master took the path at the back of the camp and then circled around through the woods towards Werrick’s flanks. They moved stealthily through the trees. With the enemy so close, the green maze of trees that encircled them was even more dangerous than usual.

“It’s not just enemy scouts or war parties we need to worry about. All this human activity and blood will have scared away some creature but attracted others,” Saeter told Blacknail as they stopped at a lookout point.

Below the shallow rocky overhang they were standing on, they could see a large stretch of thick vegetation. Neither of them saw any movement down there, so they both moved on.

It quickly became apparent that the enemy seemed to have little interest in moving off the road. They only ran into a single scout that had ventured into the forest. They trailed him carefully for a few minutes as he circled his own camp, but he never approached Herad’s base.

Other than that one man, they only saw a few bandits that had obviously been posted as sentries. They were positioned out among the trees and around Werrick’s army to warn them of attack. All and all, the enemy seemed more concerned with Herad’s band attacking them from ambush than entering the forest themselves.

“Let’s get a closer look at their encampment before we head back,” Saeter announced.

The pair were crouched down behind a fallen tree. A gully lay before them and it wound its way through the forest toward the road. They had just watched from concealment as a pair of sentries had made their way along it and back to their camp. Many of Werrick’s men were obviously using the gully as a path because its banks were covered in muddy footprints.

“There will be people watching,” Blacknail pointed out hopefully.

“You will just have to deal with them,” Saeter replied dryly.

“Good! Sounds like fun,” Blacknail exclaimed as he grinned and rubbed his hands together gleefully.

The hobgoblin then popped out of hiding and looked around. He didn’t see or hear anything, so he crept over to the path Werrick’s men had trampled. Saeter was right behind him, and together, they headed towards the road.

It was a few minutes before they spotted any sentries. Blacknail noticed them first. A woman with short curly brown hair and a black haired man were standing next to a large rock.

Blacknail signalled to Saeter and then slid up next to a tree. He peeked out from behind it, as he observed the humans. The enemy sentries had a good view of the surroundings. It would be difficult to sneak past them without having to circle quite a distance around.

“I’ll take care of them,” Blacknail said as he stepped forward.

“No bodies,” Saeter ordered him sternly.

A sigh of disappointment escaped Blacknail’s lips. That made things more complicated, but he still had an idea that could work. Why was his master so against having fun?

The hobgoblin made sure no one was looking in his direction, before dashing over to a clump of nearby bushes. He withdrew a stone from one of his pouches and threw it towards the sentries.

The small rock arced silently over the enemies’ heads and hit the bushes on the other side of them. The resulting rustling sound drew the sentries’ attention. While they were distracted, Blacknail slipped around to the side and behind another tree.

“Huh, it was probably just a bird,” one of the sentries told the other.

While they were still looking in the opposite direction, Blacknail threw another stone. This one hit the woman in the back of the head.

“Ow, did you just hit me with a rock?” she exclaimed angrily at the man as she rubbed the back of her head.

“What, no?” he replied in surprise.

“You’re the only one here,” she pointed out as she scowled at him.

“I didn’t hit you. I have no idea what you’re talking about,” the man answered.

“Fine, forget about it,” the woman huffed as she turned back to survey the forest in front of her.

The man did likewise. A few moments later, they both happened to look away from Blacknail’s hiding spot again. The hobgoblin threw another rock. This time it hit the man in the back of the head.

“Ow, shit. You hit me!” he growled at his companion. “I told you that I didn’t touch you! Don’t fucking hit me for no reason, bitch!”

The woman stiffened and then whirled towards the man. Her face was red with anger as she shoved a finger in his face.

“I didn’t do anything to you. You’re the one that hit me!” she hissed back.

“I fucking didn’t hit you, stop lying,” the man replied as he straightened up and glared at her.

As the two stupid humans argued among themselves, Blacknail signalled for Saeter to move. The old scout swiftly made his way over to the hobgoblin undetected. Neither of the sentries so much as glanced in his direction.

Once out of sight, Saeter led the way up the hill until the forest ended abruptly at the top of it. A stretch of bushes and a shallow ditch was all that lay between them, the road, and Werrick’s army.

Carefully, Blacknail stalked over to a thick bit of brush that would conceal him. Then, he nudged a branch aside and peeked out. Saeter moved up beside him.

Werrick’s men were everywhere. Some of them were only a dozen feet away. Troops stomped around as they performed their duties. A maze of blue tents filled the road and all the clear ground around it, until they stretched out of sight. There were hundreds of them.

Saeter tapped Blacknail to get his attention and pointed out a group of wagons. Half a dozen of them stood off to one side of the camp. Next to them, a line of horses were tied up. Blacknail eyed them suspiciously for a few seconds before moving on.

The next thing he saw that stood out was a huge pavilion. Its peaked tip towered over the other tents. And it looked wide enough to hold over a dozen men.

It was common sense that the biggest and fanciest quarters belonged to the chieftain, so the tent probably belonged to Werrick. The huge wolf head banner that flapped in the wind above it was also a clue.

There was no sign of anyone that fit Werrick’s description around, though. Blacknail frowned regretfully. He had wanted to catch a glimpse of the enemy chieftain he had heard so much about.

Another tap from Saeter drew the hobgoblin’s attention. This time the old scout pointed back the way they had come, so without wasting another moment, the pair withdrew. They slipped past the still arguing sentries and headed back to Herad to report.

Before they got halfway back, Blacknail caught an unsettling scent and froze in shock. His master immediately noticed his reaction and reached for his sword, but he stopped short of drawing it.

“What is it?” Saeter asked softly.

“I smell a troll,” Blacknail answered just as quietly.

“How recent?”

The hobgoblin sniffed the air again and took a moment to mull it over. The forest was full of animal and plant smells that he had to sort.

“A few hours,” he answered.

“It was probably attracted by the blood earlier. There’s no real need to worry, but let’s hurry back,” Saeter explained.

Blacknail nodded and started moving again. There was a new urgency in both his and Saeter’s steps as they walked, and they watched the forest around them more intently.

At their quicker pace, it didn’t take them very long to make their way back to Herad’s base. After greeting their own sentries, the pair headed directly over to talk to their chieftain. Blacknail wanted to take a nap, but his master was in a hurry for some reason.

Herad was resting in her cabin after the battle. As usual, two large guards stood outside the door. They immediately recognized Saeter and greeted him.

“She knows you’re here and will be out soon,” the closer one told the old scout.

Saeter nodded in reply as Blacknail took a seat on the ground. He didn’t feel like standing; Herad might be a while. Saeter threw the hobgoblin a disapproving look but didn’t say anything.

Before too long, the door of the cabin swung open with a creak and Herad stepped out. She was wearing a loose white shirt that was obviously fresh and her dark eyes looked tired as she glanced their way.

“What is it, old man? This had better be important,” she asked crankily.

“While out scouting, I got a good look at Werrick’s camp,” Saeter explained carefully.

“Oh?” Herad remarked with obvious interest.

“He has most his supplies loaded up onto several wagons that are parked next to each other. They’re only a few dozen feet from the edge of the forest. Obviously, his lookouts are sloppy too, since Blacknail and I got so close,” Saeter told her.

“You want to hit them,” Herad finished for him.

The bandit chieftain seemed intrigued by the idea but not convinced.

“I can lead a group through the forest before it gets dark. We’ll hit the wagons and set them ablaze before high-tailing it out of there. They won’t have time to react,” Saeter explained to her.

Herad considered the old scout’s words carefully for a few moments.

“I can give you twenty or thirty men, of which only half a dozen can be woodsmen,” she told the old scout.

“That will be fine. Blacknail and I can clear the way,” he replied.

“Do you need anything else?” Herad asked him.

“It would be nice to have some magic on this raid,” Saeter suggested. “There is no better or faster way to get things burning.”

“No, I’m not risking Mahedium,” Herad replied. “It’s not worth any of the possible gains.”

“Things will be a lot slower if we have to depend on torches and fire arrows. We might lose more men,” Saeter pointed out.

“Then, that’s what will happen,” Herad told him coldly as she leveled a heavy gaze his way.

Saeter sighed but nodded in compliance. Herad relaxed a little in response to his submission and her expression softened slightly. Blacknail smiled to himself. His master was actually doing the right thing for once!

“Let’s just bring Scamp, then,” the hobgoblin mused aloud.

“What?” both Saeter and Herad replied in surprise at the same time.

They threw each other a quick glance before turning back to the hobgoblin.

“Scamp can use magic. We could just take him,” Blacknail explained.

“The goblin can set things off, that doesn’t make him a mage,” Herad replied.

“All he needs to do is make some-ss crystals explode. We can just throw him at the wagons. It worked against the snake,” Blacknail suggested to his chief.

He was careful not to challenge her in any way or give her an excuse to take offence. Herad was both very violent and quite dangerous.

“We probably don’t need to actually throw the goblin,” Saeter pointed out.

“No, but it would be more fun,” Blacknail countered.

“Don’t remind me about that,” Herad said as her eyes narrowed. “If you want to consider this Saeter, then feel free, as long as Mahedium agrees. You can run the mission your way. I don’t want to hear anything more about exploding goblins.”

“As you wish,” Saeter quickly replied.

“Exactly. Now, is there anything else you want to bother me about?” she asked him.

“No, that’s everything,” the old scout responded.

“Good. Talk to Vorscha about getting any of the gear you need. I’ll make sure she knows to give it to you,” Herad said as she dismissed them with a wave of her hand.

The bandit chieftain then turned around, opened her cabin’s door, walked through, and slammed it shut in everyone’s faces. The guards to either side of it flinched at the unexpected noise.

“Well, that went a lot better than I thought it would,” Saeter told them.

The hobgoblin and his master then started over to talk to Mahedium. It didn’t take much to convince him. He was more than willing to give them some crystals, as long as he didn’t have to go anywhere near combat.

After that, they met with Varhs. He had no problem with Scamp joining their raid as long as he came as well. That was probably for the best, and Saeter readily agreed to it.

Finally, they talked to Vorscha about rounding up the men and equipment. This wasn’t a simple or quick process so Blacknail left it to Saeter. He went to find something to eat instead.

A couple of hours later, the raid was about to begin, but Blacknail had one more task to complete beforehand. The now sated hobgoblin got up and began sniffing around. He was looking for his lost minion.

It didn’t take him long to pick up a trail. Elyias seemed to wander around the camp a lot for some reason. The hobgoblin followed his scent over to a cluster of small ramshackle buildings. Behind them, Elyias was having a conversation with three other men. It didn't look like he was having fun.

“We would like our money,” the first man said menacingly.

He was the tallest and most physically imposing of the group. His posture was both confident and aggressive, and the other two men beside him were obviously following his lead.

“Come one, fellows! It was just a few friendly games of dice!” Elyias replied nervously as he backed away. “You shouldn’t take it so seriously.”

“The money, now!” the man asked again.

His voice was cold and completely without camaraderie. Elyias grin stiffened and he paled upon hearing it.

“Just calm down, fellows. There’s an army attacking us right now! What good would money do you? You can’t spend it until we win, and then I’ll get paid and have more than enough to pay you back. There will be plenty of spoils for everyone!”

“You owe us now, not later. If you don’t have the metal then you can pay us back with labor. If we ask around I’m sure someone can find some way for you to work your debts off,” the large man replied with a dark chuckle as he gave Elyias an appraising look.

Elyias clearly found the attention uncomfortable and he gulped in fear. Sensing weakness, the large man began to reach for him, but he stopped at an unexpected noise.

“He’s busy,” Blacknail told the men as he smiled pleasantly.

His agreeable demeanor was somewhat ruined by the fact that he was standing less than a foot behind them, and they hadn’t heard him approach. All three men jumped in shock and whirled around. They flinched again when they took in the sight of the hobgoblin’s toothy grin.

“Hells, it’s the hobgoblin!” one of the men swore.

“What do we do?” another asked.

However, the leader quickly regained his composure. His look of surprise became an angry glare that he levelled at Blacknail. The hobgoblin could tell that this human considered himself to be an alpha, and that he was unlikely to back down. Joy!

“Listen, we’re going to get our money...” the man started to say, before his speech was interrupted by a high pitched squeak that whistled forth from between his own lips.

Blacknail continued smiling as he stared into the man’s wide trembling eyes. No one spoke. After a few tense moments, the hobgoblin loosened his grip on the man’s groin. His sharp claws slid free from flesh as he relaxed them slightly.

“Mine,” Blacknail explained as he pointed towards Elyias.

“Go away,” he added a second later. “Or would-ss you rather lose all the little bits of meat I can take without killing you?”

Blacknail let completely go of the man’s privates. A hasty moment later, all three men were flat out running away. The hobgoblin watched them for a second before turning to his minion.

“Ha, thanks, I guess,” Elyias told him as he smiled in relief. “That was just a small misunderstanding.”

“Come with me,” Blacknail replied as he began to walk away.

His minion frowned and bit his lip. It didn’t look like he wanted to come, but he wasn’t stupid enough to believe he had a choice either.

“What are we doing?” he asked uncertainly as he hurried after Blacknail.

“A mission,” the hobgoblin replied pleasantly.

With his minion in tow, Blacknail walked over to the corner of the camp where Saeter was preparing to leave. The old scout had over twenty men around him and they were all armed and ready for a fight. Dusk had started to fall so the nearby forest was dark and ominous.

“Why is there a greenhorn following you around?” Saeter asked the hobgoblin as he approached.

“I volunteer him for the mission. He should be in the front,” Blacknail told his master.

“Sure,” Saeter replied indifferently as he turned to face Elyias.

“Try not to die, lad,” the old scout told him before turning away.

“I will do that...” Elyias replied uncertainly.

No one was listening, though. Both Saeter and Blacknail had already otherwise preoccupied themselves. Elyias groaned and threw longing look back towards the way he had come. He stayed put, though, reluctantly.

“Where are we going?” Elyias asked as he looked around.

It took a few seconds for one of the bandits to reply.

“We’re launching an attack on the enemy,” a man with savage scar across his face answered.

Elyias paled. He looked around again and counted the nearby bandits. It didn’t take him long, although he paused for a second when he noticed Scamp sitting next to Varhs.

“By ourselves?” he asked.











CTW 5











Saeter led the raiding party out into the forest. One after the other, they slipped into the heavy shadows cast by the trees. It was too late in the day for bird song, so they moved in almost complete silence. Only the occasional sound of a snapping twig or rustle of movement could be heard. Even Scamp was perfectly quiet.

Soon, they reached the span of the forest where they had seen Werrick’s sentries. Saeter signalled for everyone to stop and then motioned Blacknail over to his side.

“You know what to do,” he told the hobgoblin.

Excitedly, Blacknail smiled and nodded in response, before spinning around and creeping away into the forest. His hunting instincts were already kicking in and urging him on. This was a game he both loved and excelled at; he was born to it.

The bushes around him were thick and dark. However, the hobgoblin had no problem seeing. His eyes shone with hunger as they pierced the shadows with ease.

Blacknail’s stalked silently towards the spot where he and Saeter had seen the sentries earlier. There was no light or noise to indicate anyone was nearby, but Blacknail could smell their scent on the wind and feel the presence of prey in his bones.

Yes, there they were. Two humans were standing next to the same stone as before. They were hidden by the shadows, but Blacknail knew where to look. Closer inspection revealed that it wasn’t the same two people as before. Their builds were different. However, these new lookouts weren’t any better at their jobs than the last ones.

Against a human enemy, they probably would have been able to raise an alarm long before being detected, but against a hobgoblin they were outmatched. Blacknail easily circled around until he was in their blind spots, and then he began to creep their way through the bushes. The darkness was his ally, not theirs. They were only human.

A few moments later, Blacknail’s thin cloaked form stood only a few feet behind the sentries, and they were none the wiser. This delighted the hobgoblin and he had to suppress a grim chuckle.

The pair of humans in front of Blacknail stared off into the darkness as he observed them. The only sound they made was of gentle relaxed breathing; the hobgoblin made none at all.

Suddenly, one of the sentries started to turn around. Before he could finish, Blacknail was beside him, his dagger drawn. The unseen blade lashed out through the night air and tore open the unlucky sentry’s throat.

As the first man fell with a faint gagging noise, the second reacted. He spun around, only to see nothing but his comrade’s body and an empty black forest. His mouth opened to raise the alarm, and Blacknail’s knife slid in under his ribs. The hobgoblin had dashed in under the man’s vision and gotten behind him unseen.

With his task done, Blacknail took a second to hum a happy little tune while he cleaned his daggers. He hadn’t even needed to burn any of the Elixir he had taken a few minutes ago. When his blades were clean, the hobgoblin headed back to his master to report in. He had done such a good job!

After whistling the prearranged bird call to announce his arrival, Blacknail walked out of the shadows. Everyone looked his way as he approached, but they didn’t otherwise react.

In the middle of the group, Elyias was looking very nervous. The young man was glancing fretfully about and seemed ready to bolt. The dark forest that lay in every direction and loomed above clearly unnerved him.

“Are you done?” Saeter asked in a whisper.

“Yep, all done,” Blacknail replied smugly.

“Then, let’s get going,” Saeter said as he motioned the group forward again. “We don’t have time to waste.”

The party of bandits immediately headed past the fallen sentries and towards the road. Soon, the flickering light of campfires could be seen ahead of them through the trees. The raiding party stopped at the very edge of the forest.

Saeter gazed out at the scene before them as his subordinates drew their weapons. Out on the road, Werrick’s troops had started to tuck in for the night. The tents were all still there but there wasn’t nearly as much movement as before.

Only a few shadowy figures were walking about. Others could be seen around campfires, but most seemed to have gone to sleep in their tents. The wagons the raid was targeting were still in the same place as well. They lay only a few rows of tents away, but getting to them wouldn’t be easy.

There were lots of lookouts, of course. A fair number of armed guards had been posted to watch the trees. They stood with the fires of the camp behind them so they didn’t lose their night vision. It also made them great targets.

If that wasn’t bad enough, the road was too close to the forest for them to have a very good view. With the sentries in the forest already gone, they would only have a few seconds of warning and that was it. Blacknail could do a lot with a few seconds.

“We make for the wagons there,” Saeter told everyone as they huddled near him in the gloom. “Archers will take out as many lookouts as possible and then we will charge. Varhs, make sure Scamp throws his stones well away from allies. The rest of you should sow chaos, set things aflame, and then retreat back this way.”

There were nods and everyone readied themselves. Elyias raised his hand as if to ask a question, but Saeter stared him down until he sheepishly lowered it. Then, the old scout signalled, and everyone sprang into action.

A dozen cloaked archers stepped out of the bushes and let loose a volley of arrows. The nearby lookouts went down before any one of them could raise the alarm. Immediately, the rest of Saeter’s men burst out of the forest and dashed towards the wagons.

Now, some of Werrick’s bandits began to notice that something abnormal was going on. Cries of surprise rose into the air as men lurched to their feet. However, the fastest members of the raiding party, including Blacknail, had already reached the closest campfires.

The hobgoblin slashed at a startled man that was trying to back away from him. His blade caught the man’s arm and sliced deeply into it. Even as the man was falling, the hobgoblin was already running past. There was much to do and it had to be done fast.

Similar scenes played out nearby. Werrick’s men had been caught off guard, and they were being cut down before they had a chance to organize or even draw their weapons.

Well, almost all of them. One squad of half a dozen men seemed to appear out of nowhere. They were armored and they drew their blades as they charged towards the raiders.

Varhs saw them coming. He quickly passed something to Scamp and pointed towards them. The goblin then tossed the object at the charging enemy. It flickered with orange light as it sailed through the air, before exploding with a thunderous bang. The enemy was violently blasted backwards and scattered.

Blacknail raced past tents as he closed in on the wagons. That was when he encountered the first bit of resistance. A pair of enemies ran out of the darkness to cut him off. Both of them already had their swords out and up in defensive guards.

Instead of slowing, Blacknail sped up. He grinned excitedly as he burned Elixir and felt its effects wash through him. It tingled as it boosted his body.

The hobgoblin’s move caught the enemy off guard. Before they could react, he had already batted one sword aside and flanked his opponents. The closest man was off balance, so Blacknail stabbed at his chest. With his Elixir-driven strength, the hobgoblin’s blow punched through the armor and into the soft flesh beneath.

That left one defender still alive. Blacknail quickly kicked his victim’s chest so that he could tug his sword out of it easier. It came loose with a loud sucking noise and the man’s body flopped over backwards.

The other defender lunged forwards past his comrade’s body to strike at Blacknail, but the hobgoblin was too fast for him. Blacknail stepped back out of the way and then dodged another strike by jumping to the side.

Before the defender could try for a third blow, Blacknail launched a series of attacks. The lightning fast slashes pushed the man back until the last caught him in the shoulder.

The hobgoblin’s foe screamed in pain and dropped his blade. His voice was silenced a second later when Blacknail’s sword cut deep into his neck.

That was when several of Blacknail’s comrades reached him. Without slowing, they raced past him towards the wagons. Two of them had stopped to light torches, and they hurled them into the back of the wagons. The contents of the carts almost instantly burst into flame.

As the fire spread, it frightened the horses that had been tied up nearby. The beasts began to scream harshly and stomp around in a panic. It was music to Blacknail’s long pointy ears.

The hobgoblin grinned madly as he grabbed a flaming piece of woods and threw it towards them. He hoped the vicious beasts burned! This was great!

By then, the wagons were completely ablaze. Flames roared above them and crackled madly, illuminating the camp for hundreds of feet. The sound of both human and animal screams filled the night, and Blacknail basked in it all.

Energy was surging through him in incredible amounts. He was truly alive. The goblin took a moment to let out a loud hysterical laugh, as another explosion went off somewhere behind him. He was having so much fun! It was incredible.

“Everyone, back!” Saeter roared from somewhere nearby.

Blacknail leapt to obey his master, mostly. Instead of heading straight back the way he had come, the hobgoblin took a slight detour. He picked up a flaming torch someone had dropped, and dashed into a thick cluster of tents.

The cloaked hobgoblin ran through the camp, dragging fire and death behind him. He pressed the torch against the fabric of the tents as he moved, setting them ablaze. Whenever someone lurched into his path he cut them down mercilessly. They seemed to move in slow motion when compared to his Elixir-boosted hobgoblin speed.

Werrick’s men started running away from Blacknail instead of trying to face him. The hobgoblin laughed in vicious delight as panicked men and women fled before him through the darkness. The raging fires that surrounded him blinded as much as they illuminated.

His blade reflected the flames as he cut a fleeing man down, and he laughed harder as joy overtook him. The sound off his high pitched voice rose above the flames. Its eerie cadence sounded nothing at all like a human’s.

The rows of tents eventually came to end though, and Blacknail found himself standing not too far from the edge of the forest. He threw a quick look back at the chaos behind him, and then dashed forward into the bushes and shadows with a smug smile on his lips.

Once back in the forest, he could hear people running through it in front of him. It was probably Saeter and the others so he headed their way. It didn’t take him long to catch up.

Most of the raiding party, including Varhs and Scamp, seemed have made it out safely. Saeter was leading the group. As Blacknail approached, the old scout turned to him.

“Is anyone following us?” he asked the hobgoblin.

Blacknail took a second to listen before replying. He could still hear shouting and mayhem from Werrick’s camp and someone in the forest behind them stumbling around. He focused on the closer sound and recognized a familiar terrified mumbling.

“Just a straggler,” the hobgoblin told his master. “I’ll go get him!”

Before Saeter could reply Blacknail was already dashing off into the trees.

“Oh, gods! I’m going to die here, all alone in this accursed dark forest. I can’t see anything!” Elyias whimpered as he staggered around in the dark.

The young bandit clearly had no idea where he was going. He had been stumbling around in circles.

“You’re fine; I’m here,” Blacknail announced as he stepped out of the shadows.

Instead of being comforted, the hobgoblin’s voice startled Elyias and he sucked down a breath to let loose a scream. Before he could though, Blacknail kicked him in the stomach. The young man coughed and gagged as the impact knocked the wind from him.

“Don’t do that, silly,” Blacknail explained cheerfully. “You need to be quiet. Now, come with me.”

As Elyias tried to right himself, the hobgoblin patted him reassuringly on the shoulder.

“You’ll do better next time,” Blacknail said as he began dragging him away towards the others.

Elyias seemed too stunned to resist, so it didn’t take them long to catch up. Most the humans were having trouble moving in the dark and this slowed them down. Night had truly fallen now and there was little light to see by. The slow pace meant it took them a while to get back to Herad’s base.

Eventually though, they did slip in through a side entrance and make it back to safety. They were greeted quite jovially by the guards, although Blacknail got a few uneasy glances.

Elyias took the opportunity to collapse up against the wall. He sat on the ground and began rocking back and forth as he muttered softly to himself. He was such a funny human! Blacknail really looked forward to bringing him on the next mission.

Herad showed up before the rest of the raiding party had a chance to sit down and relax. Vorscha and Red Dog were also walking at their boss’ side. All of them had excited grins on their faces, even if Herad’s was a lot more bloodthirsty than the others.

“You can see the flames from here!” Herad bragged haughtily. “I bet this knocks the wind out of Werrick’s sails.”

“The wind also carried the screams and laughter here,” one of the guards remarked. “Hearing that probably sent shivers down more than a few spines. I know it scared the crap out of me.”

There were a few murmurs of agreement and looks directed towards Blacknail. This made the hobgoblin feel quite good about himself. He was feared!

“We got the job done,” Saeter told his chief. “The wagons were destroyed and we did more than a little damage besides that.”

“Did you get the information I wanted?” Herad asked him.

“Yes, the chaos gave me enough time to find someone to ask some pointed questions,” Saeter replied. “I’ll give you the full report later.”

Herad nodded her acceptance as her eyes glinted excitedly. She obviously wanted to hear his report but she was being uncharacteristically patient about it.

“They should have cut back the forest,” Vorscha commented as she shook her head in disapproval. “Camping next to it is just asking to be taken by surprise.”

“Ha, these are bandits, not a real army. I’m surprised Werrick has managed to get them as organized as they are,” Red Dog replied scornfully.

“Well, they might make it a priority now,” Vorscha mused.

“Only if Werrick doesn’t pack up and leave,” Red Dog countered. “That light you see over the trees is their main supply cache going up in smoke. They will probably start running out of food before too long, and it’s going to be hard to get more all the way out here safely.”

“Not to mention, their morale has to be down in the drags. They have no reason to believe we can’t pull this off every night,” Vorscha added.

“We probably can,” Saeter said. “I wouldn’t want to strike them quite so hard, but we could certainly hit them around the edges and see what gets knocked loose.”

As the others were talking, Herad’s grin widened. The bandit chieftain looked positively delighted. It was more than a little unsettling.

“Werrick can’t afford to retreat,” she told her minions. “But this is still a huge blow against him. I bet the rude bastard is fuming and cursing himself sick right now.”

“I think I deserve a treat, great mistress,” Blacknail interjected hopefully when his chieftain was finished speaking.

He had been very useful, and all the killing and setting things on fire had made him more than a little peckish. Also, everyone was smiling so this was probably a good time to ask.

“You deserves many more than just one,” Herad replied as he placed a hand on the hobgoblin’s shoulder.

Blacknail’s eyes widened from shock and he shuddered slightly. The chieftain was touching him! It was terrifying! What should he do?

“I’ll have someone whip you all up a feast,” Herad told the raiding party.

She then withdrew her hand from Blacknail’s shoulder, which made him feel a lot better. All the nearby bandits smiled and several of them cheered. More than a few conversations broke out as people began bragging and talking among themselves.

The hobgoblin slipped away while the others were busy. The humans were being too chatty for him, and he wanted to get some space. They almost never discussed things that interested him. He’d come back when the food was ready.

Blacknail shivered as he walked. The hot remnants of battle lust were still working their way through his system. He still felt the urge to run and fight in his muscles.

As a gust of wind blew by, Blacknail wandered off towards the wall. He picked out an empty expanse and began to climb it. Once perched atop the barrier of stakes, he stared out into the darkness.

The road before him was dark and empty for quite a distance until it reached Werrick’s camp. The flames there illuminated the tree tops on either side of the road as they swayed in the wind.

Only a few of the fires Blacknail and his tribe had set were still burning, and they were reduced in size. There were quite a few campfires to see by, though. Blacknail could see the small shadowy figures of people moving everywhere. Werrick’s camp was still a hive of frantic human activity.

Blacknail watched them scurry about for a while. He kind of wanted to go back and hunt a few more of them, but that would be a terrible idea. It had gotten too dark for even him to see properly and going out alone was dangerous.

No, he would just have to wait until tomorrow.













CTW 6














Cries of alarm woke Blacknail from his slumber. He could hear people yelling excitedly outside his tent. It was probably nothing, though. Humans were prone to meaningless fear and could get themselves worked up over nothing.

When the noise failed to fade away, the hobgoblin groaned and threw his blankets off. He then stuck his head out of the entrance of his tent and looked around. It took a moment to clear the sleep from his eyes by blinking.

Outside, it was so early in the morning that it was still dark out. The tip of the sun was barely visible on the horizon and the trees blocked most of its light.

With a dissatisfied hiss, Blacknail turned to look at his surroundings. What could possibly be going on so early in the morning? If there wasn’t a good reason for all this commotion then Blacknail was going to track down the person responsible and make his displeasure known.

It didn’t seem like a false alarm, though. All around Herad’s base there was an unusually high amount of activity. The bandit chieftain’s minions were all running around with far more enthusiasm than they usually mustered this early in the day.

“To arms, the enemy is coming!” someone of in the distance yelled.

Another annoyed hiss escaped Blacknail’s lips as he realized what was going on. He had a feeling this wasn’t going to be one of his favourite days. Any morning that started hours before breakfast was bound to be terrible.

There was a rustle from the nearby tent where his master slept, and then Saeter stepped out. The old scout was only partly dressed, but he was already quickly slipping the rest of his clothes on.

“Come on, what are you waiting for? Let’s go,” he ordered the hobgoblin.

Blacknail grunted sourly in reply before disappearing back inside his tent. After making sure his shirt wasn’t on backwards again, he quickly dressed himself and stepped outside.

“This is bloody annoying. Why is the enemy attacking so early?” Blacknail grumbled aloud as he strode over to his master.

“They probably wanted to move before we could catch them napping, like last night,” Saeter replied.

This made sense to Blacknail. The enemy should fear his awesome martial prowess. They would be fools not to. In this case though, it would have been nice if they had feared him a little less so that he could get a good night’s sleep.

The pair headed off to talk to the nearest group of bandits so that they could figure out was going on. However, before they got halfway there someone called out to them.

“Saeter and Blacknail, over here!” Vorscha yelled as she waved and stomped towards them.

The muscular woman looked both aggravated and distracted. She had Khita trailing behind her, and the redhead looked excited. Saeter kept walking forward as if he hadn’t heard anyone call out his name, so Blacknail poked him in the shoulder and pointed their way.

When she saw Saeter looking in her direction, Vorscha turned to make sure Khita was still behind her and then starting dragging her over to them.

“I need you to watch this ruffian,” the warrior woman told them when they got close.

Neither Blacknail nor Saeter thought much of this. Both of them scowled in distaste.

“I can take care of myself,” an affronted Khita declared.

Vorscha simply rolled her eyes and pushed her towards Saeter. The much smaller woman stumbled but managed to catch herself.

“If that’s an order then I guess I have no choice. More importantly, what’s going on?” the old scout asked Vorscha.

“Werrick’s men are marching towards the wall, right now. It looks like he’s really throwing everything he’s got into the assault this time. I think your raid last night really pissed him off,” Vorscha explained.

“You should have told me about that sneak attack! I would have gone with you,” Khita exclaimed angrily.

Blacknail wouldn’t have minded taking Khita along for the raid. Unfortunately, if he had invited her then he would have also taken the blame when she got herself killed. A much more subtle way of getting rid of the annoying pest was required.

“I just got up. What are the plans for the defense?” Saeter asked.

“We were up late burning important things,” Blacknail added grumpily.

“I don’t have time to fill you in. I really need to get back to the gate before the fighting starts,” Vorscha explained. “If you’re looking for a place to be then you should just do what you did last time, hang back and reinforce any spots that look stressed.”

“Sounds like fun,” Blacknail replied. It also sounded easy and like a great way to keep an eye out for good looting opportunities.

“Which, conveniently enough, will allow us to keep Khita back away from most the danger,” Saeter remarked dryly.

Vorscha leveled a heavy glare at Saeter. Beside her, Khita’s face was red with anger and her fists were clenched tightly. She looked like she wanted to punch someone. Blacknail took a small step away from her.

“Are you complaining about something? Do you want to join the front line or something?” Vorscha asked the old scout.

“No, it sounds like a great plan,” Saeter replied as he shrugged indifferently. “I was just thinking aloud.”

Off to the side, Blacknail threw Khita a speculative look. Was it possible that Khita’s uselessness was actually proving useful, right now? No, he must be misunderstanding something.

Suddenly, there was a loud twang as a volley of arrows tore through the air. The enemy had entered within bowshot. Vorscha flinched at the noise and turned to Saeter.

“Then shut up, old man,” Vorscha growled at him with uncharacteristic vehemence.

Everyone took a step back from her in surprise. Even Saeter had been caught off guard by her temper.

“I need to go,” she told them. “But before I do, I have one last thing to say. Blacknail, I’m holding you responsible for Khita. Watch her like a hawk or I’ll gut you like fish.”

With that said, Vorscha turned and began hurrying over towards the entrance to the camp and the break in the wall there. No one said anything for a moment, but off in the distance the now familiar sound of an army marching could be heard.

“Fine, follow me,” Saeter told his two companions.

The old scout led the way off towards the same hill they had watched the battle from before. Still somewhat off balance, Khita and Blacknail followed him silently.

Before they could get to their destination, a wave of hot air slammed into them as the sound of splintering wood filled their ears. Something had exploded.

Blacknail ducked low to regain his balance. He shielded his head as he turned to look in the direction the blast had come from. There was a huge gaping hole in the wall between him and Werrick’s army.

Flames danced around the edges of the new opening. The nearby bandits who had been near the wall had been thrown aside and scattered. Some of them were picking themselves off their feet, while others weren’t so lucky. Shrapnel from the explosion had crippled and killed.

“Well, all hells and damnation. I think we found a spot that looks stressed and needs reinforcing,” Saeter remarked sourly as he surveyed the damage.

There was a lot of damage to survey. A dozen men could have stepped through the gaping hole that had been blown in the wooden barrier protecting the camp.

“Fucking magic,” Blacknail muttered. He hated mages when they weren’t on his side. It didn’t seem fair.

“Wow, that doesn’t seem fair,” Khita remarked in an awed tone as she gazed at the blast zone.

Blacknail turned to glare at the redhead. She wasn’t allowed to agree with him. It made him seem dumb...

“Very little is fair about war,” Saeter remarked dryly. “What I want to know is why Mahedium isn’t firing back.”

“He’s over there,” Blacknail pointed out.

The other two turned in the direction the hobgoblin indicated. They could clearly see Mahedium running over to the wall from his workshop. The mage was carrying a long staff as he moved at a hurried pace.

“That’s another reason they struck so early,” Saeter commented. “Werrick knew Mahedium couldn’t always be on guard. He’s not nearly as dumb as Herad likes to say he is.”

Before the mage reached his destination, the sound of shouting intensified and there was a series of metallic screeches. The enemy had reached the wall and battle had been joined again.

A wave of enemy bandits was fighting their way towards the front entrance. A large mass of Herad’s troops were blocking their way and pushing them back. Another large group was headed towards the hole the enemy mage had blown in the wall.

Herad’s troops there were still recovering and badly outnumbered. Only a few of them fought back when the front rank of enemy bandits reached the break and began trying to force their way inside the camp.

“We need to help out,” Saeter said as he quickly pulled his bow from off his back. “They can’t be allowed to get a foothold inside.”

The old scout then quickly nocked an arrow, aimed, and let it loose. The arrow took flight and slammed into the chest of a bandit that had just stepped up to attack one of Herad’s troops that was trying to defend the gap in the wall.

Blacknail was already running after the arrow. He pulled out a vial and downed it, as he dashed down the hill. It took him only a few seconds to run past all of Herad’s nearby minions and reach the fighting.

The invigorating rush of Elixir being burned washed through him as he drew his blade. It came free with a quiet hiss, and the hobgoblin immediately aimed its silver edge at the nearest enemy.

There was no point in holding back. The hobgoblin wasn’t going to dive into a melee full of armed humans without taking every advantage he could get. Humans might be dumb and slow but there were also big and tough.

Around Blacknail, about a dozen disorganized bandits were desperately trying to block what seemed to be hundreds of enemies from slipping through the break in the wall before them. Their resistance seemed pointless.

Then, the hobgoblin’s blade cut down the first attacker. Everyone barely had time to register his presence before Blacknail moved on to a second. Relying on pure Elixir driven speed, he slipped around the attackers and cut them down, one after the other. Half a dozen of them fell before they could react to this new unexpected threat.

When they did realize what was happening, the enemy recoiled in fear and shouts of surprise escaped their lips.

“Gods’ sweet mercy, it’s a monster,” someone shrieked in terror.

Blacknail grinned as their sweet fear made his heart flutter in joy, and then he launched himself forward again with renewed energy. Instinct guided Blacknail as he attacked his enemies’ weak points. A familiar bloodlust rose within him and drove him forward.

His blade sliced through soft flesh as he easily sidestepped a counterattack. However, for every one of Werrick’s men he killed another soon took its place. The mass of attacking enemies didn’t seem to be shrinking at all.

Suddenly, the enemy stopped coming. They lined up just out of reach, and Blacknail had to stop himself from leaping forward after them. Fury and hunger burned within him. He wanted to fight!

As he warily watched the enemy, Blacknail took a careful step back. An enemy officer screamed something, and then the entire enemy line marched forward together. Now there was no space between them that Blackail could use or slip through. They was just a solid mass of furious looking humans bearing down on him.

“Shit,” one of Blacknail’s nearby allies swore.

“Double shit,” the hobgoblin added in agreement. His blood-lust was swiftly giving ground to his love of running away from danger.

The enemy approached, and Blacknail took a moment to glance over his shoulder. Herad’s forces were still greatly outnumbered; there were only a little more than ten of them still standing. These weren’t odds the hobgoblin liked.

Saeter and Khita were off to one side. They had apparently followed after Blacknail without him noticing. Both of them had swords in their hands and looked tired from fighting.

The front rank of the enemy reached the wall. Instead of fighting them, Herad’s scattered forces retreated backwards, giving the enemy a foothold inside the camp. Even Blacknail didn’t like the idea of trying to fight that many humans back to back. Running would probably be a better option, especially if he could get his master away but leave Khita behind.

“Don’t let those rutting bastards take a single step forward!” a familiar voice suddenly yelled.

Everyone turned to see dozens of bandits charging towards the fight, with Vorscha leading them. The warrior woman had taken the time to get armored up. She had a steel breastplate and was wearing a chainmail shirt underneath that. A long sword was raised above her head as she ran past Blacknail and joined the defense.

Right behind her ran the other bandits, including Geralhd. The laid back man had finally bothered to throw on some real armor as well. There was a steel cap on his head that looked somewhat ridiculous over his long hair. However, he used the short sword in his hands skillfully.

The defenders were invigorated by the reinforcements. They threw themselves alongside Vorcha in an attempt to push the enemy back out of the camp. Overextended and flanked, Werrick’s troops were quickly forced back.

The entire time, Vorscha was in the middle of the fighting. She wielded her long sword with skill and power as she urged her troops on.

“Push the damned bastards all the way back. Don’t leave a single one alive!” she yelled as she cut an enemy down.

There was a ragged cheer from her comrades in response and they pressed forward. Even Blacknail found himself rejoining the fighting. The urge to join up and fight alongside Vorscha’s counterstrike was just too great to resist.

Soon, the enemy was in full retreat and Vorscha had secured the break in the wall. Once her troops had formed up to block further entry by Werrick’s men, she turned to look back the way she had come.

A pair of horses was pulling one of the supply wagons towards her. Vorscha saw it and motioned towards the drivers.

“Get that bloody thing in the gap, right fucking now!” Vorscha yelled in their direction.

The drivers nodded and jumped off the wagon. Then, they quickly unharnessed the horses and led them aside, as Vorscha led a small team over to the cart.

As the defenders of the wall jumped aside, the bandits pushed the wagon into the break and swung it around. The wooden sides of the wagon filled most the space even if there were gaps.

Almost immediately, enemy troops attempted to scale it or slip around it. They were quickly fought off by the reinforcements Vorscha had brought with her. The warrior woman backed away from the fighting and turned to Saeter.

“That’s one crisis averted, for now. I wish I could say that was going to be the last,” she told the old scout.

“How are things going at the gate?” Saeter asked her as he sheathed his sword.

“We’re holding,” Vorscha replied. “For now, I can’t say much more than that.”

“Things aren’t going badly but not great either,” Geralhd added as he wandered over.

Vorscha’s lover was smiling cockily as he flashily flourished his blade. Blacknail wasn’t sure why Geralhd was so proud. The man had fought alongside everyone else but he hadn’t really distinguished himself.

“It’s still early in the day. Werrick might be trying to wear us down with his superior numbers,” Vorscha explained. “That damn opening magic barrage of his widened the battle line and has forced us to commit most our reserve already.”

Suddenly, before anyone could respond to that, a chorus of blaring trumpets split the air. It was almost immediately followed by the steady beating of drums. The energetic refrain was clearly coming from near the front gate.

Everyone turned to look that way. However, the press of bodies around the gate was too thick. All they could see was the back of Herad’s forces.

“Damnation, what in all the hells is going on now?” Vorscha cursed loudly.

This terrible view didn’t satisfy Blacknail. He immediately dashed towards the wall to get a higher position. He wanted to see what was going on. Instead of climbing to the top, where he would be an easy target for every enemy with a bow, he hung below the apex and peeked over.

Hundreds of enemy soldiers were trying to push forward through the gap in the wall where the camp’s front entrance was. However, there wasn’t nearly enough space for them to attack all at the same time so Herad’s forces were holding them off.

Above the fighting floated the wolf head banner and it was steadily moving closer to the front line. Right below the symbol a small group of people were positioned. The enemy soldiers moved out of their way and gave them space as they advanced towards the front.

One tall figure stood out from all the others and strode confidently forward through the ranks. He was dressed in heavy armor made of overlapping steel bands and he wore a steel helmet shaped like a wolf’s head. A thick mane of grey hair jutted out from the back of the helmet and cascade down the man’s back.

The large armored warrior could only be Werrick. The Wolf had finally shown himself and was now personally leading his forces in an all or nothing assault. A shiver of fear seemed to run through the ranks of Herad’s outlaws as they recognized him.










CTW 7







Don’t just hang there, you green idiot! Tell us what you see!” Saeter ordered the hobgoblin.

Blacknail suppressed his irritation at being addressed so rudely, and then began to explain what was happening to the others. A force led by Werrick himself was headed straight towards the gate Herad was trying to defend.

None of his companions seemed to think this was good news. Nervousness and fear was plain on their faces. Their reactions surprised the hobgoblin. A battle between chiefs sounded exciting to him!

“Showing himself now makes no bloody sense!” Vorscha cursed aloud. “He’s got the advantage in numbers so he should be wearing us down, not leading a charge.”

Without warning, a sizzling ball of flame burst into existence and shot towards the group of people beneath the wolf banner. Mahedium had revealed himself in a display of fiery power.

Before the flaming orb could reach its target, a lanky figure beside Werrick raised a hand. A shimmering wall of force sprang into existence and smashed into the fireball. The flames were battered aside before disintegrating into a brilliant rain of sparks. The shower of tiny lights fell over the battlefield without any noticeable effect.

Werrick’s advance continued unimpeded. The huge armoured figure reached the frontline, and his troops cheered as they stepped aside for him. The sound of bandits screaming in exhilaration filled the air and drowned out everything else.

“The Wolf has come! Forward to victory!” they roared excitedly as they redoubled their attack on Herad’s camp.

Their annoying voices hurt Blacknail’s sensitive ears. Now he really wanted to kill them, if only to shut them up. Also, their cheer was stupid.

“We need to get closer,” Saeter exclaimed in frustration as he looked around.

There was a small lookout platform around halfway down the wall in Herad’s direction. There was no way to get through the press of bodies at the front lines so Saeter headed over to it. Vorscha and Geralhd were quick to follow.

Blacknail gave them all a head start before racing ahead. They were just humans so he was much faster than them. He barely had to try.

“Down now,” Vorscha ordered the archers in the tower. “We need to see what’s going on.”

After they quickly climbed down to obey her, Saeter made his way up the rickety ladder. It was little more than a bunch of branches tied together by rope, and the platform itself was little better.

Vorscha and Geralhd followed him one after the other. There was only room for about three people on the crude wooden platform, so Blacknail simply climbed up the wall again.

From their new vantage point they saw Werrick and his elite join the melee. His banner flapped loudly in the wind overhead as the Wolf wadded into combat. The huge warrior had a shield in one hand and a long sword in the other. His heavy steel armor and ornate helmet shaped like a wolf’s head made him easy to pick out of the crowd.

With seemingly unstoppable momentum, Werrick began to cut down Herad’s forces. They broke before him like the tide hitting a rock, as his blade cleaved and knocked them aside. None of her men so much as slowed him down and they began to fall back away from him in fear.

The tide of battle swiftly changed and the attackers began steadily gaining ground. Herad didn’t take this challenge lying down. She screamed out a series of orders from where she stood at the back of the battle.

Instantly, her bodyguards and Mahedium rushed to her side. With the bandit chieftain at the lead, they formed a solid wedge that moved to intercept Werrick’s advance.

“Why aren’t the mages calling up any magic?” Geralhd asked as he squinted in Mahedium’s direction and leaned over a wooden rail.

“They’re too close for that now,” Vorscha cursed. “I doubt our comrades would appreciate Mahedium dropping a ball of fire on their heads while they are fighting.”

“They also need to keep their defenses ready in case of surprise attacks,” Saeter added. “That close to the melee they need to be careful, and the first thing on a mage’s mind is always their own safety.”

As Blacknail’s group watched, the two bandit chieftains quickly converged on each other. Without needing to be told, fighters from both sides moved out of the way and gave them space. Soon, only a few feet separated the two parties. They stared ferociously at each other as they converged.

The fury of all the nearby combatants ebbed slightly as they noticed what was about to take place among them. Everyone knew that if Herad and Werrick fought the outcome would determine the course of the battle. Even if they were fighting for their life no one wanted to miss this.

“Shit, she's going to fight him herself!” Saeter swore. “I need to get over there.”

Before he could take more than a single step, Vorscha placed a hand on his shoulder to restrain him. He stopped and glared at her. The wrinkles around his eyes seemed deeper than usual.

“There’s nothing you can do. You’ll never cross the field safely and what could you even accomplish if you did? You’re just going to have to trust the boss. She knows what she is doing,” Vorscha told him.

“Damnation,” Saeter cursed in reply. “I should be there, but I never guessed this would happen.”

The old scout didn’t make another move to climb down the lookout platform. He gazed towards the center of the battle and bit his bottom lip nervously. Geralhd and Vorscha also looked worried as Herad came face to face with her nemesis.

Blacknail didn’t know what to think. The mood of his human friends bothered him but he couldn’t see Herad losing. She was the most dangerous and ruthless human he had ever met! He doubted Werrick could beat her in a stabbing contest.

“So you’ve decided to show yourself at last, coward,” Herad yelled as she snarled in Werrick’s direction.

The other man didn’t immediately reply. There was quiet lull as he gazed in her direction. His steel helm hid his face and concealed what he was thinking.

Both bandit chieftains stood just out of striking range with their raised weapons in front of them. Violence could erupt without warning any second.

“I have nothing to fear from the likes of you,” Werrick eventually announced in reply.

His voice was deep and serene, without the smallest hint of fear or worry. Like Herad, he had a natural commanding presence. Both bandit chiefs were still in a way that suggested restrained power. As people fought and died around them, they remained motionless and sized each other up.

Herad moved first. She lunged forwards and the quiet that had overtaken the field ended. Werrick blocked her blade with a casual raise of his own, but before he could counterattack Herad had already slipped out of his range.

The bodyguards and companions of the band leaders rushed forward to support their bosses. They encircled their chiefs as they fought each other but they didn’t get too close.  A bubble of space developed around the fighting Vessels that everyone else avoided.

Beyond the bodyguards, the other bandits were still fighting. Screams of pain and rage filled the air as violence was done and lives were ended.

As the masses fought around them, Herad and Werrick dueled. Under his heavy armor, Werrick moved slower than his opponent. Herad ducked in and out of his range while launching a series of feints.

However, the larger man easily kept her away from his vital points by holding his shield high and with the occasional lazy swing of his sword. He might have been slower but his fluid movements betrayed no lack of skill.

Again and again the pair of Vessels crossed blades. They moved with super human speed and their ferocity was unrelenting. Herad seemed unable to hurt Werrick but the advance of his troops had come to a complete halt.

From off to the side, a pair of wrestling bandits suddenly stumbled between the two chieftains. They were too preoccupied with fighting and too off balance to stay out of the way.

Herad saw them coming, lunged to the side, and kicked the closer man’s back. This sent them both careening straight towards Werrick. With a mighty swing of his shield, the Wolf battered them out of his way. There was a crunching sound as they hit the ground and rolled. Neither of them got up.

Herad took advantage of this momentary distraction to dash in from the other side and strike. Werrick’s blade slashed through the air to block her advance, but she ducked under it and stabbed towards his armpit.

The tip of Herad’s sword accelerated towards a gap between two steel plates under Werrick’s arm. All Werrick could do was take a frantic step back and turn away from the blow, but it was enough. Instead of hitting flesh, the blade impacted steel and slid away without drawing blood.

The heavy shield on Werrick’s other arm then swung around, and Herad had to dodge back out of the way. The two combatants separated and watched each other warily. Neither of them dropped their guard, and their respective bodyguards stepped forward to protect them.

“You can’t defeat me like this. You aren’t my equal, Black Snake,” Werrick shouted haughtily her way.

“This isn’t a duel, cur,” Herad replied scornfully. “I don’t need to beat you in a fancy fencing match.”

As she finished speaking, the bandit chieftain raised a hand above her head and signalled someone. Immediately, two volleys of arrows rose into the air.

Two groups of a dozen archers had stepped out of hiding from both sides of the entrance. The swarms of projectiles flew over all the fighting bandits’ heads and descended upon Werrick’s party from opposite directions.

Only one arrow shot towards Werrick though, and he easily blocked it with his shield. A few more ripped through the banner that one of the Wolf’s men was holding aloft, but most the buzzing projectiles were aimed at the nearby mage.

“See, the boss has a plan,” Vorscha observed with more than little relief.

No one answered her. They were fixated on the events unfolding before them.

The mage hurriedly raised an amulet. A rippling wave of force smashed into all the arrows coming at him from one direction and smashed them harmlessly aside. He quickly turned to block the ones from the other side as well, but he was a little too late.

His second blast hit the other flight of arrows and battered some of them away, but a lot of them had been too close to be affected properly. Two of the mage’s bodyguards fell as arrows pierced their bodies, but the others raised shields and blocked the rest of the projectiles.

“Ha,” the staff wielding mage laughed triumphantly. He was completely unharmed.

“That could have gone better,” Geralhd remarked unhappily.

That was when a lance of yellow energy slammed into the enemy mage from the front and hurled him off his feet. The men all around him were knocked aside as well; their bodies spasmed for several seconds on the ground before going still.

Mahedium stood off to the side of Herad. The staff in his hands was still glowing faintly yellow.  Several of Herad’s bodyguards surrounded him, and had been keeping the fighting safely away from him.

As Mahedium slowly leveled the staff in Werrick’s direction, Herad began to laugh triumphantly. She pointed her blade towards Werrick as a mocking grin appeared on her lips.

“Victory is mine, you arrogant son of a whore!” she laughed. “I’m going to enjoy destroying you.”

The enemy chieftain took a step backwards. It was hard to see under his armor, but Werrick looked tense and anxious. He glanced back and forth between Herad and Mahedium, as the troops behind him froze in fear. They knew that the tide of battle had just made a sudden and dramatic turn against them.

“She’s got him!” Vorscha exclaimed breathlessly from the lookout platform. “We’ve got this in the bag!”

“It... definitely seems like it,” Saeter observed skeptically next to her. As usual, the old scout refused to give in to optimism or the equally repugnant feeling of happiness.

“There’s no way even a Vessel could dodge war magic at that range,” Geralhd remarked. “Vorscha’s right, we’ve won. Werrick is finished.”

“Mahedium may have him cornered but I won’t be counting the Wolf down until he’s actually dead,” Saeter replied. “If he escapes then he can just come back with a new mage and reinforcements.”

The fighting between both sides didn’t stop but it slowed a little as people noticed what had happened. Blacknail smirked from his perch atop the wall. He had known that Herad was going to win. She always did. That was why she was the chief!

Leisurely, Mahedium strolled forward. Everyone except for his guards backed away from him. Without the other mage around to check his power Mahedium was free to let loose against anyone that threatened him, and he had already demonstrated the lethal power he had at his disposal.

The mage kept his staff leveled directly at Werrick and its tip crackled with yellow energy. He avoided getting too close to anyone else as he moved towards the enemy leader.

“Are you going to try and run?” Herad taunted her opponent. “You might be able to make it.”

A wide exhilarant grin was plastered across her face. It made her seem almost mad, or at least madder than usual. Her dark eyes blazed with excitement as she watched her cornered enemy.

“I don’t think that would accomplish anything,” Werrick replied tonelessly as he gazed at Mahedium.

“Take that helmet off,” Herad commanded him. “I want to see your face.”

Werrick hesitated for a second, and then removed his steel helm. He tossed it aside and it rolled across the ground. His face was stern looking but handsome. The grey mane had been part his wolf helmet but he had fairly long brown hair of his own. He looked neither particularly young nor all that old.

There was a defiant glint in his eyes as he met Herad’s glare. She noticed it but it just made her chuckle. She liked breaking peoples' pride.

From his perch on the wall, Blacknail studied Werrick. He frowned as he realized the man didn’t seem all that scared. The hobgoblin considered himself an expert on human behaviour, especially their fears, and this man was too calm. Despite himself, Blacknail was intimidated and he didn’t like that at all.

“Ha, for years you’ve claimed to be the biggest and baddest bandit in all the North. Now look at you!” Herad gloated. “In the end you fell right into my trap!”

“Trap?” Werrick asked skeptically. “You were simply fortunate enough to take out my mage, and I’m not defeated yet.”

“As you made your way here I tested your forces several times and interrogated a few captives,” Herad explained smugly. “I quickly learned that you only had two mages with you, and during your first attack on these walls my mage defeated one of yours.”

“That’s far from any sort of grand strategy. It’s just basic intelligence,” Werrick remarked with noteworthy calm.

Blacknail studied the enemy leader closely and licked his lips uncertainly. He knew his humans, they were simple creatures at their core, and he sensed that something was off about this one. What was it?

“I knew that you would eventually have no choice but to join the attack yourself, and that you would need to bring your mage,” Herad explained smugly. “I knew that without him guarding your back you would be an easy target, and I was right. Here we are.”

“That’s certainly sounds like something a second-rate backstreet thug like you would come up with,” Werrick replied coldly. “It’s as cowardly as it is simple.”

“Petty insult will do you no good, Wolfy. Everything that was yours is about to become mine! I want you to reflect on that before I kill you,” Herad gloated.

“You have no idea what I possess, Black Snake. It’s truly sad that you think that killing me would elevate yourself,” Werrick replied. “You are as blind and ignorant as always, a mindless killer with delusions of greatness. You aren’t worthy of walking in my shadow.”

“We will see about that,” Herad replied angrily.

“Enough useless talk. Are you just going to stand there or am I going to have to make you use that thing?” Werrick asked as he turned towards Mahedium and levelled his sword at the mage.

“As you wish,” Mahedium remarked coolly as the energy around his staff grew more violent.

The air was thick with tension as everyone waited to see what was about to happen. Werrick didn’t flinch as Mahedium moved.

The mage then swung his staff around and blasted the guards behind himself. They went down as yellow energy arced between them.

“What?” Herad gasped as her eyes went wide with shock.

She froze in surprise, which gave Mahedium more than enough time to point his staff in her direction. She tried to dodge to the side as Mahedium unleashed a bolt of magic in her direction, but it clipped her side.

A cry of pain and complete disbelief escaped Herad’s lips as the energy hit her. A tremor worked its way through her body and then she collapsed bonelessly onto the ground. She didn’t get back up.

Werrick laughed. There was a mocking tone to it as his deep booming voice echoed out over the battlefield.









CTW 8










There were gasps of horror from the people on the platform near Blacknail. It was swiftly followed by swearing and action.

“King’s blood! What just happened?” Geralhd whispered.

“He’s turned traitor!” Saeter roared. “That fucking bastard, I’m going to kill him!”

The old scout immediately dropped and began climbing down the ladder. His movements shocked his nearby companions out of their own paralysis.

“What do you plan on doing?” Vorscha asked him in alarm. “You’ll never get there in time.”

“I’m going to do whatever I have to!” Saeter spat back as he jumped down the final length of the ladder and started running.

Vorscha threw out a few more colorful curses and then turned to Blacknail. The hobgoblin was still in shock. What was going on? Was his glorious leader dead? This didn’t make sense!

“Don’t just hang there! Go watch his back!” Vorscha ordered Blacknail.

It took a moment for her words to penetrate the haze of uncertainty that had filled the hobgoblin’s mind. However, when her meaning became clear he quickly nodded, dropped down onto the ground, and started running.

His master was headed towards the fighting all by himself. That was dangerous! Blacknail needed to go after him. Why was his master always doing such dumb things? Why did he always follow him?

There was a mob of tightly packed enemies and allies between Saeter and Herad’s fallen form. Blacknail couldn’t even see her anymore from ground level. However, he could still see Werrick. He was much taller than most other humans.

Most of Herad’s fighters hadn’t seen her fall, and even if they had they were still stuck in the melee. Blacknail caught up with Saeter before he reached the fighting.

“What are you-ss doing?” Blacknail asked the old scout. “Do you have a plan?”

His master barely registered the hobgoblin’s presence. He spared Blacknail a brief glance before facing forward again.

“I’m going to get Herad out of there!” Saeter growled as he ran.

A wave of exasperation and anguish hit Blacknail and caused him to groan. That was a terrible plan! What did his master think he was doing?

“We should wait for help or find somebody else to do it,” Blacknail told his master. “Red Dog must be around here somewhere. This sound-ss like something he should do.”

Unfortunately, the hobgoblin got no reply. Blacknail seriously considered clubbing his master over the head and dragging him away. That was probably unnecessary though, because the way forward was blocked by a wall of their allies. There was no way Saeter would be able to press through it and into the center of the melee where Herad was.

Up ahead, Werrick was talking to Mahedium as he walked over to the mage. He then made a sweeping hand gesture in the direction of the thickest fighting.

With a nod of acceptance, Mahedium turned and began shooting bolts of magic at those of Herad’s minions that were still fighting. The battle quickly started turning against them as the yellow blasts of crackling energy thinned their ranks.

There were cries of despair as the force of bandits protecting the camp’s gate collapsed. Their leader was down and they had no protection from Mahedium’s magic. Overcome with fear and hopelessness, the remaining defenders broke.

Large groups of bandits turned to run. Werrick’s troops roared in triumph and eagerly gave chase. Many of Herad’s men were slain as they exposed their backs to enemy.

Other more organized squads of defenders held themselves together. Some of these tried to keep fighting and were swiftly surrounded and cut down as their allies deserted them. A few lucky larger groups managed to hold their attackers back and to start a fighting retreat.

The battle at the gates swiftly degenerated into a dozen smaller fights as Herad’s forces fled deeper into camp. It was into this mess that Saeter dove. Blacknail groaned again and then quickly followed him. The dissolution of the battle and the resulting chaos was allowing Saeter to advance.

There was very little organized resistance to Saeter’s dash into enemy lines, much to Blacknail’s annoyance. Why was no one stopping them? Even if the fighting had moved on, there were still more than a few scattered enemies around.

Well, it wasn’t like Herad or Werrick’s minions wore uniforms, and most of the enemies were confused by the fact Saeter and Blacknail were running towards them instead of away. Others were more concerned with settling grudges or looting than with the new arrivals.

A few enemies did try to intercept Saeter, but Blacknail leapt ahead and cut them down without mercy. The hobgoblin was adept at taking advantage of chaos, and he still had a lot of Elixir burning through his system.

As Blacknail’s blade gutted a man wearing particularly shoddy armor, Saeter ran ahead. They were only a few dozen feet from Herad now, and well out of what was left of the fighting. Those groups of bandits still resisting Werrick had already retreated into deeper into camp.

However, before the old scout could reach his destination, Mahedium turned and noticed him. The mage was standing guard over Herad’s prone form. The fallen bandit chieftain’s chest rose and fell as she drew breath and her fingers were twitching. She was still alive!

“Oh, it’s you two. I was wondering when you would show up,” the mage remarked as he leveled his staff in their direction.

“Die you traitorous filth!” Saeter spat in reply as he lunged forward with his blade held high.

A frown appeared on Mahedium’s lip as yellow energy once again burst out from his staff and slammed into Saeter. The old scout stumbled and collapsed. The sight of his master falling enraged Blacknail. Mahedium would pay for this! He would feast on the man’s eyes!

With an angry hiss and a new burst of speed, Blacknail managed to dodge to the side of a blast aimed his way. He rolled across the ground for a second before jumping to his feet and leaping at his magic wielding opponent.

“Hmm, you’re frighteningly fast,” the mage remarked as he grabbed an amulet on his chest.

When he touched the amulet, an invisible wall of air slammed into Blacknail. It whipped up clouds of dust as it raced across the ground and its impact threw the hobgoblin backwards. He soared quite a distance through air before smashing into a pile of crates.

There was a loud crash. Pain ripped through the hobgoblin’s back and his ribs felt like every single one of them had cracked. He whimpered, and his jaw started hurting.

Even though he was having trouble even breathing, Blacknail fought off the pain and tried to pick himself off the ground. Fury and adrenaline rose within him to drown out all other concerns.

This wasn’t the time to be sitting around! He had to save his master and the chief! He was Blacknail! It would take more than a treacherous mage and a big fat human Vessel to defeat him! He was an invincible killer and they would taste his blade!

The hobgoblin hissed furiously and stood back up. He shook his head to clear it and tried to think up a plan. He was good at sneaking so maybe he could get behind Mahedium and...

That was when a beam of energy slammed into the hobgoblin. Instantly, Blacknail lost all control over his body and began convulsing. His spasming limbs sent crates flying and snagged a tarp. By the time the convulsions stopped he was back on the ground and thoroughly wrapped up in the tough fabric.

Exhausted, Blacknail groaned in pain. Every muscle in his body was aflame and all his joints felt out of place. He phased in and out of consciousness for a few seconds as he tried to figure out what had just happened. He remembered it was bad.

Blacknail opened his eyes, which hurt in ways he hadn’t thought possible, and saw his master lying on the ground a fair distance away. There were several unfamiliar and unfriendly looking bandits standing around Saeter. The hobgoblin tried to reach out in his direction but his hands wouldn’t move.

“Just the man I was looking for!” a tall armored man announced as he walked over the fallen scout. “You’re right on time to see me kill Herad.”

It was Werrick. The enemy leader smiled broadly as he looked down at the old scout. Behind him, corpses littered the battlefield and the shattered remains of the camp’s walls loomed.

Saeter was laid out on the ground where he had fallen after being hit by Mahdium’s magic. He slowly turned his head to glare at Werrick. No one had touched him but he still seemed incapable of making large movements.

A dozen of Werrick’s troops surrounded him as he looked down at the old scout. There wasn’t a friendly face in sight, unless you counted some of the corpses that littered the ground. A lot of bandits had died in the fight at the gates.

“I’ve been wanting to talk to you for a while, White Raven,” Werrick told Saeter.

“Go fuck a pig,” Saeter spat vehemently in return. He was apparently able to talk now.

The old scout sounded winded and like he was in pain. As he wheezed, the man he had insulted grinned in amusement.

“I suppose I deserve that,” Werrick admitted. “I did just have you blasted by magic. It looks like it hurts a lot.”

“It’s only a brief stunning effect. There is no lasting harm done,” Mahedium interjected in explanation. “But it certainly keeps people down long enough for more permanent solutions to be achieved, although both Vessels and mages resist it. The length varies but Herad won’t be up for...”

With a wave of his hand, Werrick silenced the rambling mage. The victorious bandit chieftain then turned back to Saeter.

“Your old leader has been defeated and will soon meet her end at my hand. I’m willing to show you mercy if you pledge your allegiance to me, and I will also to extend that kindness to others you choose,” Werrick told him. “I’ve always been an admirer of yours and having the White Raven under my command would be useful.”

“No,” Saeter replied as he glared defiantly at his capture.

“I see I’m going to have to strengthen my argument,” Werrick mused.

With an exasperated sigh, the bandit leader turned and strode over to Herad. She was still breathing but appeared to be unconscious.

“I don’t suppose your offer extends to her?” Saeter asked scornfully.

There were hints of fear and concern concealed behind his veneer of contempt, though. The old scout’s stubborn resolve seemed to grow weaker as Werrick got closer to Herad.

“No, she’s too stupid to ever learn her place. Honestly, I don’t know why you would even ask. Look at her,” Werrick replied contemptuously.

When he reached her, the large man gave her a solid kick to the ribs. She flinched as the pain of the blow woke her up and then again when she saw the man looming over her.

“What?” Herad gasped as she tried to sit up.

“It’s rather simple actually. You’re the one that fell into my trap, not the other way around,” Werrick explained. “I’ve defeated your pathetic band and now I just need to deal with you.”

Herad coughed and looked around. Sometime after she had fallen, someone had stripped her weapons from her. Her sword was gone and after checking her clothes she didn’t find any daggers. Her actions didn’t seem to concern Werrick. He just watched her and made no move.

“I made a deal with your mage. He agreed to switch sides if I presented him with a perfect opportunity,” Werrick continued as he held his arms out wide to emphasise his surroundings. “And here we are. You led him right to me and set yourself up.”

“You fucking faithless coward. I hope demons drag you down to the deepest hells beyond the sight of the gods,” Herad cursed Mahedium as she glared at him.

The mage just shrugged without concern. He didn’t seem insulted.

“I simply did what was in my best interest. Just like when I first joined up with your band,” Mahedium explained without remorse. “Werrick has resources and connections that you would never be able to give me. Everything I do is to advance my work, and the Broken Wheel knows the true value of my knowledge and skills. There’s absolutely no reason for me to stay in your dirty little camp anymore.”

“Can you really blame him for betraying you? Just look at the mess you’ve made of things, and how pathetic your strategy was,” Werrick remarked. “Luring me forward? Again? Really? That was how you dealt with the Vessel I sent to test you.”

“So what are you waiting for? Kill me, you coward,” Herad growled as she collected herself.

Her cloak was torn and her leather armor was covered in dirt and grime. Her fall had even smeared dust over her face. She looked tired and defeated, although her eyes still burned with anger.

“I’m the coward? You’re the one that tried to use magic to subdue me! I simply turned your own ploy against you,” Werrick replied dismissively.

Herad opened her mouth to reply but then she finally noticed Saeter. Her eyes flickered with recognition and she hesitated.

“What are you doing here?” she asked in surprise.

“I came to see your victory parade. It could use some work,” Saeter replied sarcastically.

“And I’m currently trying to recruit him,” Werrick added in a smug taunting tone.

“I hope you’re both very happy together,” Herad remarked bitterly as anger flashed in her eyes.

“I haven’t decided on anything yet, although it’s definitely sounding like a better idea all of a sudden,” Saeter shot back.

As the pair glared at each other Werrick looked momentarily taken aback. It took him a moment to come up with something to say.

“He’s far less likely to run into obvious traps under me,” Werrick rebuked Herad. “Did you really think I would charge into your base unprepared? How pathetic of you.”

Herad glared furiously at her opponent as Werrick continued his speech.

“I suppose I’m being uncharitable,” he told her. “It’s not like you’re anything more than a petty bandit. I knew exactly what you were thinking every step of the way. I timed my attack so that you would have no chance to question your strategy or come up with a new one.”

“Enough with the pompous bragging, you bloody ass. Why am I still alive?” Herad asked. “I’d rather be dead than listen to you expel such rot.”

“You’re here because I don’t fear you in the slightest. You’re beneath me and I want there to be no misunderstandings about that left in your head, or those of your minions, when you die,” Werrick answered as he smiled.

Just as he finished speaking, a new group of enemies appeared and walked his way. There were four soldiers and they were escorting a nervous looking Red Dog. The bandit lieutenant had been disarmed and there was a gash above his eye that was bleeding. His face was inscrutable as he took in the scene before him.

When they got to Werrick, one of the men kicked the back of one of Red Dog’s knees. With a huff, the bandit lieutenant landed on his knees kneeling position.

“He surrendered himself as soon as he learned you wanted to talk to him,” one of the guards told their master.

Werrick nodded and then motioned for the newcomers to step back.

“What do you want from me?” Red Dog tentatively asked. His voice was full of fear but it was also edged with hope.

“While most the bandits you find in the North are nothing more than deserters and riffraff too incompetent or stupid to stay in the army there are a few exceptions. It would be a waste to kill such men when they could be of use to me,” Werrick told him.

“So you want me to join up with you?” Red Dog inquired optimistically.

“Perhaps,” Werrick replied. “First, there will be a demonstration, and then I shall test your loyalty.”

As everyone warily watched him, the tall Vessel gestured and one of his minions tossed him a sheathed sword. Herad flinched as her enemy drew the blade, but instead of attacking her he tossed it onto the ground and then took several large steps backward.

“What in all the hells are you doing?” she asked him.

“Proving a point. Pick up the sword and let’s have another fight. You can even have a few minutes to rest if you want. It doesn’t matter; you’re no threat to me and you never were,” Werrick replied as he drew his own blade.

Herad hesitantly reached out to pick up the blade and then climbed to her feet. When Werrick didn’t react, she quickly brushed her black hair from her face and then raised the sword defensively.

A ring of enemy soldiers surrounded her and Werrick. Saeter and Red Dog were dragged out of the way by some of them so that there would be enough room for the fight. Neither of them was allowed to stand and an armed guard stood behind them.

Nothing happened for a few seconds. Herad seemed to be taking her time to collect herself.

Then, Herad lunged. Her eyes blazed with hate and she snarled as she slashed at her opponent’s head. However, Werrick wasn’t caught off guard. He parried her attack, and his front foot kicked out to catch Herad’s leg. As she stumbled, Werrick’s sword came around and stabbed her in the stomach.

“No!” Saeter gasped.

Herad’s eyes went wide with shock as she collapsed forward onto her knees. She landed in a kneeling position with her forehead against the ground. There was a savage wound on her back to match the one on her front, and both of them bleed profusely. Werrick’s blade had gone right through her.

A moment later, the bleeding stopped and thick black scales appeared. They sealed the wound and replaced her torn armor. However, Herad groaned in pain and drew a wheezing breath. Her face was still pressed against the dirt. Her internal injuries hadn’t disappeared; they had only been patched over.

“That’s a convenient power but it’s not going to save you this time,” Werrick remarked as he raised his blade again.

“You damned butcher!” Saeter cursed him.

“It was a fair fight, or close enough,” the Vessel remarked with a shrug.

He then kicked Herad’s blade from her hands. She barely reacted, except to hiss in pain and pull her hands in close to her chest. A second later, she coughed and splotches of blood hit the ground.

There was an unexpected clang, as Werrick dropped the blade he was holding next to Herad. Red Dog and Saeter stared at it uncomprehendingly.

“Now you have both seen me defeat Herad both in terms of strategy and in personal combat. I am clearly the better master for you to serve,” Werrick told his captives.

Red Dog glanced at Herad’s fallen form and winced. He then turned to the enemy leader.

“I’ll take you up on your offer. I see no point in dying here,” Red Dog said.

“It’s not quite that simple. First you must prove yourself,” Werrick replied. “Pick up that sword and finish off your old boss. Only when her corpse lies before me will you be allowed to serve.”

There was silence for several long seconds as his word sank in.

“And if we refuse to bloody our hands and darken our souls on your behalf?” Saeter asked.

“Then you and everyone else in this band will die,” Werrick answered.










CTW 9











Saeter didn’t say anything for several long moments. He just stared at Herad. She was still stooped over in the dirt. Her breathing was laboured and she didn't seem aware of what was going on.

“No, I won’t do it. She was my leader and she had my loyalty,” he eventually told Werrick. “I’m too old and tired to throw everything away again. I’ve done that too many times already.”

The enemy bandit chieftain stood in front of Saeter. The old scout was still sitting on the ground and Werrick’s huge presence loomed over him.

“Are you sure about that? If you don’t join me then I will kill every last member of this band. Surely there are some among them that you wish to see saved?” Werrick asked. “You may choose a few to keep as your subordinates.”

Saeter frowned in concern and wrinkles formed under his eyes. He looked unsure of himself as the Wolf continued his speech.

“There is the goblin you took in for instance. I saw your loyal pet at your side but a few moments ago. Mahedium may have swatted him aside but he still lives,” Werrick said as he pointed towards where Blacknail lay. “If you refuse me then I will have no choice but to kill him as well.”

There was another moment of silence as Saeter glanced in Blacknail’s direction. His face was blank and it was impossible to guess what he was thinking.

“If self interest isn’t enough then perhaps you need a cause to call your own?” Werrick inquired. “Join me and I shall create a new kingdom, greater than all the others! Together we will usher in a new age where men’s actions count for more than their blood!”

“You’re nothing but the puppet of a gaggle of corrupt Southern merchants. I know you work for the Broken Wheel Company,” Saeter accused the bandit chieftain.

“I don’t work for anyone. The Broken Wheel’s backing is simply convenient, for now. When they try to undermine me I will be ready,” Werrick replied. “I am the one using them.”

“That’s what every pawn and tool ever born believes,” Saeter replied. He wasn’t convinced.

“Join me and see for yourself.” Werrick countered. “The White Raven fought for Northern independence and was the first bandit chief in the North. I intend to be the last. I shall raise a new kingdom up in these untamed lands, one greater than all the others. We dream of the same thing, old man. I fight for what you fought for.”

“You expect me to believe that when you revel in torture and misery?” Saeter accused Werrick. “You obviously don’t fight for anyone but yourself and your own sick enjoyment.”

“I am never cruel without a reason,” Werrick replied evenly. “We both know Herad did far worse than this to others. Her minions killed, raped, and robbed their way across the North. Countless lives were destroyed by her actions and you supported her. Don’t pretend you’re better than this.”

“Oh, then why did you set up this sick show?” Saeter asked. His voice seethed with anger.

“Firstly, to show you that she wasn’t worth your loyalty,” Werrick explained. “Here in the North, it is natural for the strong to rule the weak, and I am far stronger than her. I’m simply making this clear to you.”

“That doesn’t explain why you are making us finish her off,” Saeter countered.

“That’s simply so I know if you can be trusted,” Werrick replied. “If you refuse to strike down your old leader I know you remain loyal to her and will work against me. If you do finish her off then you will be just as responsible for her death as I am. I find it this is an effective test of character.”

Saeter had been slouching but after hearing Werrick’s words he straightened up and met the man’s eyes.

“No, I refuse. You’re going to have to kill me. I’ve done enough evil for one lifetime and this is a line I refuse to cross,” the old scout announced with determination.

Werrick frowned and turned to Red Dog.

“Well, what about you then?” he asked the other captive.

“I’ll do it,” the other man answered with a voice full of reluctance and guilt.

Slowly, the bandit lieutenant got up and reached out for the fallen sword. He picked it up and then froze. For several seconds he stared down at Herad and bit his lip.

Werrick waited patiently. Even though he was unarmed and within Red Dog’s striking distance he didn’t seem concerned. There was an aura of self-confidence around the bandit lord that weighed on his surroundings. It was hard to imagine things not going his way.

“I’ll be doing her a favour at this point,” Red Dog muttered to himself.

“You’ll be saving your own skin by betraying her,” Saeter rebuked him.

“He promised to spare some of my men as well. They’re more important than one woman who is already dead, even if she used to be the boss,” Red Dog shot back. “It’s not like she would risk herself for us anyway. She’s always been a selfish bitch.”

The bandit lieutenant took a step towards Herad and raised the sword up above his head. His old boss didn’t respond. She appeared to have lost consciousness.

“Stop!” Saeter suddenly ordered Red Dog.

As his captures watched, the old scout rose to his feet. Red Dog froze as Saeter reached out and took the sword from his hands.

“What are you doing?” Werrick asked.

“Let me do it. I’ll be the one to take her life,” Saeter answered him. “I just need to tell her something first.”

One of Werrick’s eyebrows rose as a surprised look appeared on his face, but he didn’t say anything.

“Goodbye, Herad. You’ve always been an arrogant snake without a shred of decency and look at where it has led you,” Saeter told his fallen chief. “You should have taken your ill-gotten riches and retired.”

The old scout then stuck the blade he had taken from Red Dog into the earth and knelt at her side. He placed a hand on her shoulder and shook her slightly. She turned to look in his direction. Her face was clouded by pain and hate but she was conscious.

Saeter leaned in close and whispered something to her. It was too quiet for anyone to overhear, but as he spoke a weight seemed to disappear from his shoulders.

“Fuck you, old man,” Herad coughed in reply as she glared at him.

A few seconds later she coughed again and rolled onto her back. Her eyes were clenched shut and her face was tight with suffering. Stony faced, the old scout drew a dagger from his side. A moment later, he stabbed Herad up under her rips and then pulled the blade back out.

As everyone watched, the defeated bandit chieftain let out a deep breath and went still. All the fatigue and anxiety disappeared from her bearing as she died. Saeter placed a hand on her face and muttered a quick prayer.

“There, she’s dead,” the old scout said as he turned back towards his captures and pulled the sword he had sheathed in the ground out.

There was a frown on Werrick’s face as he examined the old scout and Herad’s corpse. He then turned towards Red Dog.

“You still need to do your part. The bitch is already dead or dying so you’d better get your blow in quickly,” he told the other man.

“Right,” Red Dog acknowledged nervously.

The bandit lieutenant reached out and gestured for Saeter to hand him the sword.  The old scout nodded, stepped forward, and ran Red Dog through with the blade.

“What?” he croaked in disbelief as he looked Saeter in the eyes.

“I never really liked you, coward,” Saeter explained as he quickly pulled the blade out and spun towards Werrick.

The ranger brought his sword around and viciously stabbed at the bandit chief’s chest. Werrick was caught off guard and a look of shock appeared on his face. He was able to jerk his body to the side and dodge the blow, though.

Instantly, his guards drew their own weapons and readied themselves to take Saeter down. They had the old scout completely surrounded. However, before they could act, Werick raised a hand and stopped them.

“No, I’ll do this myself,” he told his guards.

Saeter slashed at him again, but Werrick easily stepped back out of the way. There was a disappointed look on Werrick’s face as he glared at the old scout.  The Vessel dashed to the side and one of his men passed him a sword. He started to say something but another attack by Saeter forced him to stop and concentrate on blocking the blow.

Before Saeter could strike again, Werrick took the offensive. There was a slick metallic noise as Werrick pushed Saeter back and their swords slid against each other. The Vessel’s inhuman strength knocked the scout back and he stumbled. Immediately, Werrick followed up with a slash that slammed into Saeter’s side.

“Damnation,” Saeter cursed as he fell.

Blood poured from a great gash in his side as he collapsed onto his back. However, a smug grimace appeared on his lips as he lay there. It was clearly a fatal wound but the old scout didn’t seem afraid or angry.

“What was the point of that? Why were you loyal to her?” Werrick asked. “She didn’t deserve it and I had hoped for more from you.”

If Saeter was capable of mustering a reply he didn’t have time. There was a distant bang and a thick column of black smoke rose into the air. Everyone turned to look at this new distraction.

“That came from my lab!” Mahedium shouted in alarm.

“I left specific orders that no one was to enter that building,” Werrick replied with obvious frustration at being interrupted.

“I need to go see what has happened. The materials and papers there are irreplaceable!” the mage whined.

“Then go see what happened,” Werrick told him coldly. “You’re not needed here.”

The bandit chieftain then ordered several of his men to accompany the mage. With his escort in tow, Mahedium hurried over towards the explosion and whatever remained of his lab.

A rustling sound from nearby woke Blacknail from his stunned stupor and reminded him that he had his own problems. Was one of his enemies finally coming to finish him off?

Shock and confusion had overwhelmed the hobgoblin. His head was numb and hazy, and thinking about the events he had just seen unfold caused pain to stab through his mind.

Nonetheless, his self preservation instinct was strong. He wasn’t about to lie down and die. He could figure things out later. Right now, he just had to live. There was no way his master was really dead. He could still be saved somehow...

Blacknail quietly began to struggle to rise to his feet. As he moved he glanced towards the direction of the noise and saw a familiar face.

Khita was leaning around the corner of nearest building. Her eyes narrowed as she spotted Blacknail and she raised a finger to her lips to signal silence. Blacknail stared at her blankly as she skulked over to his side. What did she want? He didn’t have time for her.

“I’m here to help,” the young redhead explained as she pulled out a knife and began cutting him free from the tarp he was tangled up in.

When that was done, Khita grabbed his shoulder and pulled him up. With Blacknail leaning on her shoulder, she started walking back over to the building. She was leading him away from his master but Blacknail couldn’t muster up the will to resist. His everything still ached.

No one noticed their escape; none of Werrick’s minions glanced in their direction. Half of them had gone with Mahedium so that only half a dozen remained, and they were all looking at the pillar of smoke that was winding its way up into the sky in the opposite direction.

Khita hurriedly led Blacknail around the corner of the building she had come from. When they got there, Blacknail was surprised to see several members of his tribe hiding out of sight among a scattering of barrels and other equipment.

Vorscha stood out in front of the others. Behind her was Geralhd and around a half dozen other bandits. Oddly enough, Scamp was cowering behind Geralhd’s legs but there was no sign of Varhs.

“Here he is. I told you I could do it!” Khita exclaimed happily as Vorscha reached out to take Blacknail from her.

“And I told you not to try! You could have been killed!” the large woman hissed in reply.

“But she succeeded, and we need to worry about our next move now,” Geralhd interjected. “You can drum her down later. The explosion won’t keep them distracted forever and the Wolf’s men are everywhere.”

“There’s no chance of getting Saeter?” Vorscha asked Khita with obvious concern.

“No, Werrick’s right on top of him and he’s been badly wounded,” Khita explained.

“Then we need to leave. We’ve already overstayed our welcome. I was hoping to grab Saeter or another scout but we will have to make do.”

“Finally, I don’t know why I followed you idiots. We should have run off into the woods at the first chance we got!” a man behind Geralhd exclaimed nervously.

Several other bandits nodded in agreement. They all looked terrified and more than a few of them kept scanning their surroundings. Blacknail was instantly reminded of rabbits that sensed a predator nearby.

“Have any of you morons ever traversed the Deep Green?” Vorscha rebuked them. “Without supplies and proper scouts we won’t last a day, and Werrick will have people watching the roads for us. To escape him we will have to hike through the forest for who knows how long.”

“Fine, we’ve got the hobgoblin and the gear so let’s go. Blacknail is supposed to a holy terror out in the forest,” the man replied.

“I have to agree with that. I know we are still short on scouts but I don’t think we are going to find any still around,” Geralhd added.

“Ugh, it’s amazing how fast those bloody bastards disappeared,” Vorscha admitted darkly.

“That’s rangers for you. Half of them probably had their gear ready to go, just in case, and I don’t blame them,” someone else muttered.

While still supporting Blacknail, Vorscha started leading the squad of bandits off towards the forest. However, the hobgoblin tried to pull away from her.

“My master!” he hissed angrily. “I need to go back.”

He was too weak to break free and Vorscha kept moving. She only threw him a pitying look. There was deep sadness reflected in her eyes.

“You can’t save him, little one. You would only be throwing your life away,” she told him. “A good soldier knows when the cause is lost and when to fight another day.”

“No! I will sneak up on the man named Werrick and stab him the back. I can kill them all!” Blacknail argued defiantly.

“You can barely walk,” the woman replied frankly.

The group of fleeing bandits were slipping through the more built area of Herad’s camp. They used the buildings and tents for cover as they slipped towards the back of the base and the forest that lay beyond it.

Chaos reigned all around them. Most of Werrick’s forces seemed to have chased other parts of Herad’s forces back onto the road. Another large group had been roped into helping fight the fire at Mahedium’s cabin. The roof of the building was covered in flames and black smoke continued to pour out of it.

There were still a few small groups of Werrick’s men around but they seemed busy looting. None of them wanted to get a close look at Vorscha’s party, lest they turn out to be unfriendly.

“I will save my master! Let me go!” the hobgoblin protested.

“I’m not going to let you go. The people here need you, and I won’t let you throw their lives away along with your own,” Vorscha told him.

Shouting interrupted any reply Blacknail could have made. It rang out from near Werrick’s location.

“The hobgoblin, it’s missing!” someone yelled in surprise.

“Search the area. He can’t have gone far!” Werrick shouted in reply.

The bandit chieftain’s voice was immediately followed by pained laughter. Blacknail had never heard such a sound before, but he knew without a doubt who was making it. It was Saeter. The noise died a few seconds later and there was silence.

Dread overpowered Blacknail and his gut twisted up. His heart skipped a beat as he tore himself away from Vorcsha. He only made it three steps before collapsing.

No, this couldn’t be happening. He could make it in time! There was no way his master was dead. All he had to do was pick himself up and run to his rescue! For the first time ever, tears welled up in Blacknail’s eyes. His claws sank into the ground and as he clenched them they tore up the earth. He whimpered in pain. Why did it hurt so much! He didn’t understand!

“Get up!” Vorscha hissed as she grabbed Blacknail and wrapped an arm around his shoulder.

“Come on Blacknail! Keep moving,” Khita begged him.

They started walking again. Feeling was beginning to return to Blacknail’s limbs and his stride strengthened. However, a new type of weakness plagued him. He felt hollow inside and he couldn’t think straight.

“There they are!” someone shouted from of in the distance.

“Damnation, run for the trees!” Vorscha yelled as she passed Blacknail to Khita.

The warrior woman spun around to see a small horde of enemy soldiers bearing down on her party. Instantly, most of her companions made a break for the safety of the trees ahead of them. Only Geralhd and Khita hesitated.

“Take the hobgoblin and go! I’ll hold up the rear,” Vorscha ordered them.

Geralhd nodded and began helping Khita drag Blacknail. Together they managed to get him moving at a fair pace.

The sight of the enemy awoke something in Blacknail. Now that he had a focus, despair gave way to rage. Someone was going to pay for making him feel bad.

“I can run now,” he hissed as he pushed his two human helpers aside.

The hobgoblin broke out into a jog. He was still unsteady but he could keep up with Khita and Gerhald easily enough. Anger burned within him but he kept it contained by mentally running through sword drills his master had taught him. His master...

As his gait strengthened, Blacknail saw his tent off to one side. He and Saeter had set their campsite up near the forest, and Blacknail veered off towards it.

“What are you doing?” Geralhd asked between exhausted breaths.

The hobgoblin didn’t reply. He dashed towards his tent, quickly grabbed his backpack, snatched up one other item, and then hurried back over to the others.

They hadn’t slowed down for him but it didn’t matter. It took him mere seconds to catch back up. The diversion had been more than worth the time. Saeter had always made sure that Blacknail kept a bag ready in case they needed to go out on a mission. Its contents would be very useful.

The thick bushes that grew at the edge of the forest where the wall ended was only a short dash away now. Blacknail headed straight towards them.

There were too many enemies to fight. All he could do was run and try to figure out his next move. He wasn’t going to throw his life away in a fight he couldn’t win, not when there were so many people that he needed to kill.

There was a whistling sound and a loud meaty thud. Blacknail’s ears perked up and he ducked low as he recognized the sound of arrows in flight.

“Gods damn it!” Vorscha suddenly roared.

Someone had shot an arrow at her and it had grazed her leg. The warrior woman tensed up and stopped running. A deep graze bleed profusely a few inches below her knee.

“I’ll help you. Come on,” Geralhd quickly offered as he came to a stop as well.

“No, keep running. I’ll hold them off. I’ll never make it with a wound like this slowing me down,” his lover replied sadly.

“But...” he started to reply until Vorscha cut him off.

“Go!” she growled angrily as she drew her sword and turned to face the enemies bearing down on her. “We both knew this was a just a short term thing, lover. It was never going to work out.”

“Goodbye, and thank you for everything, love,” Geralhd replied sorrowfully.

After a moment of hesitation, he started running again. Anguish was plain on his face but he had no choice but to flee.

The sounds of fighting rang out in the air as Blacknail slipped into the bushes at the edge of the forest. Khita had already gone ahead and Geralhd was right behind him.

The hobgoblin took a moment to peer out through the greenery at everything he was leaving behind. Smoke rose above Herad’s camp. Somewhere out of sight lay Saeter and Herad’s bodies.

Nearby, Vorscha held off the first few enemies with a swing of her long sword. She wouldn’t last long. She was already being encircled by vicious looking bandits.

There was nothing Blacknail could do. He was helpless. The hobgoblin choked and his eyes watered as he clung to the item he had taken from his tent. It was the first gift his master had ever given him, his raggedy blanket.

Then, without a word, Blacknail turned and slipped away into the Green. He would be back one day...










INT: APV














“We’ve got the area under control now, sir,” a tough looking bandit in leather armor carefully explained.

He had short messy brown hair and was standing among the cluster of cabins in the center of Herad’s encampment. There was only one other person nearby, but there was a lot of human activity off in the distance. The occasional cheer or exhilarated laugh rang out as groups of bandits wandered about and celebrated their recent victory.

“We’ve pushed all hostiles out of the perimeter and set up watches,” the man continued. “A few of the Black Snake’s minions managed to flee down the road but there’s nowhere for them to really go. The reserve force you left a few miles back is sealing their only escape route.”

The bandit then saluted and waited for the armored man in front of him to respond.  It took a few moments for a response to be forthcoming.

“And those that have surrendered?” Werrick eventually asked after thinking something over.

The bandit chieftain was still dressed as if for battle, although he hadn’t put his helmet back on. There was an unhappy expression on his face. His long brown hair was messy and he took a second to push a lock of it away from his eyes.

“They have been rounded up and await your decision, sir. As per your orders,” his subordinate quickly answered.

“I’m in a foul mood. Let them stew for a while,” Werrick replied. “Things didn’t work out like I’d hoped they would.”

“Sir? It was a perfect victory. We destroyed Herad’s forces and killed her, all while taking acceptable losses,” the man remarked uncomprehendingly.

“Yes, that’s the gods given truth. However, things could have gone better after the battle...” Werrick mused to himself. “I had my eye on recruiting a few more useful pieces.”

“Yes, sir. Sorry, sir.” the bandit replied carefully.

“Not your fault,” Werrick told him.

The bandit chieftain took a second to look around. There was no longer any smoke rising into the sky or any sounds of fighting. However, most the tents that Herad’s men had set up had been ransacked as their victorious opponents searched for loot. The camp had quickly been gutted and debris of various sorts now littered the ground.

Off in the distance, tall trees surrounded the camp. Their leafy green branches blocked the view in every direction.

“What about those that fled into the forest?” Werrick asked his subordinate as he studied the trees.

“We have squads of scouts and hunters out to pursue them. They’re unlikely to get far but some will probably try to circle back to the road so I thought it important to make sure none of them catch us unaware,” the other man replied.

“Indeed, only the truly desperate would seek safety out there. The wilderness is far more merciless than me, and even if they make it back to civilization all the North is now under my control,” Werrick chuckled.

As he was talking, a cloaked figure stepped out of the shadows and approached him. There was nothing remarkable about the newcomer, except that their features were hidden under a fur hood, but Werrick recognized them and gave them his complete attention.

“You are dismissed,” he told the subordinate he had been talking to.

The man saluted again and hurried away. When he was out of earshot the hooded figure spoke up.

“Lord, I watched the mage as you requested,” they announced in a surprisingly feminine voice. “So far he has done nothing to arouse my suspicion, although the loss of all his papers in that fire was inconvenient. I had hoped to go through his correspondence.”

“I think that fire hurt him far more than it did us, Zelena,” Werrick replied. “It also changes nothing really. We will simply have to be cautious in case he has struck additional bargains with the Broken Wheel behind our backs.”

“I will remain vigilant, my lord,” Zelena replied as she pushed her hood back to reveal her long blond hair and elegant looks.

Her blue eyes gazed down submissively but they still shone with intelligence. Her every movement was calculated and controlled.

“I know you will. It was very reassuring to have you there during the battle. I wouldn’t have wanted to actually put myself under that traitor’s power,” Werrick told her.

“He could not have harmed you. I had defenses ready to neutralize anything he could have cast,” Zelena explained as she held up her hands.

The sleeves of her thick coat slipped down to reveal a pair of delicate looking golden gauntlets. They were exquisitely crafted and fit her petite hands snugly. Symbols ordained the metallic surfaces and large crystals had been set into the palms.

“Oh, I don’t doubt your abilities as a mage bodyguard. Mahedium would never have known what hit him if he had tried to back out on our bargain,” Werrick told her confidently.

“We should kill that man now that we no longer need him,” Zelena replied as she scowled in distaste. “It is dangerous to associate with a dark mage such as him. Nothing good will come of drawing the attention of the guilds. They are ruthless in protecting their secrets.”

“You don’t think his research will be useful?” Werrick asked her. “I would have thought you’d welcome a new source of mana stone.”

“I can buy new ones on the black market or from my connections, and his dealings with the Broken Wheel concern me,” she replied.

“Perhaps, but I also have plans for our renegade alchemist and the magic he can provide us. The mage guilds are a long ways from here and care little about the North,” Werrick countered. “If he betrays us you can kill him, though.”

There was a disapproving scowl on Zelena’s face but she nodded in acceptance. Werrick was amused by her reaction and smiled.

“I will make sure he has no chance to work against you, lord,” she observed with complete confidence. “His understanding of magic is deep but he is a floundering novice when it comes to conspiracy and subtle manoeuvrings.”

“That’s what you said about Herad when you went to Daggerpoint, and we both know how that turned out,” he replied.

“She had resources and allies I did not suspect,” the blonde explained defensively. “How was I to know that...”

“It was not a rebuke, Zelena,” Werrick interrupted her. “I was simply reminding you not to be overconfident. You have already been punished for your failings in Daggerpoint, such as they were.”

“Yes, lord. You are right,” was her immediate reply.

Before they could resume their conversation there was an interruption.

“There you are, Werrick,” Mahedium yelled as he walked over towards the bandit chieftain. “I hope I’m not interrupting anything important.”

“No, I was just about to go look for you, myself,” Werrick replied cheerily.

There was no hint of suspicion or dislike in his voice, and Zelena’s face went carefully blank.

“Hmm, how should I address you?” Mahedium asked uncertainly as he squinted at the bandit chieftain.

“Sir or Werrick is fine. How goes the recovery efforts at your lab?” Werrick asked him.

The mage sighed deeply before replying. He looked deeply frustrated.

“As well as can be expected,” he admitted. “I’ve managed to save most of my equipment but a lot of my notes have been completely destroyed. It will take quite a bit of experimentation to get some of the measurements and details I lost right again.”

“You’ll have that time and also more resources than Herad ever gave you,” Werrick reassured him.

“Yes, I’m very grateful for your patronage,” the mage commented sincerely.

There was a frown on his face though, and Werrick noticed it.

“Is something else bothering you?” he asked the other man.

“Ah, nothing much. It’s just that a... pet of mine disappeared during the fire. I’m somewhat glad it didn’t die, but I find myself concerned about where it ended up,” Mahedium answered.

“I’m sure its enjoying its new-found freedom,” Werrick replied dismissively.

“Hmm, yes. On a related topic, I hear that Blacknail managed to evade capture and is now out in the woods somewhere,” Mahedium remarked with a hint of nervousness.

“The hobgoblin? Yes, it managed to escape. After everything you hit it with I thought it would have been long dead, but it got up and slipped away,” Werrick replied.

“A pity, he was an interesting example of inhuman Elixir binding,” the mage commented. “I would have liked to examine him a few more times.”

“So the bloody beast was really a Vessel!” Werrick remarked in surprise. “I had assumed those rumors were tall tales.”

“I told you that they were not,” Zelena interjected irately. “No natural creature could have done the things it did in Daggerpoint. I was thwarted at every turn by that monstrosity.”

The blonde woman’s face was red with anger and her fists were clenched tightly together. A shiver of rage went through her as she rounded on Mahedium, although her hands remained carefully concealed in her sleeves.

“Were you the one that created that foul thing?” she accused the mage.

“Uh, no... I had nothing to do with that. He was already a Vessel long before I ever met him. In fact, his origins are a bit of a mystery. I deal mostly with mana stones, not Elixirs,” Mahedium replied carefully.

“I think I would have liked to get a closer look at this Blacknail,” Werrick interjected. “I’ve never seen a hobgoblin and if he really was a Vessel than some of the other stories about him might have been true as well.”

As he spoke he took a step forward between the two mages. He clearly wanted to prevent any conflict between them.

“I validated most of those reports myself,” Zelena told her boss.

“Yes, but many of them were still too outlandish to believe, and I judged that you weren’t the most impartial of witnesses at the time,” he replied dispassionately.

“You know I am not one to exaggerate the prowess of my enemies to excuse my failures, lord,” she countered sullenly.

“As you say. However, the men in the reports spoke of him like he was the shadow of death itself, instead of flesh and blood. It was like they thought he was a monster that lived under their beds, just waiting for the right moment to strike,” Werrick explained. “It was difficult to take seriously.”

“Their fear was understandable,” his lieutenant countered. “Even I have never heard of such a creature and it left a trail of bodies in its wake. It hunted down some of my best men and slipped unseen into the strongholds of the allies I recruited.”

“Which is why I would have liked to get a closer look at him,” Werrick replied.

Mahedium frowned and turned to regard the forest off in the distance. The trees swayed slightly as a breeze blew by.

“Be careful of what you ask the gods lest they grant your desire,” he remarked nervously.

“I hardly think one hobgoblin is much of a threat. He will soon run out of Elixir, as well,” Werrick replied.

“Blacknail was dangerous long before he was provided with Elixir. I personally saw him kill a powerful human Vessel without it. Hobgoblins are dangerous predators and they excel in hunting men and women,” Mahedium explained.

“Do you really see him as a credible threat to me,” Werrick asked in disbelief. “What do you think he will do?”

“If Blacknail is truly out there then I have no idea what he is thinking or planning. He may just wander off, never to be seen again,” the mage admitted.

“That would be smart thing for him to do,” Werrick laughed confidently. “One man can’t hope to stand against the forces I have built.”

“He is not a man, and he doesn’t think anything like one,” Mahedium countered. “If he does resurface he won’t come as an enemy or a competitor. We are prey to him, nothing more. The aurochs have both incredible strength and numbers, but that doesn’t save them from the lion’s jaws.”








ITG 1









What was pain? Blacknail contemplated the awful nature of the feeling as he led the way through the forest. Agony coursed through him. His injuries ached from walking but it was more than that. Something had been taken from him, and he knew he would never get it back.

The absence enraged him. How dare they take what had been his! Herad had been his chieftain and Saeter had been his one and only master! Blacknail wavered slightly as hate boiled through him. Rage filled him to such an extent that it seemed to want to burst out from his insides like vomit, and he had to fight the urge to scream and rip apart the nearest bush or human scapegoat.

The survivors of Werrick’s attack meekly followed behind the hobgoblin. There were thirteen of them, but Geralhd and Khita were the only ones Blacknail knew very well. Scamp was also following meekly behind Geralhd.

It had only been a few minutes since they had fled their old base. None of the humans were scouts so they didn’t question the path Blacknail had chosen. They reeked of mind-dulling fear and sweaty defeat. Blacknail ignored their weakness and forged on ahead.

“Did you see Varhs?” Scamp asked Blacknail as he run up to his side.

“No!” Blacknail hissed back with barely contained fury.

The little goblin’s eyes were huge and shiny with tears. He looked both terrified and sad. Blacknail had to resist the urge to kick him. His pain was so much worse than Scamp's! What did the spoiled little goblin know about suffering?

Herad was dead. His chieftain had seemed invincible but she had fallen in combat after being betrayed. He had thought her cleverer than that. How could someone so ruthless and powerful die?

Very little of her band remained after her demise. Vorscha was probably dead by this point and so was Saeter. The memory of his master’s fallen body enraged Blacknail again.

Even Red Dog had died. That wasn’t fair! Blacknail had wanted to kill him, and he had been saving him for a special occasion!

The hobgoblin snarled and squeezed his fists together. He had to fight to keep his rage in check. The idea of living without his master was... distressing. Did he want to stay with this other remnant of his tribe? What would be the point in that?

The humans behind him were weak and useless, especially Khita. Most of them had injuries that made them next to useless in a fight. Leaving them would increase Blacknail’s odds of survival, but where would he go after that?

Blacknail had never really understood Saeter. His master’s pink head had contained many weird human thoughts, but the hobgoblin had respected him. He had owed the man so much; Saeter had made the hobgoblin who he was.

Vorscha had also been a complete idiot, even if she had been strong. Why sacrifice yourself and look after useless people like Khita? Blacknail didn’t get it.

It was Herad that Blacknail had actually understood the best. The bandit chieftain had ruled as a hobgoblin would... just better. It didn’t take much imagination for him to know what she would have wanted him to do. Werrick had to die.

Was that what Blacknail wanted, though? Killing the human named Werrick wouldn’t be easy. It was possible a sneak attack might work but it would be risky and gain Blacknail nothing. He would still be alone and surrounded by enemies.

Other strategies would require he seek out help. The humans that he was travelling with right now had been overcome by fear and were useless. It was annoying how cowardly humans could be.

He didn’t want to travel all by himself, though. That sounded really boring!

Besides, the clumsy humans had one significant use. They served as a meat shield that would attract any attacking predators. That was important, because out here in the Deep Green there were a lot of things that liked people-sized meals.

A scent reached Blacknail’s nose. The hobgoblin stopped and stared off into the trees for a moment. He recognized it.

“What is it?” Khita asked him nervously.

“Stay here. I’ll be right back,” Blacknail replied as he stomped off into the bush.

The hobgoblin sniffed the air as he ducked under a branch. After a quick look around he located the source of the scent. It was coming from a cluster of roots at the base of a nearby tree. The tree itself was huge and its trunk rose up into the canopy where it blocked out the sun.

“Come out, you idiot. I know you’re under there,” Blacknail hissed impatiently.

There was a shuffling noise and a second later a head poked out from the space between two large roots. It was Elyias, and he didn’t look all that happy to see Blacknail. What a stupid human.

Elyias looked pale and scared. His eyes didn’t meet Blacknail’s and he kept looking off to the sides. He seemed both afraid of the hobgoblin and everything else as well.

“Oh, it’s you. I heard something and was afraid it was some sort of monster... other than you. Is it safe now?” he asked nervously.

A frustrated sigh escaped Blacknail lips. What kind of idiot hid in a stupid place like that just because they had heard some noise?

Instead of replying Blacknail stepped forward and grabbed the man’s shoulder. With a quick tug, he hauled him out of his hiding place. The young man was too petrified by fear to put up any resistance.

“There are some more people this way. Come with me,” Blacknail told him.

“Thank the gods. I was afraid that I was going to be stuck alone or with just... someone else,” Elyias whined fearfully.

The stupid minion had obviously run off into the forest all by himself as soon as Herad had been defeated. He wouldn’t have lasted a day if Blacknail hadn’t found him. Elyias owed him another favour now.

It was only a short walk back. Elyias trailed after Blacknail with a relieved expression on his face. They got a few looks as they approached the spot where the hobgoblin had left the others.

“Oh, a straggler. The bastard is lucky you found him,” one of the bandits said as they spotted Elyias.

“Ah, him. He’s that kid that kept losing at dice. Why do we want him?” another male bandit remarked disdainfully.

“We already have Khita. He won’t be any worse than her,” Blacknail explained.

The hobgoblin wasn’t quite sure why he had bothered going after Elyias. Had it been just out of habit? No, it was because Elyias was his minion. He had lost too many tribesmen today to give up any more. Anyone that tried to take what was his would have to pry it from his clawed hands!

“True enough,” the man replied. “I guess he may as well join us.”

“Hey!” Khita exclaimed. “I’m a better woodsperson than any of you asses!”

All the survivors started talking amongst themselves, but Blacknail took back his position at the front of the group and started walking again. He didn’t care about what they said.

“Um, Blacknail. Maybe we should stop for a second?” Geralhd told him as he hurried over to the hobgoblin’s side.

The hobgoblin turned to look at the man. He was standing right behind Blacknail with a nervous smile on his face. There were mutters of agreement from the other humans as well.

“We need to keep moving,” Blacknail hissed in response.

“I understand that, but we don’t even have a plan. Where are we going?” Geralhd asked him.

“We’re headed away from the people trying to kill us,” Blacknail explained condescendingly. That should have been really obvious to everyone.

“Yes, but that doesn’t tell us where we are headed,” Geralhd countered.

Out of morbid curiosity, Blacknail decided to ask and see if any of the humans had something in mind. He stopped walking and turned towards them.

“Where do you want to go?” he asked them.

Geralhd and the others started talking among themselves. Unsurprisingly, none of them had any good ideas.

“We should probably head in the same general direction as the road. It’s not like there’s anywhere else to go,” someone commented.

“But if we get too close someone might stumble onto our trail,” another replied. “Werrick probably has a lot of men out looking for us.”

This discussion went on for a few minutes before Blacknail lost patience. He grunted in annoyance and started walking again.

“Hey, where are you going?” Geralhd asked the departing hobgoblin.

“There is a place Saeter and I sometimes used as a campsite this way, and it will be dark soon. Follow me if you want. I don’t care,” Blacknail grunted without stopping.

After a few more seconds of arguing everyone decided to let him lead the way.

Despite all the dramatic events that had unfolded less than an hour ago, the forest was the same as always. Blacknail was still struggling to hold back the rage he felt but around him things were almost tranquil.

They were walking a path the hobgoblin had used many times before when he’d gone out hunting. Birds sang in the trees off in the distance. Leaves rustled as small animals scampered around out of sight.

The canopy overhead was porous on this trail, so the undergrowth was thick. As Blacknail was stepping over a fallen log, a crunching sound reached his ears. It had come from a fair distance down the trail behind him, and it was swiftly followed by a dull snap.

Instantly, Blacknail's heckles rose and he turned to scan the forest in that direction. He didn’t see anything but he knew something was there.

“What is it?” Khita asked him.

The concern in her voice disturbed the hobgoblin. He looked her and the other humans over. Some of them were wounded and they all looked exhausted.

“I think someone is following us,” he told her loud enough that everyone could hear.

Fear immediately appeared on most of the bandit’s faces. Several of them twitched and threw nervous glances backwards. Blacknail watched them and frowned. It was unlikely they would be useful in a fight. Their retreat had broken their spirit.

“What do we do?” someone asked with barely concealed panic.

No immediate answer was provided by Blacknail. He took a few seconds to mull over his options. He looked up at the sky overhead. It was starting to get dark out. The sun had almost reached the western horizon already.

“I will go back and see who it is. Keep following this trail until you reach the end,” Blacknail told everyone.

He then explained to them how to get to the campsite he had mentioned before. As soon as he was done most of the humans started hurrying away. They wanted as far away from any form of pursuit as possible.

“Are you sure you don’t want help?” Khita asked.

Blacknail snorted disdainfully in reply. Khita was incapable of being helpful. There was no way she could move through the forest unseen.

“No, I’m just going to take a look, scout stuff,” he lied.

The redhead nodded and without another word headed after the others. Blacknail watched her go for a second before stepping off into the bushes at the edges of the trail.

Before he could come up with a plan he needed to find out who was tracking his party. He had only heard one person but there could easily be many more.

Luckily, it was getting dark out now. In just a bit it would be too dark for humans to see properly, but he wouldn’t have that problem.

The forest was silent as Blacknail slipped through the trees. He headed away from the trail and then began moving parallel to it. With great care he kept to the shadows and out of sight. It was important that he not be seen, but he had to keep an eye on the trail.

Almost immediately, he heard another crack as someone stepped on a twig. The hobgoblin froze and went perfectly still. There was movement along the trail. From his hiding spot behind a fallen log, Blacknail studied the source of the noise. It was a group of humans.

Saeter would have found their movements sloppy but it was much better than that of most humans. They moved carefully and only the occasional sound betrayed their presence as they followed the trail and the signs left by the survivors of Herad’s band.

The enemy scouts were dressed much the same as Herad’s rangers had been. Most of them wore hunter’s cloaks and dirty leather clothing.

Seven of them were visible. Blacknail didn’t think they had any scouts out or backup nearby. They wouldn’t want to split up in unfamiliar territory.

Even without reinforcements, that was more than Blacknail would usually want to fight. However, this wasn’t a normal situation and he really wanted to kill something.

The hobgoblin considered running ahead and getting some help from his human allies, but he quickly discarded that idea. They would be too scared and tired to fight properly, and they would only give him away. Alone, there was no way the pursuers would be able to detect him before it was too late.

However, the most important consideration was the rage. Every second Blacknail watched the enemy, images of Saeter dying filled his head. He had been helpless before, but now this group of foolish humans had left the safety of their pack and entered his domain. There was no one to hold him back from taking his bloody vengeance.

Blacknail turned away and headed deeper into the woods. Once safely out of sight, the hobgoblin broke into a run. The trail curved up ahead so he could cut across the forest to get a lead. There was a good ambush spot down the trail he wanted to take advantage of.

After whipping through a patch of bushes, Blacknail jumped back onto the trail. He didn’t stop moving. He kept running for several minutes until he came to the place he remembered.

A huge tree had recently toppled across the trail here. The fall of the towering giant had opened up the canopy but the undergrowth hadn’t had time to thicken yet. Except for two more tall trees there was no real cover along this part of the path, and one side of the trail was blocked by a rocky ledge that was twice as tall as a man.

Blacknail slipped his backpack off and hurriedly began his preparations. First, he pulled out some rope and started setting a trap. He emptied his backpack, filled it with rocks from the ledge, and then tied the rope to it. With that done, he threw one end of the rope over a thick branch overhead and then scrambled up the other tree.

He chose a sturdy limb that was over a dozen feet up and stretched over the path as his hiding spot. The leaves of the tree made him almost impossible to see from below. From there, he made his final preparations and strung his bow.

Nothing happened for several long minutes, until there was a faint rustling noise. The first scout appeared below Blacknail and began carefully walking down the path. He didn’t look up, humans almost never did. It was a weakness of the species.

Soon, the rest of the party followed their leader out onto the path. The hobgoblin grew excited as he watched them. When they were directly below the trap Blacknail grinned and cut the rope.

The only warning the men below got was a slight rasping noise as the rope  rubbed against bark. Surprised faces looked up just in time to see the sack of rocks drop on top of them.

Cries of pain were quickly followed by a sickening crunch as the heavy weight smashed into two men standing in the middle of the enemy formation. It knocked one man aside and hit the other dead on, crushing him.

The other humans panicked and threw themselves to the sides, away from the danger. Blacknail didn’t give them time to recover or figure out what was happening. He already had his bow drawn back and immediately let loose an arrow. It sank into one of the scout’s backs.

The twang of the bow was muffled by the commotion caused by the first attack. It took several moments for the hobgoblin’s enemies to realize another one of their comrades had fallen and how.

“Ambush! To cover!” a hooded scout ordered as he dove off the path and into some bushes.

His fellows were quick to scatter and seek the closest cover as well. None of them seemed to know where they were being attacked from but they knew the general direction from which the arrow had come.

The man that had been knocked aside by Blacknail’s trap was trying to get to his feet. He was struggling and had obviously been badly hurt. Blacknail reloaded his bow and shot him in the back. The man flopped down back onto the ground and went limp.

There were no more easy targets, so the hobgoblin dropped his bow and dashed further out onto the tree limp he had been perched on. He jumped off the branch, caught another one, and then threw himself sideways.

Branches whirred past Blacknail as he flew through the air and landed on an unsuspecting enemy’s back. The hobgoblin was not wearing boots so that he could climb easier. The long claws on his hands and feet sank into the man’s clothes and then the flesh beneath.

There was a shrill scream of pain as the man collapsed under Blacknail’s weight. A shock went through the hobgoblin’s arms as they both hit the ground, but the hobgoblin caught himself. Without hesitation, he quickly drew his knife, reached around, and cut the stunned man’s throat.

There were three enemies left, and they were scattered around the ambush site. This was going to be easy! Bloodlust rose within the hobgoblin and tinted his vision red. He almost spasmed with the need to bite and tear into his prey. It was time to make his enemies pay for what they had done.









ITG 2









Blacknail rose up from atop the corpse of the enemy scout whose neck he had just slit. The salty scent of blood was in the air as the crimson liquid seeped into the ground. Without a word, he launched himself towards his next victim. There were still three of Werrick’s minions scattered around the area.

A cracking noise revealed someone moving behind a tree up ahead. As Blacknail dashed across the ground, he drew his sword. It came loose with an eager hiss, as if anticipating the spilling of blood.

A bearded human peeked out from behind the tree. He was an older man with untidy brown hair, and there was a tense look on his face.

Instantly, Blacknail leapt forward and slashed at the human. The man’s eyes went wide and he quickly disappeared back behind cover.

A predatory growl escaped Blacknail’s lips, but he didn’t give chase. Instead, he threw himself the other way. He dashed around the opposite side of the tree trunk, towards the man’s back. His claws sunk into earth and tree roots as he moved.

“Bloody hells!” the bearded man yelled as he turned and realized what had happened.

His back was exposed. He had drawn his blade but it was useless since he was facing the wrong direction. His eyes widened in terrified helplessness, as the lightning quick hobgoblin closed the distance and stabbed him in the side. The blade sank deep into flesh before grinding against bone and coming to a halt.

That left just two humans. Blacknail laughed as he tugged his sword free, and his voice echoed eerily through the trees. Behind him, the bearded man fell like a puppet whose strings had been cut.

“What in all the hells is going on here? What is this?” a panicked voice shouted from off to one side.

“It’s him, the monster!” someone exclaimed in reply. “The reaper of Daggerpoint!”

The fearful tone caused an excited shiver to go down Blacknail’s spine. The sound was full of weakness to be exploited. The hobgoblin licked his lips eagerly. He could practically taste their terror, and it was sweet and satisfying. It quenched a need.

The last two humans were on the other side of the path and hiding behind a fallen log. There would be no benefit in giving his prey time to think and collect themselves, so Blacknail darted towards them and onto the trail.

Just as he had reached the center of the path, a hooded figure rose and aimed a short bow at him. Sunlight reflected off the steel tip of the nocked arrow. It was aimed directly at Blacknail’s face, but the hobgoblin ignored it. Unflinchingly, he stared directly into the archer’s eyes and kept running straight.

Time flowed slowly as Blacknail moved. His muscles were as taut as a coiled snake’s as he prepared. His eyes glowed with hunger and hate as they focused completely on the enemy.

The archer was a tough looking human woman with short brown hair and a crooked nose. Her eyes shimmered with fear but they also held steely determination. One well placed arrow would turn the tide of the fight.

The woman’s gaze relaxed, and the tension left her face for a moment as practiced calm took over. The arrow flew free as the archer’s fingers let it go, but Blacknail had already dived to the side. He had seen his opponent’s expression change and known what it meant.

The projectile missed the hobgoblin entirely and shot off into the forest.

“Mine!” Blacknail growled triumphantly as he leapt forward and raised his blade.

The archer jumped back and dropped her bow. She reached for the blade at her side, but she wasn’t quick enough. Blacknail’s sword cut into his opponent’s exposed arm and drew blood. It wasn’t a deep cut but the archer stumbled back and lost her grip on the blade she was drawing.

Immediately, Blacknail swung his sword around again, but his attack was interrupted. There was a rustling of leaves, as the last enemy ranger rose up from his nearby hiding spot and attacked with a swing of his own blade. The hobgoblin was forced to dodge out of the way of this new attack and bring his blade up defensively.

There was a loud metallic clang and sparks as the two swords collided. Despite his strength, Blacknail was pushed back by the man’s sheer weight. The hobgoblin smiled sourly as he absorbed the force of the blow by jumping backwards. He didn’t like being pressed back by a human fatty.

“Damnation, it’s really him!” the new attacker cursed as he looked at Blacknail.

He was a stocky human male that was dressed in the same rough clothing as the others. His long blonde hair had been gathered up into a ponytail, and he had a patchy looking goatee. There was alarm in his eyes as he studied Blacknail.

As soon as he landed, the hobgoblin brought his sword back up into a defensive posture. He met his opponents’ stares and grinned savagely in a way that highlighted his pointy teeth. They flinched, much to his delight.

They should fear him! Soon, he would tear them apart for daring to raise their weapons against him and his tribe. Saeter would be avenged! Nothing could save them.

“I’m going to chew your bones,” Blacknail hissed menacingly.

He wasn’t actually going to do anything like that. Humans didn’t taste very good, especially not the bones, but the idea of being eaten unsettled them in a way that simple death didn’t, because they were dumb.

“It’s a demon! It talks!” the man stuttered fearfully. “How can it speak?”

His words amused Blacknail. The hobgoblin had spoken up before that. This human was a  particularly stupid specimen.

“Shut up and fight,” the female hissed as she drew her sword. “That doesn’t matter right now.”

Blacknail’s eyes flickered with interest. Her grab for her weapon had been clumsy, probably because her main hand had been wounded and she was using her weaker one.

The man took a step forward. Immediately, Blacknail circled around away from him and towards the woman. She was obviously the weaker of the two.

“Cover me,” she told her companion as she tried to step back.

However, Blacknail didn’t give them chance to coordinate. He dashed forwards and jumped onto a nearby log. It was a massive fallen tree trunk and slippery with moss but Blacknail’s exposed claws gripped the bark without any problems.

Before his opponents could react, he sprinted along its length for a second before leaping back down onto the ground. His unexpected move placed him on the far side of the woman, out of reach of the man.

“Get back!” the man yelled as he tried to circle around.

He was way too slow. Blacknail launched a flurry of sword slashes at the woman. She desperately tried to block and parry the hobgoblin’s blows but was clearly having trouble. Her use of her weaker hand slowed her reactions.

As he crossed blades with the woman, Blacknail kept an eye on the man. Every time he tried to join the fight, the hobgoblin pushed the woman in his way or circled around in the opposite direction.

His inability to get near the hobgoblin frustrated the man, and the woman began to tire. Both of them quickly grew red in the face as the fight went on. Suddenly, Blacknail stepped forward. The woman was slightly off balance, and a blow from the hobgoblin knocked her sword aside. She was now completely open to attack.

The woman’s face paled as Blacknail raised his sword again in one hand. She had no way to block his next strike. The hobgoblin grinned as he stared into the woman’s terrified eyes. This was the end!

However, before the hobgoblin could attack, the man leapt forward with his sword raised up above his head. His blade came down in a mighty blow that battered Blacknail’s weapon aside.

Instead of resisting, the hobgoblin relaxed and absorbed the force of the strike. As Blacknail’s spun around, the man’s momentum carried him closer. As he staggered past, the hobgoblin casually drew a dagger with his free hand and plunged it into the man’s exposed back.

“Humans are so easy,” Blacknail purred happily as let go of the knife.

In front of him, the man fell and began coughing blood onto the ground as he died. The long dagger had sunk deep and cut into his vitals.

The woman squeaked and dropped her sword, before turning to run away. Blacknail sighed overdramatically. Humans were also slow. She had no chance of getting away. Really, what was she thinking?

With dagger still in hand, the hobgoblin leapt forward and caught the woman’s cloak. Instead of trying to pull her down, he simply tugged on it to slow her down and pull himself closer. She glanced over her shoulder, panicked, and immediately tried to backhand him.

The blow missed as Blacknail ducked under it. He took the opportunity to tackle her legs, and they both fell in a tangle. As he hit the ground with a thump, the hobgoblin was tempted to burn Elixir so he could quickly overpower his enemy. He resisted the urge though, since he had very little left in his system and only one vial.

Dirt and debris from the forest floor was thrown into the air as they rolled. Blacknail fought to keep his hold on the enemy scout. With a grunt of effort, he pulled himself up onto her chest as they suddenly came to a jarring stop.

The woman tried to buck her hips and throw him off, but Blacknail easily held her down. He hissed menacingly as he placed his dagger against her exposed throat, and she went perfectly still.

“Oh gods. Oh gods, no. Please spare me,” the woman begged tearfully.

This reaction stumped the hobgoblin for a second. He stared down the now crying woman’s face and hesitated. A flicker of emotion stirred within his chest as he studied her face.

“Why would I do that? It would be stupid,” he asked her curiously as tilted his head to the side.

“Please spare me!” the woman continued to whine.

Blacknail frowned and shook his head disdainfully before answering.

“You’re trying to kill me so I need-ss to kill you first. That’s how this works, and I hate you. You killed my tribe. Ending your life will make me feel much better,” he patiently explained.

The suppressed anger he had unleashed at the start of the fight still roiled within him, but it had mostly been spent. Victory was now his and with it came smug satisfaction. He wanted to drag out the fun for a little bit, and was honestly curious what she was going to say. Did she have something valuable to offer him?

“You can have all our gear and coins!” she told him frantically.

Blacknail scratched the back of his head. That idea didn’t work for him. Even bringing it up was stupid.

“I can just take your stuff after killing you. Not having you running around is much better for me,” he pointed out.

The woman stared at Blacknail for several long seconds without replying. She seemed to have regained some measure of self-control and was studying the hobgoblin carefully now, even though his dagger was still pressed against her neck.

“I can offer you pleasure,” she told him.

Blacknail considered her words. He had no idea what she was talking about, but he noticed her right hand was now concealed behind her back. It looked suspiciously like she was reaching for a concealed weapon.

“I already said I would enjoy taking my vengeance,” he countered as he remained alert.

“But surely laying with a woman would be much more satisfying,” she replied confidently.

“Laying with a...” Blacknail mused as he thought her words over.

Suddenly, his eyes opened wide in shock.  A stab of pain went through his skull as visions of a certain woman from Daggerpoint flashed through his mind. Even worse than the sights was the phantom smell of perfume. He didn’t want to remember that!

Blacknail flinched away from the woman and his cheeks felt hot. There was no way he was doing anything like that with a human woman ever again! Nope, that wasn’t happening. If it hadn’t been for that perfume, he would never have let that smirking woman control him like that.

As the hobgoblin was working to repress painful memories, he felt the person beneath him shift. His eyes focused in time to see a dagger plunge towards his side. Quickly, Blacknail threw himself sideways out of the way of the attack.

The knife cut through Blacknail’s shirt and grazed his ribs. The woman took advantage of his movement to throw him aside and scramble back onto her feet. A second later, she was dashing off down the trail that led back towards Herad’s old camp.

“No fair,” the hobgoblin grumbled bitterly as he jumped to his feet.

She had almost stabbed him while he had been thinking! Even worse than that, she had made him recall things he had been repressing for months.

Rather than pursue his escaping enemy, Blacknail picked up the bow she had dropped earlier. He grabbed a few arrows off the ground as well, and then he leapt atop the huge fallen log again. He took careful aim and then shot the fleeing woman in the back.

She instantly crumbled and then rolled across the ground until hitting the base of a tree. Blacknail stuck his tongue out at her corpse before turning away dismissively. He hadn’t felt like chasing her down and tackling her again. Her disturbing offer had totally ruined his vengeful moment!

Why did humans think he wanted to mate with them?  Several members of Herad’s band had mentioned stories about hobgoblins raping humans. They were so fat and tall, and also pink! How was that attractive?

Blacknail wanted to rant at the woman for suggesting such a thing, but she was already dead. In the hobgoblin’s experience, it was human woman who came onto him! Not that he wanted them to. They were perverts.

All the enemy scouts that had been following his group were dead now. Blacknail sighed resignedly as he looked around at their remains. What was left of his fury and outrage swiftly began fading away.

The killing had sated his bloodlust, but he still felt oddly hollow. The meager vengeance he had taken hadn’t made him feel any better. Saeter and his other tribemates were still gone and would never be coming back. The emptiness still ached.

If killing half a dozen minions hadn’t filled the void within him then he would just have to find something else that would. The answer was simple. Werrick was the one who had taken his tribemates. Nothing would be right until that smug human was dead.

An idea occurred to the hobgoblin. Werrick thought he had won, that the battle was over, but that was not the case. Blacknail didn’t like the idea of his future prey feeling relaxed and triumphant as he rummaged through the spoils of Herad’s camp. He would leave the man a message.

An actual written message wouldn’t work because Blacknail couldn’t read or write, but that didn’t matter. The hobgoblin knew more than a few other ways to get his point across.

Blacknail grabbed the leg of a nearby human corpse and began dragging it. After a bit of hard work and creative self-expression he had finished up. Now the forest path looked much better. There was no way anyone was going to miss this message or misunderstand what it meant!

Three of the corpses were now hanging from tree branches and creaking as they swayed. The other bodies had been piled in the center of the path nearby. Several of them were missing their heads. The skulls now decorated spikes that had been driven into the ground.

After looking around and nodding approvingly, Blacknail smiled to himself. It was annoying that he didn’t have any more time to play, but this would do. It got the point across.

There was a muted cracking noise behind him, so Blacknail glanced over his shoulder. He wasn’t too worried. It couldn’t be an enemy. It was unlikely they could have sneaked up on him, and they would have acted already if they had.

For a few moments he didn’t see anything. Then, his eyes focused on a large green shape. He stared at it for several long seconds as he stayed perfectly still. It was a troll.

Oh right, there had been signs of a troll hanging around. Saeter had pointed them out before the battle. Perhaps staying next to all these bloody corpses for so long had been a stupid idea.

As Blacknail watched, the huge beast stepped out onto the path and ambled over to the pile of corpses. There was a loud snorting sound as it sniffed them, and then in an impressive display of strength it reached out with one muscled arm and picked one of the bodies up.

The troll stared at the body for a few moments, and then it took a bite out of it. There was a series of loud crunches and wet smacking noises as it chewed and tore into the now mangled body. Blood splashed onto the ground as the beast ate.

This troll was noticeably larger than the one Blacknail had seen before. Like the other, it had thick green skin and a mane of dirty brown hair. It’s face somewhat resembled that of a very angry goblin, but it obviously weighed several times more than a hobgoblin. Heavy muscles seemed to roll under its skin as it moved, and two large tusks jutted out from its mouth.

A minute passed very slowly for Blackanil as he watched the massive predator. There was a smile on his lips, because he didn’t dare let his facial expression change, lest even the tiniest movement attract the troll’s attention.

After swallowing a particularly large chunk of meat, the troll turned towards the hobgoblin and growled deeply. Blood dripped from its jaws.

Blacknail had been hoping, futilely it turned out, that the beast hadn’t seen him. The hobgoblin carefully weighed his options. None of them seemed to offer him very good chances of survival. He was completely fucked.









ITG 3









The troll growled menacingly as it glared at Blacknail. The sound was full of raw rage and hunger. A shudder went down the hobgoblin’s spine, and he instantly understood what the beast was trying to communicate.

“Yep, you can have those,” Blacknail stuttered nervously with false cheer. “Consider the meat a gift!”

He carefully took a step back from the troll and the pile of bodies it had been feeding on. Overcome by terror, he kept his eyes lowered submissively. He didn’t plan on trying to assert his right to his own kills.

With all that food in front of it, the troll probably wouldn’t bother chasing down one small scraggly hobgoblin, as long as it didn’t get angry. Unfortunately, trolls were famous for getting homicidally enraged over nothing and killing people.

The hobgoblin continued to back away slowly, and the beast turned away from him. It continued eating again. Blacknail reached the edge of a patch of bushes. He took a step backwards and there was a snapping sound as his foot crushed a twig.

Blacknail winced at the unexpected sound and his breath caught in his chest. He hoped the unwelcome noise didn’t draw the beast’s attention.

He wasn’t so lucky. The troll looked up and its furious eyes locked onto the hobgoblin. It growled, and its massive green bulk shifted as it took a step towards him.

“Fuck,” Blacknail swore under his breath.

With a hiss of rage, the troll lurched forward. Its mouth opened to reveal huge razor sharp teeth as it lunged towards the hobgoblin.

In response, Blacknail yelped in terror and jumped. He twisted around in the air and was already moving when he landed. Instantly, the terrified hobgoblin sprinted madly across the ground towards the closest tree. Its huge trunk might get in the way of the terrible beast and slow it down. It wasn’t a great plan, but it was the only one he had.

The sound of claws tearing into the earth and growling quickly closed in on Blacknail’s exposed back, but his plan worked. The hobgoblin reached the tree without getting eaten, and he put a hand up against its bark as he rushed around it.

Blacknail threw a terrified glance back over his shoulder to see the troll’s charge slow. It didn’t want to collide with the tree trunk at full speed. The hobgoblin would have laughed triumphantly, but he still had nowhere to go and he was probably going to be eaten alive.

Could trolls climb trees? The hobgoblin had no idea.

Another menacing deep growl issued forth from the troll as it approached. It reached out with one hand and its claws tore into the tree bark as it came to stop. Fury radiated from the beast as it studied the hobgoblin hiding from it on the other side of the tree.

“Go away... please,” Blacknail said as he stared at the unstoppable predator with eyes wide with fear. “I’m just a little hobgoblin. You don’t want to eat me; I probably don’t taste nearly as nice as a fat juicy human.”

He was totally fucked. The hobgoblin whimpered softly to himself and his stomach felt sick. There was no way he was going to survive this.

Blacknail had seen how fast trolls could move and how hard they were to kill. It had taken a large squad of specially armed humans to take the last one down. This one was just toying with him, like he was rabbit or a mouse.

So much for all his plans; Blacknail was never going to kill Werrick. This troll was going to chew the hobgoblin up, and then it would finish eating all the humans he had killed. Werrick wouldn’t even get Blacknail’s message. It would look like a troll had killed the scouts. It had all been pointless.

The troll smelled of foul meat and rot. Its muscles flexed as it crouched low and prepared to spring towards Blacknail. The hobgoblin drew his sword. It was a pitiful weapon, but maybe he would get lucky, and piss the beast off enough that his death would be quick.

There was a rustling sound as a breeze blew through the forest and shook the branches on the trees. For a second, the scent of the troll was replaced by that of leaves and soil. Then the moment ended, and the beast leapt. Its eyes glowed with hunger as its massive jaws opened in preparation to feed.

Pure terror overwhelmed Blacknail and he froze. Time moved slowly, as his eyes widened with shock. The troll was fast and its jaws promised inescapable death. There was no way he could possibly get out of the way.

As the beast lurched through the air towards him, something hit it. The troll was knocked sideways as a long wooden spear slammed into its flank and sunk deep. There was a thunderous crash as the beast hit the ground. It roared in fury and pain from the unexpected assault.

Blacknail stood there and watched uncomprehendingly. He twitched slightly but didn’t otherwise move. He had no idea what was going on. A second ago, he had been staring at the open troll jaws that had been about to bite down on him.

With tremendous force, the huge spear was driven deeper into the troll. There was a snapping sound as it pierced right through the green predator and sunk into the ground, pinning it there. The troll began to roar and thrash around but it was held fast.

Four arms held the long spear in place. Each of them was much larger than those of a human. They were also covered in bark. Blacknail had been saved by what looked like a mimic.

A closer look revealed more details. The creature with the spear was undeniably similar to a mimic but also quite different. It had the same shell like armor that looked like bark, but its build was different. Its tall body was much bulkier and had fewer growths with leaves protruding from its back.

The biggest difference was the face. Instead of eye stalks, it had a head that looked almost like a human wearing a polished wooden mask. Its dark eyes shone with intelligence instead of the dumb blackness that filled those of a mimic.

The creature was silent as it held the troll down. No matter how much the troll thrashed and howled it couldn’t get free or reach its attacker. After a few moments, it began to slow and eventually go completely still. It was dead.

Nothing happened for a moment. Blacknail watched silently. He didn’t want to attract the attention of anything that killed trolls. That would be stupid.

There was a quiet creaking noise as the tree-like creature turned to look at Blacknail. The hobgoblin cringed and reluctantly met its gaze. The thing was very tall and it had a very big spear.

However, the creature simply looked curious as it studied Blacknail. At least, it didn’t seem hostile, but it was hard to tell since its face resembled a solid slab of wood.

There was a soft muttering noise from behind Blacknail. He cringed again and glanced over his shoulder. What was it now? Another troll? Hadn’t things gotten crazy enough?

Another creature stood behind the hobgoblin. It sort of resembled the spear-holder, but it was much smaller and only had two arms. It also had a carapace that resembled bark, but pale green flesh was visible in the joints.

Blacknail felt his jaws go slack with surprise as he studied the second creature. It sort of looked like a human! In particular, it looked like a woman wearing oddly shaped wooden armor, even if it wasn’t really human.

A mass of long vine-like tendrils grew from the back of its head, and its face was soft and fleshy. There was no mistaking the resemblance to a woman; it even had breast-like bumps under its chest armor.

The female tree monster met Blacknail’s gaze. Her face was serene and revealed nothing. The hobgoblin looked like someone had shaken him until he couldn’t stand straight.

The creature opened her mouth and incomprehensible words spilled out from between her weirdly human lips. Blacknail just stared at her blankly. Her voice was soft and melodic but he had no idea what was trying to say. It sounded nothing like the words of humans or goblins. He hoped this wasn’t a test.

When Blacknail didn’t reply, she turned to her much larger companion and said a few more strange words. He answered her in a deeper voice that echoed like sound through a hollow log.

When they were done talking, she walked over to the spear-wielder, and he shambled over to the troll and picked it up. Together, the pair then started walking off into the forest.

Blacknail let them go. He wasn’t going to question what had just happened. If trees wanted to come alive and save his life then that was fine with him. Also, he was still so shocked he had forgotten how to move.

What were those things that had killed the troll? Saeter had never mentioned anything like them, and they seemed important!

After a few moments had passed, Blacknail shook himself free of his paralysis. He was glad that he had already repacked his bag and gear before the troll had shown up. It was time to get the hells out of here and meet back up with the others. He would be safer among his human meat shields.

Without a word, the hobgoblin dashed back onto the trail. He moved as quickly as his legs would carry him, and he didn’t look back. It was starting to get very dark out now. Dusk had passed and the sun was well past the horizon. Even Blacknail’s hobgoblin eyes were having trouble seeing through the gloom of night.

The only sound that reverberated through the forest as Blacknail scrambled down the trail was the sound of his own heavy breathing and frantic footsteps. This didn’t reassure him much. He hadn’t heard the strange tree creatures approach at all, and they had been near silent when they had left. He simply had to hope that they weren’t following him or that he could outrun them.

After a few long minutes of running, and almost tripping over unseen stones or branches a few times, Blacknail saw a familiar rock up ahead. It was taller than him and its grey bulk jutted out from the ground beside the path. It was the marker he was looking for.

Off of the path, the darkness of the forest was almost impenetrable, but Blacknail turned and stepped into it. This was the way to the campsite where he had sent the others.

A lot had happened today. Blacknail had fought a battle, lost comrades, hiked through the forest, gotten into another fight, and then seen things he didn’t understand. He was too tired and sore right now to even process it all.

Even if it was too dark out now to see footprints or other signs, Blacknail could still follow his comrades’ scent through the forest. The campsite was just up ahead, and Blacknail was going to be very angry if there wasn’t a hot meal waiting for him.

They had no excuses. The hobgoblin didn’t care if half of them had fallen into a sink hole or been mangled by a giant boar. None of his human tribesmen could navigate through the forest or help all that much in a fight, so they had better at least have set up a half decent campsite. If they hadn’t, Blacknail was going to give them such a kicking in the morning.

Blacknail stepped out of the forest. Moonlight shone down on the ground in front of him and illuminated the way. Up ahead, there was a rocky hill that ended at the base of a cliff. A small fire burned atop the hill, and it cast a host of shadows against the backdrop of the cliff.

The hobgoblin had found the rest of his party. He raised a finger to his lips and whistled shrilly in a way that imitated the call of a particular bird. That was the signal he had arranged beforehand. He didn’t want to startle anyone by sneaking up on them unannounced. They might overreact and then he would have to hurt them.

There was no response, so after a few seconds Blacknail whistled again impatiently. What were they doing? Were the lazy pink fools even listening?

This time he did get a reply. It didn’t sound anything like the signal, though. It sounded more like a frog being strangled than any sort of bird call. Still, it was close enough. Blacknail grunted in annoyance as he made his way over to light.

The hobgoblin could see a pair of figures near the fire watching him as he climbed the rocky hill. Saeter had used this spot as a campsite because the open ground around the hill and the cliff behind it made it almost impossible to approach without being seen.

When he got closer, Blacknail recognized one of the humans as Geralhd. The thin young man was standing with his back to the fire. The other bandit beside him wasn’t important.

“You’re back! I was afraid something had happened to you,” Geralhd announced happily when Blacknail was close enough to see by fire light.

“Is there hot food?” Blacknail asked grumpily before yawning.

He wanted to eat and then get some sleep, not deal with idiots. He looked past Geralhd at the dark shapes that were stretched out around campfire. Most of the bandits were asleep.

One smaller outline obviously belonged to Khita, and she was very gently snoring. Blacknail was glad he didn’t have to deal with her obnoxious personality right now.

“There’s some stew. It’s barely palatable, though. We only had one pot, and none of us had time to get proper rations, so we just threw whatever we had in,” Geralhd explained as he pointed to a small iron pot that had been set on a stone beside the campfire.

“Fine,” Blacknail grumbled as he walked over to it.

The stew didn’t smell very good, like boiled dried meat and grass. That wasn’t surprising since that was probably what it actually was. Blacknail picked the pot up, sat down on the rock, and began slurping the stew down. As he ate, Geralhd continued talking.

“There was a small cache of firewood under an overhang where it would stay dry, and we gathered up a bit more from the forest before it got dark, but we will have to conserve it carefully if we want to keep the fire going all night.”

Blacknail didn’t reply and just kept eating. None of that sounded important. As soon as he was done eating he planned on finding a spot next to the cliff, where it was safest, and curling up to sleep.

“Um, when you doubled back to check for pursuit, what did you find?” Geralhd asked the hobgoblin.

This caused Blacknail to finally look up at him. The hobgoblin blinked a few times as he sorted through events in his mind. He had no idea how to answer in a way that was both truthful and which wouldn’t invite a million more annoying questions, so he lied.

“I didn’t find anything worth talking about,” he eventually replied.

“So then... what was all the screaming we heard about?” Geralhd asked in surprise.

Blacknail stared blankly at the thin bandit for a second, and then his gaze shifted to the man’s tiny pink ears. Humans had such terrible hearing that the hobgoblin had just assumed they hadn’t heard anything.

“But then I ran into some of Werrick’s men and killed them,” Blacknail explained reluctantly. “You don’t need to worry about them. We’re safe now.”

“And the bestial roars?” Geralhd asked next.

“I stepped on a pinecone. It really hurt,” Blacknail replied deadpan.

This answer clearly didn’t satisfy Geralhd, but there was no way the hobgoblin was going to admit to even seeing a troll. It would bring up too many other questions he didn’t want to answer, and the humans didn’t need more reasons to be afraid and useless.

Blacknail ignored Geralhd’s questions and told the man he was going to sleep.  Reluctantly, Geralhd left the hobgoblin alone and went back to take his turn on watch.

When he was gone, Blacknail found an empty spot and unpacked his blanket. The familiar softness of the cloth comforted and relaxed him. He yawned as he spread it over the hard ground and then lay down. It smelled like home.

The stars shone brightly in the clear sky up above, but a lot of them weren’t visible. The shadowy cliff loomed to one side, and wall of trees rose on the other. It was almost like Blacknail was looking up from the bottom of a deep pit or well.

The only sound to be heard was quiet human snoring and a faint rustling off in the forest somewhere. Blacknail stared at the stars as his body relaxed. However, for some reason, one corner of his mind couldn’t let go of consciousness. It wasn’t a problem he’d ever had before.

He was... troubled. He couldn’t stop wondering about the future and thinking about the past. Blacknail was used to living in the present, so this feeling bothered him.

It was like the illusion of the pit that surrounded him was real, instead of just in his mind. He had fallen into darkness. What did he do now that he had no master? What did he do without Saeter?

The howl of wolves echoed from off in the distance. Their sound was faint, even to his amazing ears, but easily recognisable. Blacknail listened and a wave of memories washed over him.

Saeter had found the sound beautiful. He had said it was the sound of the North. Blacknail didn’t feel the same way. The howling reminded him of how vast the Green was, and of all the strange things that lived within in it.

Wolves were just dogs and they were associated with his enemy. One day, Werrick would die at his hands. The hobgoblin focused on that thought until he drifted off to sleep.






ITG 4













The early morning twitter of cheerful birds filled the air. Blacknail was repacking his bag and preparing to start hiking again. All around him, the other remnants of Herad’s band were getting ready to move as well. When you were being hunted down by an army it was important to rise early and keep moving.

Over a quick breakfast, the bandits had decided to keep following the trail they were on as it paralleled the road north. They didn’t have a lot of options. Heading back would be suicide and there was nothing for them to the South. Most of them were wanted men and the others didn’t have the papers necessary to avoid being press ganged into the army.

The plan was to use the trails for a few more days and then slip back onto the main road. The forest path kept them hidden but it was also less direct and slower going.

The road would take them to Daggerpoint or another bandit friendly outpost. Once safely there they would disband, disappear, and hopefully join up with other bands. Most bandit chieftains didn’t ask their new recruits too many questions, and Werrick had no reason to put much effort into chasing down a few ragged and powerless survivors.

This plan didn’t sit well with Blacknail, but he couldn’t argue against it. It was frustrating, but he had no idea what he should do now. Would another tribe of humans take him in? Did he even want to join up with anyone?

Well, if he didn’t find a new tribe to join, he could always just do what he had done the last time he had gone to Daggerpoint. Living on the streets, stealing food, and killing people for fun and profit hadn’t been so bad. A hobgoblin could do much worse.

Blacknail’s idly thoughts were interrupted by Geralhd walking over to him. The man seemed to be muttering to himself. All that morning, the thin bandit had been looking sickly and depressed.

“Ah, Blacknail. How are you doing?” he asked the hobgoblin. “We face a cruel new dawn today.”

“I’ve been better,” Blacknail replied as he eyed the young man critically. Did he want something?

“Those are my general feelings as well... I woke up expecting Vorscha to be lying next to me, and then I realized that her presence would be ever denied me now,” Geralhd mused sorrowfully.

This wasn’t something that Blacknail wanted to hear, or think about. It brought to mind his own recent losses. There was nothing he could do about that right now, so he was trying to avoid thinking about it.

“You should be getting ready to move,” the hobgoblin pointed out sourly.

“You’re right, but I just felt like talking to someone, and no one else here seemed like much of a listener,” Geralhd admitted.

Blacknail wasn’t sure why the quality of his hearing mattered. He was confused for a second and his hesitation allowed Geralhd to keep talking uninterrupted.

“We had a complex relationship based on mutual self interest, but I’m going to miss her deeply. She deserved better...”

Blacknail didn’t care. The man could talk but that didn’t mean the hobgoblin had to listen. Hopefully, when they started moving Geralhd would grow too tired to keep talking.

Having conversations about your feelings was dumb. If you were happy you should continue doing the things that made you happy, and if you were mad then you should stab the person that had made you upset. That was the system that had always worked for Blacknail.

Admittedly, sadness was proving a little more complicated, but stabbing someone still seemed like a promising solution. It probably just had to be the right person, and if Geralhd didn’t shut up it might be him.

“Even Scamp looks melancholy,” Geralhd added as he pointed towards where the goblin was sitting. “He is probably missing Varhs. It’s all rather quite distressing.”

The motion drew Blacknail’s attention. He stared at where the goblin was sitting on a rock. The little menace was wearing his usual shorts and had a large knapsack on his back. Blacknail immediately noticed one huge problem, though.

“That’s not Scamp,” the hobgoblin observed warily.

“What?” Geralhd replied in surprise as Blacknail stalked over to the goblin.

It only took Blacknail a few moments to recognize the pale skinned little creature with black hair. It was definitely Mahedium’s pet, but what was it doing here?

The goblin calmly met Blacknail’s suspicious gaze, as the hobgoblin stomped his way. There was a relaxed look on its face which annoyed Blacknail. How dare the little creep come into the hobgoblin’s camp without asking permission or offering tribute!

“What are you doing here?” Blacknail asked the goblin as he snarled down at it.

“Following you, great one,” the creature replied politely.

This response startled Blacknail and threw him off track. He hadn’t even known the goblin could talk! Still, it was being properly respectful, at least.

“Where did you learn human speak?” he enquired in shock.

“I listen to people and talk to Scamp,” the goblin answered simply.

That made sense, but it was also deeply suspicious! Blacknail didn’t like the idea of the little goblin sitting in a dark corner while secretly listening to everything everyone said. Worse, he had probably been learning things, on purpose. What kind of goblin did that? Learning was something you should only do when you had no other choice!

“Where is Scamp?” Geralhd asked as he walked up beside Blacknail. “Nothing happened to him, right?”

“Over there,” the goblin replied neutrally as he pointed towards the forest.

Sure enough, a small green figure could be seen walking along the tree line. The goblin appeared to be rooting through the underbrush for bugs or other sources of food.

That was normal behaviour for Scamp, but there was something very odd about Mahedium’s goblin, and Blacknail intended to put him in his place. He was the hobgoblin here and this goblin was too arrogant.

“Fine, but what’s in the sack?” Blacknail asked as he smiled smugly and nodded towards the bag on the goblin’s back.

Something flickered behind the goblin’s eyes for a second before he responded. He had thought something over with alarming speed.

“I take shinnies from Mahedium,” he told the hobgoblin humbly. “You can have if you want, very tall stabber of humans, but it heavy.”

Blacknail scowled in disappointment as he flipped the sack open and peered inside. He hadn’t expected the goblin to offer him the bag. That took the fun out of taking it from the goblin. However, he did like the titles the goblin was giving him. Blacknail knew his height was just perfect for a hobgoblin.

“That certainly looks like stuff from Mahedium’s lab,” Geralhd added as he leaned over Blacknail’s shoulder. “The little goblin must have grabbed whatever caught his eye before fleeing the fire and following your scent. He must have thought it would be safer to follow a hobgoblin.”

The inside of the bag was indeed stuffed full of items that looked like they had come from the mage’s cabin. None of the junk at the top was all that interesting or useful during a long hike, and Blacknail didn’t want to dig deeper in case something exploded.

“You can keep it,” the hobgoblin announced as his scowl deepened.

Geralhd’s explanation didn’t satisfy Blacknail. There was something off about this goblin and the way it acted. However, if the goblin wanted to drag heavy junk through the forest for who knows how long then Blacknail wasn’t going to stop him.

“Thanks, wise master,” the goblin responded as he nodded respectfully.

“He needs a name. What should we call him?” Geralhd interjected happily.

What was this now? For some reason, the bandit’s mood had picked up. Blacknail and the goblin both turned towards Geralhd.

“Our new compatriot needs a name, like yours and Scamp’s,” the young man explained. “He doesn’t have one yet, right?”

“Nope,” the goblin confirmed as he sat there with an indecipherable expression on his face.

After thinking it over for a few seconds, Blacknail realized that Geralhd was right. Naming the goblin would be useful. Unfortunately, the hobgoblin didn’t really care all that much and no good names sprung to mind.

“I’ll just call him Gob,” Blacknail announced.

This name didn’t appear to please anyone else. Geralhd winced as if in pain and the goblin vigorously shook his head in denial.

“How about Imp, after the demon that punishes the arrogant who turn away from the gods?” Geralhd suggested.

As if a goblin needed fancy name like that! Well, it didn’t matter. Blacknail didn’t feel like arguing about something so stupid.

“Whatever,” he said before snorting disdainfully and turning away.

After a few minutes passed, everyone had finally gathered up, and they were ready to get going. With Blacknail leading the way, the surviving bandits entered the forest and made their way back to the path.

Hiking quickly grew monotonous. The trail was rough, uneven, and thin so the going was difficult and tiring. Several of the humans started talking quietly amongst themselves to pass the time, and their conversation drew Blacknail’s interest.

“So, the hobgoblin is our scout, but who is our leader? We should really have one in case we need someone to take charge in an emergency,” a bandit pointed out.

Blacknail’s ears perked up as he focused on the man’s words. That was a very good question! He had been too busy fighting and working to consider the fact that their group was currently leaderless. They obviously needed a chieftain, and it should obviously be him!

“I should be the new leader,” Blacknail politely suggested as he came to a sudden stop and turned around.

There was silence for a few seconds as everyone else stopped and considered this. For some reason, almost no one but him seemed to think it was good idea.

“Er, how do you figure?” a male bandit asked with surprise and doubt plain in his voice.

“I’m the strongest and smartest person here,” Blacknail replied. “I could kill you all or just leave you all to die in the forest. How could it be anyone else?”

“The person part is arguable,” a blonde bandit muttered quietly.

“I heard that,” Blacknail replied crossly as he glared at the man.

“...but he’s still got my vote!” the man quickly added as he flinched and smiled apologetically at Blacknail.

“Blacknail should totally be the new boss!” Khita exclaimed, but everyone ignored her.

“I’m not following a hobgoblin!” another man interjected heatedly.

“Just leave it. What are you going to do? Fight him? That’s not going to make anyone here think you’re smart,” a woman replied. “We do need him more than he needs us.”

“Plus I’ll kill you,” Blacknail added helpfully.

The humans took several seconds to talk among themselves. Surprisingly, it was Geralhd who took charge.

“It’s not like we have any other plan but to follow him, anyway. Why shouldn’t he be in charge?” he told the others.

“Well, I’m not going to be the one to tell the murderous hobgoblin Slosher that he can’t be the leader,” a bearded bandit added.

“Er, can he even do the job? He’s undoubtedly a great fighter, but it takes more than that to lead,” someone else replied skeptically as he threw Blacknail a nervous look.

“I have a plan there,” Geralhd countered before turning back to the hobgoblin.

“We’ve agreed that you’re the best choice for leader, Blacknail,” he announced.

“Good,” Blacknail replied proudly as he straightened up and smiled.

He was the leader! That meant he was better than everyone else, and that they all knew it.

“We also want to elect a sub-leader, in case you are too busy... doing important things... to take charge. You know, just in case,” Geralhd added diplomatically.

That made sense to Blacknail. He nodded in acceptance and the humans began talking among themselves. Having a sub-leader would just mean less work for him, and the leader already did next to no work. This was going to be great!

“You seem to be the hobgoblin whisperer here, so it may as well be you,” the woman from earlier suggested to Geralhd.

After a brief but intense conversation everyone else agreed. Some people looked angry and disappointed but they didn’t argue. They were probably just jealous of Blacknail’s undeniable leadership skills.

“All right, that’s all settled then,” Geralhd concluded.

Blacknail took this time to plan his first move as the leader. He scanned the people behind him for a familiar face. Ah, there was Elyias! The young bandit was way at the back and Blacknail had almost forgotten he existed. How silly of him.

“Since I’m the leader, I shouldn’t carry my own bag,” Blacknail announced before pointing at Elyias. “You should take them.”

“What? That’s not fair!” the young man said in shock.

Elyias had been keeping to himself at the back of the party, but now he spoke up and looked to the others for support. No one cared. They shrugged or even glared at him for trying to drag them into his problem.

“Just do it,” the man next to him said mercilessly.

“Also, if you drop anything or steal from me I’ll kill you,” Blacknail added as he passed the young man his bags.

“Fuck me,” Elyias swore as he took them. “How did I end up here?”

Free of the weight of his knapsack, Blacknail’s shoulders felt much looser. He hummed happily to himself, as he rolled his shoulders and started leading his loyal tribe of followers through the forest. He was the leader!

Nothing much happened for the next few days. They hiked through the day and took shelter during the night. Their movement through the forest was slow, and since they had little in the way of supplies they also had to forage a fair bit as they moved.

Luckily, Blacknail knew where to find edible plants. Saeter had taught him quite a lot and he had a very good nose. It was spring so quite a few young plant shoots could be eaten raw.

Scamp and Imp were also skilled at gathering plenty of delicious bugs. They easily found more than they could eat and shared the rest with the humans. However, for some reason, the humans started to complain about the food. They were very spoiled.

“Would it be possible to find some real meat?” Geralhd eventually asked Blacknail.

He had just come from a brief huddle with most the other humans. They had begun to thin out a little and their eyes shone with hunger. Blacknail thought it was a good look on them. It made them more hobgoblin-like and the loss of fat would allow them to run faster.

“Sure, it’s out there,” Blacknail replied as he pointed toward the forest.

“Er, I meant could you go get it? You’re the best hunter here. The only hunter, really,” Geralhd clarified.

“You wanted to move quickly,” Blacknail countered.

“We also need real food. Most of us are out of rations.”

Blacknail considered this for a few moments. He didn’t want to do it, however since he was such a great leader, he would.

“Fine, we’ll stop early at night and I’ll set up some traps, which I’ll empty in the morning,” he explained.

This was good enough for Geralhd and the others. They continued hiking for the rest of the day until it began to grow dark, and then they set up camp. While the others foraged for plants, Blacknail sniffed out some rabbit trails and set up snares.

That next morning he checked them and found three rabbits. The excited humans quickly turned them into a breakfast stew. Over the next few days of travelling they kept this pattern up, even if it did slow them down.

Eventually, the trail they were on ended at the top of a cliff. Below them, they could see an expanse of trees and a wide roaring river. The river stretched down from a far off mountain range and cut across the landscape. There was only one way to cross it.

They had to make their way back to the main road. Herad had destroyed the original bridge across the river there, but it looked like Werrick had repaired it. From atop the cliff, they could see it.

Some of the bandits thought it would be too risky to head back to the road. This was an obvious spot for an ambush. Unfortunately, Blacknail explained that they had no choice. He knew of no other crossing and it would be incredibly risky to try and find one.

So, the group of survivors carefully crept through the forest and back towards the main road. Blacknail led the way down the slope and through the trees. He moved carefully and kept his eyes open, just in case there were enemies nearby.

However, when Blacknail stepped out of the forest and under the sun, nothing happened. There was no ambush waiting for them on this side of the river.

“Maybe they don’t care about us?” Geralhd remarked in relief. “I mean, why would they? With Herad dead, we’re no threat to Werrick.”

There was a chorus of agreements from the others, but Blacknail wasn’t so sure. Why send rangers after them at all then? He intended to keep his eyes open.

The hobgoblin made his way over to the bridge that lay across the river. It was a slim rickety looking thing, but it was still much better than trying to swim across the water. This early in the spring, the river was wide and its current was moving rapidly. Splashes of white water were constantly hitting the rocky banks.

After glancing across the river at the winding road and distant tree line for any sign of ambushers, and not seeing any, Blacknail started crossing the bridge. The wooden planks beneath his feet creaked as he moved, and he was soon joined by the rest of his group.

They made it to the other side without anything dramatic or unexpected happening. Blacknail glanced back over his shoulder in the direction they had come, before leading his party down the road.

The mood of the party quickly started to pick up. Unlike on the forest trail, it was easy going on the road and the trees weren’t so oppressively close.  Without branches hanging overhead and greenery blocking their sight, everyone felt much safer.

“We will get to Daggerpoint within a few days at this rate!” someone cheered.

“If Werrick was chasing us he would have guarded the bridge. That means we’re in the clear!” another woman added happily.

“I’m just glad we don’t have to walk through anymore mud. I think my one boot has sprung a leak,” Khita announced.

Several other bandits joined in the celebration. Most of them seemed to believe that they had escaped their pursuers. However, Blacknail just frowned thoughtfully, and Geralhd noticed his expression.

“What are you thinking about, Blacknail?” he asked.

“I think they might think that we have a secret sneaky way across the river; this is our territory. That means they would ambush us anywhere but at the bridge,” the hobgoblin explained.

“That’s a little paranoid,” one bandit suggested.

“Did that even make sense?” another asked.

There were murmurs of agreement from most the other humans, and that annoyed the hobgoblin more than a little. He turned to glare at them. He was the boss! How dare they question him!

“Shut up. You’re all being too noisy. I’m the leader and I say be quiet,” Blacknail ordered them haughtily.

“Ya, he’s the leader,” Khita added.

The hobgoblin ignored the annoying redhead and his hand inched towards his sword hilt. If anyone challenged him then he might have to make an example of one or two of them. It was important to keep minions in line.

“We should do as he says,” Geralhd interjected. “There’s no reason to attract unwanted attention.”

There were nods of reluctant acknowledgment to the man’s words, and Blacknail let his hand fall away from his sword hilt. He snorted disdainfully before turning back around and continuing to walk.

There was still a long journey ahead of them before they reached Daggerpoint, and anything could happen in the wilds. Blacknail was going to have to muster all of his considerable intelligence and natural leadership skills to get them there safely.









ITG 5











Blacknail and his new subordinates made good time on the road before they had to stop for the night. The last time the hobgoblin had come this way, he’d stumbled upon a hidden cave the size of a small room. It served as shelter from the elements and a hideaway, so he led the bandits to it.

As his minions were setting up camp, and doing all the unimportant not-leader things, Blacknail went out to put up his snares. It had become a nightly ritual, and his human followers depended on the food he caught. They were completely useless without him.

Once finished, the hobgoblin took a few minutes to forage for edible shoots and leaves. Several of his followers had already been through this area in their own search for food, but Blacknail had neglected to tell them that Red Cress leaves were edible. In fact, they were the tastiest treat around, which was why he hadn’t told anyone about them. More for him!

When he got back to the cave, Geralhd was there to welcome him. Most the other bandits were seated around the cave and resting. Days of hiking had worn them down and given them more than a few aches.

“It’s a good thing you led us here. It looks like it might rain over night, and we didn’t find much in the way of firewood,” Geralhd told the hobgoblin. “We’re going to have to go most the night without any light, so I’m glad we’re not out in the forest.”

Blacknail nodded sagely in response. He didn’t really care, but this sounded like something that important people talked about, and he was definitely important.

“Of course, I’m the leader. I know of many secret hiding places, because I’m amazing.” the hobgoblin replied as he grinned haughtily.

After a brief conversation, Geralhd went to see if there was anything else that needed doing, and Blacknail let him. The humans could take care of themselves, probably. In any case, most of them were expendable, so it didn’t matter.

It quickly grew too dark to see outside. Even the inside of the cave was barely lit by a small flickering fire. As the leader, Blacknail didn’t need to take a turn on watch, so he found somewhere comfortable to curl up and quickly fell asleep.

When he rose early the next morning, the hobgoblin yawned sluggishly and started waking everyone else up. Several of the lazy humans tried to sleep in, but Blacknail didn’t let them. They had things to do, and a horde of murderous bandits to evade!

“Ah, let me sleep just a little more!” Khita whined as she rolled over on her sleeping roll.

Most the bandits had bedrolls or blankets of some sort, even if they didn’t have much more than that. Before fleeing the battle they had grabbed what they could.

“No, I’m the leader. Get up!” Blacknail told her as he kicked her in the back.

“Ow, stop that!” the redhead hissed angrily.

“No, I’m the leader. Get up!” Blacknail repeated happily as he kicked her again.

He was enjoying this aspect of leadership quite a bit. Not only was physical discipline fun, but it was for their own good as well.

“Argh, fine! I’m getting you back for this later, though,” Khita growled grumpily as she sat up and turned to glare at him.

“You can’t get back at me, I’m the leader,” the hobgoblin explained condescendingly. Didn’t she know anything?

“We’ll see about that,” Khita responded as she got up and started rolling her blanket up.

Blacknail left her alone and went to get the next lazy human moving. It only took one blow to wake Elyias up. However, the still drowsy young man took one look at the hobgoblin’s face and yelped in terror. A second kick to the stomach shut him up. Minions were so funny.

After a quick breakfast they were back on the road. Once the sun rose up past the horizon, it became a bright day with little in the way of clouds.

The bandits continued on their trek North for several hours. They saw no sign of pursuers, although a small flock of screeching harpies flew overhead at one point.

They were long gone before Blacknail could string his bow and try to shoot one down. His minions were always complaining about being hungry, and a harpy had a fair bit of meat on it.

As he was walking, Blacknail’s mind was focused on his latest leadership problem. The top of his head was itchy because his horns were growing. They were still only a pair of small bony nubs, but they were definitely getting bigger. It was annoying.

All hobgoblins had horns - or at least Blacknail thought they did - but he kept his filed down so that they didn’t get in the way of wearing hats and stuff. Unfortunately, Blacknail had forgotten his file so he couldn’t get rid of them.

Even worse, none of his human minions had a file either. Blacknail had asked them, and then gone through their bags while they were sleeping, just to be sure they weren’t holding out on him, but he still hadn’t found one.

While Blacknail was scratching his scalp, an uneasy feeling came over him. It started with an itchy sensation like someone was watching him from out of sight, and then his gut twisted slightly to the left. Since he hadn’t recently eaten any strange mushrooms, that meant something was wrong.

The hobgoblin stopped what he was doing and scanned the tree lines on both sides of the road. He didn’t see anything, but the feeling didn’t disappear, so he raised a hand up and signalled for everyone to stop.

Immediately, a surprised man walked right into Blacknail’s back. The man swiftly apologized and backed off, but Blacknail was still annoyed. Most of the humans had completely ignored his signal and were still walking!

“When I have my hand up like this it means you’re supposed to stop!” an infuriated Blacknail explained as he tried to stare everyone down.

“Oh, sorry,” the bandit right behind the hobgoblin replied nervously.

Everyone then slowly came to an uneasy standstill as Blacknail glared at them. Who had trained these humans? They were terrible at everything! They must have been raised by awful masters.

Grumbling to himself, the hobgoblin turned back to the road up ahead and listened carefully. A branch snapped and birds sang, but he didn’t hear anything too out of place or which explained his uneasy feeling.

“What is it?” Geralhd asked nervously.

“Your great leader is not sure,” Blacknail replied contemplatively.

“We have a great leader?” someone muttered.

“It’s probably nothing. The hobgoblin is just being paranoid again,” a bearded bandit then remarked.

“Really, you’re going to question his instincts? Do you think your senses are better than his?” Geralhd countered sarcastically with a voice full of ire.

The bearded man shut up and didn’t reply. Everyone else was quiet, as they waited for their hobgoblin leader to do or say something. After a few seconds of silence, Blacknail tilted his head back and sniffed the air. He smelled nothing unusual, so he began walking forward.

Once he had moved a few dozen feet up ahead, the distracting scent of his stinky human followers disappeared. Blacknail sniffed the air again and then crouched down to press his nose against the dirt. He inhaled the scent of the road for a few seconds as he crawled around in a small circle.

“What is he doing?” someone enquired.

“Er, did you catch a scent?” Geralhd asked as the hobgoblin came to stop and stood up.

“Your glorious leader has found something important!” Blacknail replied as he brushed himself off.

“What?” Khita asked.

The young redhead sounded tired and irritable. It was probably because she wasted so much energy being annoying. She should try and sleep a little more instead of talking so much.

“I found humans!” Blacknail announced gravely.

All the bandits glanced at each other uncertainly. They frowned in confusion and more than a few of them rolled their eyes.

“Er, we know we are humans...” Geralhd remarked.

“No, stupid minions, I mean different humans,” Blacknail countered. “There was a large group of people here less than an hour ago.”

It took the bandits several seconds to consider this, and then they all tried to speak up at the same time.

“Damnation, that could mean anything!” someone cursed.

“What do we do?” a woman asked her fellows. “It’s probably Werrick’s men!”

“We need to know more before we do anything,” the first person replied.

Before the humans could get too loud and waste his time, Blacknail shushed them. They all fell silent immediately at the tone of his voice, and at the sound of his sword leaving its sheath.

“I’m the leader, so I decide what we do!” he told them as he brandished the blade dramatically.

“And what’s that?” the woman asked guardedly.

The other bandits also seemed nervous and unsure of themselves. Luckily, they had a leader to tell them what to do! Blacknail considered his options for a few moments before replying. Completely on his own, he quickly came to the conclusion that he needed to know more before he could decide.

“You all stay here, and try not to die. I’m going to look around,” he ordered his minions.

There were murmurs of disagreement, but Blacknail ignored them. As the leader, his was the only opinion that mattered.

“I’ll come with you!” Khita offered with sudden interest.

“No. If she tries to follow me then stab her,” Blacknail ordered Geralhd as he turned away from his followers.

“Er, sure,” the thin man replied uncertainly.

“I’ll do it for you, if you want,” a bearded bandit offered him.

Blacknail ignored them and headed for the edge of the forest. No one followed him as he slipped into the shadows cast by the branches overhead.

Stealthily, the hobgoblin slipped around trees and bushes. All his senses were alert as he searched the area for signs of any watchers. When he didn’t see anyone, he began paralleling the road.

It was only after several minutes of walking that he detected someone. As Blacknail was climbing over an old rotting log, a rustling sound drew his eyes towards a tree next to the road.

There was a black haired man crouching in the shadows there, where he couldn’t be seen from the road, but where he could still observe anyone approaching from that way. Blacknail instantly recognized him as a sentry. His gear was also too similar to what Werrick’s men wore for it to be a coincidence.

Blacknail crept closer to get a better look. He circled around a thick green bush and hid behind the base of a particularly wide tree. Once there, he spotted a dozen other concealed humans near the road, and there were undoubtedly more that he couldn’t see.

This was an ambush. Werrick’s men were laying in wait, and they were ready to pounce on Blacknail’s party if they went down the road. They obviously already knew that the survivors from Herad’s band were nearby, or they wouldn’t be waiting like this. That meant Blacknail didn’t have much time.

It didn’t look like the first sentry Blacknail had seen was visible to any of the other ambushers. The hobgoblin weighed his options. It was best to retreat as quickly as possible, and killing the sentry might alert someone. However, on the other hand, he really enjoyed murdering people.

He was going to do it. He couldn’t help himself.

Quickly, Blacknail slipped out from behind the tree and closed in on the man. He was absolutely silent as he glided up behind the bandit and drew a dagger. Once close enough, Blacknail lunged forward, cut the man’s throat, and then stabbed him under his ribs. The man barely had time to shiver and gasp before he bled to death in Blacknail’s arms.

To avoid suspicion, Blacknail leaned the corpse up against a tree in an as natural a position as he could, and then hurried back the way he had come. Soon, the enemy would realize that Blacknail’s party wasn’t going to walk into their ambush and they would give chase. The hobgoblin planned on not being around when that happened.

There was a small commotion when Blacknail stepped out of the bushes at the edge of the road. All his companions looked his way and started talking all at once. Blacknail noticed that Khita was seated on the ground and sulking. The bearded bandit from before was standing behind her with a hand on his sword hilt.

The hobgoblin huffed in annoyance and signalled for Geralhd to speak. He was the sub leader after all.

“You’re back, Blacknail. What did you find?” the thin bandit asked nervously.

Blacknail quickly filled everyone in. If they had been nervous before, they quickly grew terrified as the hobgoblin told them what he had seen. By this point, their reaction didn’t surprise the hobgoblin. Had every coward in Herad’s band somehow made their way into this group? The only person who didn’t look afraid was Khita, and that was because she was too dumb to feel proper emotions.

Before anyone could ask Blacknail the predictable and stupid questions that he was always asked at time like this, the hobgoblin growled and stared everyone down. Then, when he had their undivided attention, he explained his plan. It was a good plan.

“We're going to run away,” he told them all.

“I think we should just take their ambush from behind!” Khita suggested enthusiastically. “They’re scum, and we’ll easily cut them to pieces!”

“Shut up, nobody asked you,” Blacknail replied dismissively.

“Where can we go?” the blonde woman asked fearfully. “We can’t go forwards into the ambush, and there is nothing behind us but enemies!”

“We’re already almost out of food! We can’t afford a detour,” another bandit added.

Their reactions annoyed Blacknail. It wasn’t a minion’s place to question the boss.

“Shut up!” Blacknail hissed. “I’m the leader, and I say we’re running, so let’s go.”

The hobgoblin’s angry tone caused several people to step away from him. They eyed each other nervously but none of them started moving.

“Let’s go!” Blacknai repeated furiously. Why weren’t they moving?

‘Um, where are we running to? You haven’t told us yet,” Geralhd politely pointed out.

“Oh, right. We’re going into the forest,” the hobgoblin explained. “I’ll lead us around the ambush.”

“Can you do that?” someone asked doubtfully.

“Yes, easily,” Blacknail replied with complete sincerity.

He wouldn’t have any problem going around the ambush. It was everyone else that would have difficulty. They weren’t nearly as sneaky as he was, and they were dumb. Half of them would probably fall into a hole or something; the same hole, all at once.

“I guess we don’t have much of a choice,” Geralhd admitted. “Every other option is worse.”

“You really don’t; I’m the leader,” Blacknail agreed.

The hobgoblin then quickly got everyone moving. They didn’t have much time so he herded them towards the forest. Once they were all off the road, Blacknail took the lead again.

No one spoke as they hiked through the woods. With all the overhanging branches and bushes nearby, everyone was afraid of being overheard by someone out of sight. Only Blacknail had any idea in which direction the enemy lay.

They had just walked down into a small muddy gully when they heard shouting from back on the road. Everyone stopped and looked in that direction.

“They’re on to us! We need to move before they find our tracks or get our scent,” Blacknail ordered his followers.

“They won’t be able to track us by scent,” Geralhd replied. “People can’t do that.”

“Not even if they put their noses really close to the ground and take really deep breaths?” the hobgoblin asked uncertainly.

“No.”

“Humans are so useless,” Blacknail remarked disdainfully as he shook his head. “Why do you even have noses?”

No one replied, so the hobgoblin picked up his speed. Everyone else struggled to follow him up the other side of the gully, but it didn’t take them very long to reach the top.

Blacknail wanted to move at a faster pace but some of the humans were frustratingly slow. He considered leaving them behind, but decided against it for now. He could always abandon them later.

After fleeing through the forest for a bit less than half an hour, Blacknail began to hear sounds of pursuit. Someone had found their trail and was following it.

The hobgoblin eyed his minions and considered his options. As he watched, one person near the back tripped over an exposed root and fell. Blacknail sighed as they quickly got back up. He was going to have to do something.

Why was it always him that had to take action? Chieftains weren’t supposed to be the ones doing all the work. That was contrary to the entire point! He was obviously spoiling his minions rotten.

“We’re being followed. Keep going forward and I’ll deal with it,” Blacknail explained as he turned and started heading back.

“I’ll go with you!” Khita suggested.

“No, you’re slow,” Blacknail quickly replied.

“You’re not letting me do anything!” she whined in response. “I want to fight.”

Instead of replying, Blacknail turned to look meaningfully at the person behind her. It was the bearded bandit from before.

“Stab her if she tries to follow you?” the man guessed.

Blacknail nodded happily before walking away. It was possible to teach grown humans new tricks!

The rest of the survivors from Herad’s band headed deeper into the forest, and they soon were out of sight. Blacknail backtracked for a few moments before spotting a hiding spot at the base of a large rock surrounded by bushes.

As he moved towards it, he pulled his bow off his back and strung it. He then crouched down and started waiting. The enemy would be arriving soon and the hobgoblin planned to be ready for them.











ITG 6











It didn’t take long for the sound of footsteps to reach Blacknail’s pointy green ears. He listened with patient excitement as he crouched in his hiding spot between a boulder and a clump of bushes. It was almost time to begin the game.

Blacknail peeked out from behind a screen of leaves as three enemies walked into view. The trio was moving carefully and keeping an eye out for their quarry. At least one of them was a trained scout because they were easily following the trail that Blacknail’s group had left.

All three of the men looked like Werrick’s minions. They had rough dirty armor and they were armed to the teeth. Their faces were weathered and hard looking. These were men who had seen more than their fair share of fighting and were looking for more.

However, only one of them had a bow and it wasn’t strung. As he studied his prey, Blacknail could hear more enemies approaching from behind. These first three men were just the enemies’ vanguard.

“Have you noticed anything weird about some of the tracks?” one of the scouts asked his fellows.

“No, why?” the lead man replied as he looked down at the ground.

“I uh... I’ve heard that the Killer of Men might be in among the group we’re tracking,” the first speaker admitted nervously.

“The hobgoblin? He’s just a tall tale meant to frighten townies. You don’t really believe in magic talking hobgoblins, do you?” the third man interjected scornfully.

“No, of course not... I’m just telling you what I heard.”

“Well, there’s nothing strange about any of the signs I’ve seen. They all look human to me, although if the Killer of Men is wearing boots then it might be hard to tell,” the lead man joked.

All three of the enemy bandits chuckled among themselves, although the one man still looked more than a little anxious. Nearby, Blacknail joined in the laughter and cackled gleefully. It was funny because it was true.

“Um, who is that?” the nervous man asked.

His eyes had gone wide with fear as soon as he realized someone else was there. Before either of his companions could respond though, Blacknail rose from his hiding place and shot the lead scout in the chest. There was a hollow thump as the arrow sunk into flesh. 

As the other men jerked backwards in shock, Blacknail swirled around and dashed away with startling speed. The hobgoblin used the bushes as cover and swerved behind a tree. Instead of trying to catch up with Geralhd and the others, he took off to the side.

The hobgoblin’s plan was to distract and delay the enemy. He knew he could run much faster through the forest than a bunch of clumsy humans. He would lead them on a futile chase for a while before circling back.

Once out of sight, Blacknail couldn’t help but start laughing. The hunt was on! The thought caused excitement to course through the hobgoblin and it quickened his blood. The hobgoblin’s laugh twisted into a chilling inhuman howl.

The dreadful sound echoed through the forest. Blacknail could only imagine the sweet fear it was stirring inside the hearts of the humans who thought they were chasing him. Soon, they would know how very wrong they were.

After a few seconds, Blacknail started to grow red in the face. Unfortunately, it was hard to breathe and laugh at the same time. He had to stop and focus on running.

To his surprise, just as he fell silent, an answering howl rose above the forest from off in the distance. Was it an echo, or had something answered his challenge?  Well, whatever it was, it would have to wait. The angry humans chasing him were the priority now.

Soon, the sound of his own heavy breathing filled Blacknail’s ears as he ran through the forest. After almost half an hour of running and stopping, he was beginning to tire out.

Somewhere close behind him, the enemy bandits were still in hot pursuit. That was the point though; he wanted them to chase him. He could have lost the enemy a long time ago if he had wanted to. They were only human.

Blacknail came to a stop again and turned to look over his shoulder. Off in the distance, he saw a small swarm of enemies running towards him through the trees. They looked sort of mad. Maybe it was because he had purposely led them through several thick clumps of thorn bushes and more than a few large mud pits?

After catching his breath for a moment, Blacknail decided that he was far enough away now. It would be a bad idea to leave his minions leaderless for too long, so he should probably turn back. Who knew what trouble they would get into without him?

“Goodbye, smelly humans. Thanks for chasing me!” Blacknail yelled before dashing away.

Instead of goofing around like before, he immediately went full out. With startling speed, the hobgoblin ran back towards his minions, and left his pursuers behind.

Trees zipped by as Blacknail sprinted through the forest. A small creek appeared in front of him and he effortlessly jumped right across it without slowing down. He kept up the hurried pace until he stumbled upon the first sign of his allies passing.

After stopping for a single moment to make sure he was going in the right direction, he took off again and headed deeper into the woods. Hopefully, his minions had kept going straight. He had specifically ordered them to, but then again they were all a bunch of morons.

In front of Blacknail, the ground began to slop upwards and grow rockier. He had to swerve around several large grey rocks that jutted forth from the earth. Eventually, after several more minutes of running, he spotted Geralhd and the others.

A rocky cliff face loomed up ahead. It was almost a hundred feet high and incredibly steep. Only a few stunted bushes grew on its face, but it was crowned by a line of trees where the forest continued up above. A single winding path ran up to the top. It looked like a difficult climb.

Geralhd and others had stopped near the base of the cliff and were arguing amongst each other. Scamp and Imp were sitting off to one side and they looked bored.

“We need to hurry up and start climbing. We have no time to waste!” Geralhd exclaimed angrily.

“I’m not climbing that; we’d be easy targets, like frogs on a log! We should go around,” a large bandit countered.

“Get climbing, now!” Blacknail shouted sternly as he jogged up behind them.

Everyone flinched and turned to look Blacknail’s way. When they saw the angry look on his face, they all immediately started moving. The hobgoblin took up the rear as they formed a line, so that he could punish any stragglers. They needed to hurry!

As they ascended, rocks were knocked loose by people’s boots. The stones made a lot of noise as they rolled down the cliff. Blacknail looked down. It was already quite a ways to the ground. Falling would be bad.

Around two-thirds of the way to the top, the bandits’ progress suddenly stopped. There was a break in the path that couldn’t be walked over. The next section could be reached via a short climb, but only one person could do it at a time.

As Blacknail watched impatiently, Geralhd reached out for a handhold and began pulling himself up. Everyone else was forced to wait for him.

Geralhd reached the top and Khita started climbing, but Blacknail grew frustrated by the sluggish pace. Even humans should be faster than this. They didn’t have all day!

“Climb faster!” he hissed at the man in front of him.

“I can’t; it’s not even my turn yet,” the man replied angrily.

This statement of the obvious annoyed Blacknail. He knew that, but why did his minions have to make everything so complicated? They should just do as they were told.

Movement down below at the base of the incline drew the hobgoblin’s attention. People were stepping out of the trees and gathering at the bottom of the cliff. There were at least three dozen of them and they were obviously Werrick’s men. Why would anyone else be out in this part of the woods?

“Slimy harpy spit,” Blacknail swore.

His plan had been for his party to be on top of the cliff when the enemy showed up. That way they could just throw rocks down on anyone chasing them. The hobgoblin’s lazy minions had ruined that great idea, though.

Down below, a black-haired man of medium build raised a hand and signalled towards Blacknail’s location. He had a goatee and his hair was slicked back with grease. A few seconds later, he shouted something and led a charge up the cliff path.

“Damnation, what do we do?” one of Blacknail’s men asked.

There were still a dozen men stuck on the lower part of the cliff path and the enemy would be upon them in under a minute. There was nowhere they could escape to, and down below three of Werrick’s men held back and started stringing bows.

“Don’t just stand there. At least throw something at them!” Blacknail hissed as he pulled his own bow off his back.

A few of the bandits next to Blacknail immediately leaped to obey. They grabbed large rocks from off the ground and hurled them down at the attackers charging up the path. It barely slowed the enemy, but it was better than nothing.

Meanwhile, Blacknail had already nocked an arrow and let it loose. The projectile whirred through the air and into one of the unsuspecting archer’s chests. He had been busy prepping his own weapon and hadn’t even been looking up.

As the wounded archer collapsed, Blacknail was already pulling out another arrow from the quiver one of his minions was carrying. He nocked it and took aim again. He fired off his second shot just as the enemy archers let loose. The arrows zoomed past each other as they flew through the air.

“Eep,” Blacknail cried as he covered his head and ducked low. The ugly pink bastards had both aimed at him!

The enemy’s two projectiles buzzed over his head and slammed into the cliff face behind him. There was a loud cracking sound as one of them bounced off a rock and then hit his leg. The impact stung but it didn’t draw blood.

Blacknail ignored the pain and glanced back towards the archers. The hobgoblin grinned when he saw that one of them had fallen on his ass and had an arrow sticking out of his arm. That left only one still standing, but the hobgoblin didn’t have time to worry about him. He dropped his bow and drew his sword.

He was just in time; the goateed enemy leader was approaching quickly. With startling speed, he dashed ahead of his comrades and raised his blade up above his head. Before anyone but Blacknail could react, the man then slashed at the bandit standing next to the hobgoblin.

There was a loud metallic clang as Blacknail extended his own weapon and blocked the attack. The hobgoblins’ hands shook under the force of the blow, and he gritted his teeth. The goateed man’s strength and speed were too high for a normal human; he had to be a Slosher.

“Stinky troll piss,” Blackail cursed as he eyed his new opponent.

The man looked surprised for a second and then smiled as he stepped back. The smug taunting grin on his face irritated Blacknail. The hobgoblin hated fighting Sloshers. In a fair fight, human swordsmen were already a pain to deal with, even when they didn’t use Elixir.

“So, you can talk. I hadn’t thought that was true,” the goateed man remarked as he raised his sword and took a defensive stance.

As he was doing this, the rest of the enemy fighters caught up to him. The cliff path they were all standing on was only wide enough for three or four people and the footing was treacherous, so most of them held back. Only a few of them could engage the closest of Blacknail’s minions.

“No, you’re stupid,” Blacknail replied as fighting broke out around him.

It was a terrible rebuttal, but it was the only thing that had come to mind. He was under a lot of pressure! The comment certainly didn’t impress the enemy Slosher. The man smirked and gave the hobgoblin a condescending look.

When Blacknail hissed angrily back, the Vessel attacked with a whip-like slash at his face. The hobgoblin was startled but barely managed to dodge to the side.

The man attacked again, and as Blacknail blocked the blow with his own sword he growled hatefully. Attacking while the enemy was distracted was his thing!  The hobgoblin was going to enjoy killing this man. He was infuriating!

The hobgoblin snarled and slashed at his opponent. He wished he’d taken the time to drink some Elixir. He only had one vial left, but it wouldn’t do him any good if he was dead.

The two fighters exchanged blows and manoeuvred around as much as their tight surroundings would allow. Neither one of them wanted to collide with the other bandits who were fighting nearby or to stumble and fall off the ledge. It was a long way down and the rocks looked pointy.

It soon became apparent that the goateed Slosher was stronger than Blacknail, even if their speed was almost the same. His blows were forcing the hobgoblin on the defensive, and there was nowhere to fall back to.

“Is this all you got? I’m disappointed!” the Slosher remarked as he pressed his advantage.

“Just wait. I’ve killed many Vessels like you,” Blacknail hissed back as he defended himself.

This was true, but ignored the fact that none of those men had been killed in fair fights, and this contest was looking to be way too even for the hobgoblin’s comfort. He had to think up some way to cheat!

To Blacknail’s left, one of the attackers fell off the ledge and began to roll down the cliff. The man had been locked in a sword fight until he’d lost his balance. Now, he screamed as he hit jagged rocks and they tore into him.

Blacknail ducked under a slash aimed at his head and counterattacked. His blade sliced through the air towards his opponent’s front foot, but the man stepped back out of the way.

Someone bumped into Blacknail from behind, and he was forced to take an awkward step forward to catch his balance. The goateed man was quick to take advantage of this stumble. He lunged forward and slashed at Blacknail’s exposed arm.

The hobgoblin could only lean back clumsily out of the way, and it wasn’t enough. The man’s blade caught on Blacknail’s sleeve and sliced through it. It cut into the flesh beneath and drew blood before coming free.

Hissing in pain, Blacknail flinched and stepped back. He forced his throbbing arm to keep a steady grip on his sword’s hilt, and he quickly raised his blade defensively again. He couldn’t afford a moment of weakness. A single mistake would lead to his death.

To either side, other bandits were fighting, even if the thin pathway meant everyone was pressed tightly together. Most of Werrick’s troops couldn’t get near the melee. They formed several ranks as they waited for an opening. Behind Blacknail,  around ten of his companions were still waiting to climb across the break in the path. Even when Blacknail’s turn came, he couldn't cross while under attack. The next time anything like this happened Blacknail was going to make sure the leader got to escape first!

“I’d heard you were a tricky fighter, but you honestly don’t seem like anything special,” his opponent observed condescendingly. “You’re just an ugly green beast waving around a bit of metal in imitation of a person.”

The tone of the man’s voice caused anger to roar to life within Blacknail’s guts. Screw escaping, he really wanted to kill this guy! He just needed an opening, a good one.

“At least I’m not pink and fat!” Blacknail hissed back.

The goateed Slosher attacked again with a flurry of strikes. Blacknail tried to slip past and get a blow of his own in, but he was forced to block an attack and was knocked back.

As he was scheming his next move, Blacknail noticed a green blur out of the corner of his eye.  Both he and his opponent glanced down to see a goblin jump up onto a nearby rock. It was Imp, and there was something in his hand.

“What’s this?” the Slosher mumbled in confusion as he kept one eye on Blacknail.

As they watched, the goblin hurled something up into the air over their heads. It was a crystal, and odd light flickered out from it as it landed in the middle of the enemy’s ranks.

“Oh, shit,” the goateed man remarked as he realized what he had just seen.

Blacknail didn’t bother to respond. He swirled around, crouched down low, and pulled his cloak tightly about himself. The hobgoblin recognized magic when he saw it, and there was only one possible outcome of it when goblins were involved.

He was just in time. There was a deafening boom as the crystal exploded. A wave of force washed over everyone and a storm of dark crystal shards quickly followed. The crystalline blades sliced into anyone in their path, and more than a dozen of Werrick’s men were thrown over the ledge by the blast.

Screams filled the air as bodies fell and flesh was torn. Blood splattered against the rocks and its tangy scent filled the air. In just over a second, the enemy formation had been smashed. Bodies littered the ground. Blacknail smiled as he climbed back to his feet.

“Ha, I always have a trick, even if I don’t know about it yet,” he then bragged smugly.

There was a smile on Blacknail’s face as he took in the sight before him. Who was laughing now! He had shown them! Imp had also helped a little.

“I always win!” the hobgoblin laughed.

However, the grin slipped from Blacknails lips as the enemy Vessel stood back up and glared at him. What was this? The explosion hadn’t done more than stun the man. That wasn’t fair.

The goateed man wasn’t alone either; almost half the enemies on the ledge started to climb to their feet. As impressive as the explosion and crystal shrapnel had been, the enemies closest to the blast had absorbed most of the damage.

Blacknail’s group was still outnumbered and cornered. Also, the enemy Vessel looked really mad now. Maybe Imp had another crystal?

The hobgoblin threw a look over his shoulder. Imp had taken advantage of the confusion to cut in line and climb up over the break in the path. The little traitor had run away!

“What in all the burning hells was that? Never mind, you die now,” the enemy Slosher suddenly spat as he leapt forward to cross swords with Blacknail again.








ITG 7









As the fighting continued around him on the narrow path leading up the cliff, Blacknail raised his blade and lowered his center of gravity. He kept his weight balanced mostly on his back foot as the goateed Vessel lunged forward and slashed at him. There was a metallic ringing as the hobgoblin blocked the blow with a slash of his own.

The impact almost knocked Blacknail over. His lips curled up into a snarl as he struggled not to give ground. He had been hoping his enemy would still be too stunned to attack with his full force, but that was obviously not the case.

With a wordless cry full of hate and determination, the human Slosher pressed forward. His weight and power pushed the smaller hobgoblin back an arm’s length. As Blacknail recovered, the man launched a brutal series of sword strikes from every direction.

Each blow was stronger than the last and harder to stop. Blacknail’s opponent was now obviously burning Elixir without holding back. The clang of steel hitting steel rang out repeatedly, and Blacknail knew he was in trouble. He was fighting as hard as he could and using every ounce of power he could summon from within himself, but he couldn’t keep this up. If only he had taken the time to down some Elixir of his own!

“I’m going to carve my name in your hide!” the enemy bandit roared.

The shout was quickly followed by a wide swing from the left that smashed Blacknail’s guard aside. The hobgoblin stumbled, and the goateed Slosher raised his blade up in preparation to strike again.

A cold feeling of inevitability filled Blacknail as he watched the blade descend, but then one of the hobgoblin’s allies dove in from the side. The goateed man was forced to turn away from Blacknail for a second and block the newcomer’s attack.

A vicious toothy grin appeared on Blacknail’s lips as he took advantage of the distraction. He stepped forward and stabbed at the man’s exposed ribs.

The enemy Slosher saw the blow coming, but instead of trying to block it he took a deep breath and turned to look directly at Blacknail. Raw fury shone in the man’s eyes as he exhaled a searing burst of red flames.

The fireball shot towards Blacknail’s head. Instinctively, the hobgoblin raised his arms to shield his face and fell backwards. A wave of heat washed over him, and his ass hit the rocky ground with a painful thump.

Blacknail hissed in pain. His long experience with humans told him that they didn’t normally breathe fire.  It must be a Vessel power. Why didn’t he have a cool ability like that? 

The hobgoblin opened his eyes to see that his sleeves were on fire. Hurriedly, he smacked them against his pants until they went out.

“I hate doing that,” the enemy Slosher admitted bitterly as he kicked Blacknail’s surprised ally aside. “It burns far too much Elixir, and it tastes like ash.”

The man then turned towards Blacknail and raised his sword again. That was when the hobgoblin realized he had dropped his sword. Not good. The cliff edge to the hobgoblin’s right prevented him from rolling that way, and there were people to his left and behind him.

With a victorious grin, the enemy slashed down at Blacknail. The blade cut through the air, and then there was a loud crack as a rock smashed into the man’s head. Blacknail blinked. The Slosher’s eyes rolled up into his head until the whites showed.  In slow motion, he fell sideways and rolled off the ledge and out of sight.

“Huh, that’s good,” Blacknail said as he stared disbelievingly at the empty space his opponent had been occupying until a moment ago.

The hobgoblin shook his head to clear it, and he looked up towards the source of the rock. The top of the cliff was empty. There was no one there.

None of Blacknail’s companions were anywhere near the spot that the rock had fallen from. They were in the opposite direction, on the far side of the pathway. Had the falling rock come loose on its own? That seemed unlikely...

The fall of their leader didn’t go unnoticed by the other enemy bandits. Their lead elements took a step back and stopped fighting, so that they could revaluate the situation. Most of them looked stunned.

Sensing weakness, Blacknail grabbed his fallen sword and rose to his feet. He brandished the blade as he growled menacingly as deeply as he could. It was bluffing time.

The hobgoblin’s aggressive move shook the remaining enemies’ spirit. The closest ones flinched and instinctively took a step back. Fear and uncertainly was plain on their faces.

“Time to feast!” Blacknail cackled as two of his minions took up position next to him and raised their blades.

“Let’s finish these scum sacs,” one of them suggested in a sinister tone.

Werrick’s men wavered. They didn’t know what to do. Nervously, one of the men at the front rank took a step back. It looked like they were going to run, which was good since Blacknail was exhausted. Continuing the fight would be risky.

“Hold your ground! We still outnumber the freaks,” a tall man said as he pushed his way to the front.

This new human was wearing chainmail shirt and was holding a two-handed war-axe. He was bald, and he looked particularly stupid when the rock dropped onto his head. With a hollow plunk, the man collapsed limply onto the ground and dropped his weapon. Everyone looked up, but there was still no one there.

“Curse this mess!” one of Werrick’s men swore as he turned and started pushing his way through his allies.

The rest of the enemies quickly did the same, and their formation dissolved into chaos. They fought amongst themselves as they fled down the cliff and back towards the ground. Blacknail and his companions watched them go.

“Ha, I win!” the hobgoblin bragged loudly as he puffed up his chest. He always won, even if he wasn’t always sure how. He was amazing like that.

“What just happened?” a confused voice enquired.

“Did someone race ahead to the top of the cliff and drop that rock?” another bandit asked as he looked up.

“No, there hasn’t been enough time. This side of the way is tough going,” Geralhd yelled from the other side of the break in the path.

“That’s weird. Maybe the gods are finally smiling down on us?” the man standing next to Blacknail suggested with a cheerfulness born of exhaustion.

“Well, if there’s anything up there we’ll see it soon,” Geralhd speculated.

“I just can’t believe we made it out of that alive. Let’s get the hells out of here” Elyias suggested.

“We survived because I’m such a great leader. Look at all the foes we beat, and we didn’t even lose anyone! I’m the best leader ever,” Blacknail celebrated as he grinned at the bodies of Werrick’s fallen men.

“We lost Marcus. He was cut down in the melee, and his corpse is right there,” Geralhd responded as he pointed towards the man’s body.

“Except for him,” the hobgoblin corrected himself. “And one person barely counts anyway.”

Every leader lost a minion here and there, even the best ones. Minions were like that, and Marcus hadn’t been important. Blacknail didn’t even remember him, since so many humans looked the same.

Since it was possible that the enemy could return with reinforcements at any time, Blacknail and the other bandits hurriedly climbed over to the other side of the path. As Geralhd had pointed out, the way past it was rough going. They had to scrabble over rocks and up inclines to reach the top.

It was hard work but they soon made their way to the top without any further incidents. This time Blacknail went first, just in case. While he sat down and took a break, the person after him helped the others up.

The forest continued on the top of the cliff. There was a thick line of bushes on the edge of the forest, where the sunlight got through, and then row after row of trees after that.

Down below the heights, the leaves of the trees looked like a green sea. Blacknail could see the river and the bridge they had used to cross it off in the distance. From up this high, he could see for miles.

“Let’s take a break here,” Geralhd suggested as the last man was pulled up to the top. It was Elyias, and he was still carrying Blacknail’s bags.

“Yep, sounds good, and that was my plan anyway, since I’m such an amazing leader,” Blacknail replied before yawning.

Exhausted from the fight and the climb, everyone settled down to rest. Packs and bags were put down, and flasks of water were passed around as people quenched their thirst. Most of the bandits looked out over the cliff at the view that stretched out before them.

“Thank the gods that we made it. I thought I was going to die! ” Elyias remarked in relief. “Do you think those bastards will chase us?”

“Eh, this cliff is easy to defend and it stretches a fair way in both directions. They’d be fools to try and go around it through the Green,” one of the female bandits replied.

“True, but what do we do now?” Geralhd mused aloud. “We can’t go back to the road and we’re almost out of supplies.”

There was a few seconds of silence as everyone digested this unwelcome bit of information. No one could think of a reply. Eventually, it was Geralhd that broke the silence again.

“We’ll have to find a trail and follow it North. It will be tough, but Blacknail should be able to keep us going in the right direction and find us enough food to get by,” he said.

“Of course, Blacknail can. We have nothing to worry about,” Khita exclaimed confidently.  “Blacknail’s a hobgoblin and was trained by Saeter himself. He’s like the best scout ever!”

“That will take weeks of hiking through the Green!” Elyias protested. “Trying that without real meals sounds like nothing but a slow death to me, and who knows what we’ll run into out there!”

“We don’t have much of a choice. You’re welcome to choose a fast death, though,” a bearded bandit replied as he gestured significantly towards the cliff.

Elyias looked over the edge and at the rocks below, before stepping back away and slumping down into a sitting position in defeat.

“That’s what I thought,” the bearded man remarked disdainfully.

“Maybe we should ask Blacknail what he thinks,” Khita proposed.

At her words, everyone turned to look towards Blacknail. The hobgoblin was lying on the ground and using a knapsack as a pillow, but he noticed the attention and perked up.

“We will find a trail and go north,” he told his minions as he met their gazes.

He had only vaguely been paying attention, and he hadn’t really been planning anything, but Geralhd’s idea seemed fine.

No one had anything more to say to Blacknail, so after a few more minutes of rest, he got up to look at the nearby bushes. Staring at the view over the cliff had gotten boring.

Before he reached the shrubs at the edge of the woods, there was suddenly a rustling noise from within them. Blacknail froze as a stone spear abruptly erupted from the undergrowth and stopped an inch from his face.

“Uh oh,” the hobgoblin noted loudly as he stared cross-eyed at the weapon’s tip.

His voice drew his minions’ attention and most of them looked his way, just in time to see a swarm of goblins launch themselves out of the bushes towards them.

There was a loud outburst of inventive cursing as the bandits rose to their feet and reached for their weapons, but they were too slow. The goblins were upon them almost instantly. The green horde overran the humans, and a mass of stone tipped spears prodded the unarmed bandits away from their gear and towards the cliff.

Blacknail took a careful step back from the weapon that was hovering in front of his eyes, just as the snarling hobgoblin that was holding it emerged from the undergrowth.

“Ah, this makes sense,” Blacknail observed as he connected the mental dots. He had been wondering where those falling rocks from before had come from. Now he knew.

“Fuck me, we’re all damned!” Elyias whined hysterically as he dodged the stab of a goblin spear.

“Everyone hold still, and try not to provoke them,” Geralhd ordered everyone with uncharacteristic firmness before turning to Blacknail.

The humans had been pushed together by the swarm of gibbering goblins. They were surrounded except for where their backs were facing the empty air that lay over the cliff ledge. Fear and desperation was plain on their faces.

The goblins were mostly nude but a few of them were wearing loinclothes. Primitive bracelets and necklaces made from bits of string, beads, and feathers were common decorations.

The snarling hobgoblin leading them was also wearing a loincloth made of animal skin. Blacknail was instantly reminded of the last hobgoblin he had fought. Like that one, this one had messy grey hair and two black horns. His horns were much smaller and didn’t branch off like antlers, though. He also looked younger and wasn’t covered in scars.

“Are they hostile? What are they saying?” Geralhd urgently asked Blacknail. He sounded terrified.

“How would I know? It sounds like stupid grunting to me,” Blacknail responded crossly. “I’m not from here.”

This didn’t cheer anyone up.

“I don’t think they want to kill us,” Khita remarked.

“It’s a hobgoblin and a swarm of bloody goblins! Of course, they fucking want to murder us,” another bandit countered furiously. “I’ve heard this story; it ends with us in cook pot.”

“Blacknail’s a hobgoblin and he’s not our enemy,” Khita pointed out as she stared with great interest at the goblin poking at her with a spear.

“That’s right, Blacknail! You’re the leader, do something.” Geralhd told him fervently.

In response, Blacknail straightened up. Geralhd was right; he was the leader, so he had to do something. It was time for him to take charge and face danger head on.

A stern look appeared on Blacknail’s face as he stared at the hobgoblin in front of him. Uncowed, the hobgoblin returned the gaze and snarled menacingly. Blacknail didn’t respond. Instead, as everyone watched, he reached out and slowly pushed the spear aimed at his face aside.

The feral hobgoblin just continued to stare hatefully at Blacknail. Their eyes were locked as they regarded each other with careful consideration. Then, Blacknail hissed and stepped forward. For a split second, the feral hobgoblin hesitated at the unexpected move.

Seizing his chance, Blacknail sprang into action. He growled fearlessly as he raised a fist and smacked the hobgoblin over the head with it. There was a quiet thump, and the feral hobgoblin whined before collapsing onto the ground into a subordinate kneeling position. The goblins all went completely still.

Blacknail stood over his defeated opponent and bragged, “There, now I’m the goblin chief!”

No one said anything for several long seconds. They stared at the two hobgoblins with various mixed and complex expressions. Disbelief was common. So was confusion.

“That’s it?” Khita asked with incredulity. “You’re not going to fight?”

Blacknail turned and gave the redhead a condescending look.

“Why would we? I know him,” he told her.

“What, how?” Geralhd asked as one of his eyes twitched.

“I just do. I ran into this tribe before and beat some sense into them. The hobgoblin was just a goblin then, though,” Blacknail replied as he eyed the hobgoblin at his feet suspiciously. He recognized the the hobgoblin's scent. It was the same as a grey-haired goblin that had served as one of Blacknail's chief subordinates for a while.

What was he supposed to do with a hobgoblin minion? He had met one other hobgoblin before, and that encounter had immediately ended in a duel to the death. Blacknail suspected that all hobgoblins were kind of jerks.

Well, he couldn’t be worse than Khita, and he would undoubtedly be more useful. Blacknail would just have to keep an eye on him.

“So we’re not going to die?” Elyias asked with desperate unbelieving hope.

“Not unless you want to,” Blacknail replied dismissively.

Elyias had gone totally white with fear, but color started to reappear on his face. Blacknail ignored him and scratched his head where his horns were irritating his skin. He wasn’t sure what his next move was.

“Er, could you do something about these goblins?” Geralhd politely interjected.

“Oh, right,” Blacknail replied as he turned away from the prostate hobgoblin.

The goblins that were holding Geralhd and the others hostage were quickly dispersed with a little hand waving and angry yelling by Blacknail. They chattered senselessly as they scattered in all directions and then reformed closer to their old leader. With curious expressions, they carefully watched Blacknail interact with the humans.

Once no longer under immediate threat, the survivors of Herad’s band quickly moved to re-arm themselves and gather their gear. The humans then formed up into a defensive formation and started talking amongst themselves.

“So... um, what do the goblins want?” Geralhd asked Blacknail as he turned away from the others.

It took Blacknail a few seconds to come up with an answer to that question, and he blinked in surprise. It was like Geralhd was trying to be as confusing and stupid as possible.

“They want what I want them to want. I’m the chief now,” he replied patronizingly.

“Hmm, but why did they attack us?” Geralhd enquired.

“They’re goblins; this is their territory,” Blacknail explained. He was quickly losing patience.

Geralhd didn’t look any less confused or afraid after Blacknail’s answer. He opened his mouth to ask something else, but Blacknail ignored him and walked back to the other hobgoblin. He didn’t want to answer any more pointless questions.

The feral hobgoblin had gotten off his knees while Blacknail had been talking, but his eyes immediately shifted downwards in submission when Blacknail looked his way. He clearly didn’t want to fight.

As Blacknail approached, the feral hobgoblin grumbled something incomprehensible. Blacknail had no idea what it meant, but it didn’t really matter since he was in charge.

“I shall call you Gob. That’s a great name,” Blacknail remarked before motioning vaguely towards the forest and starting to walk again.

The goblins quickly fell in line behind him as he stepped into the trees.

“Hey, where are you going?” Geralhd called out in surprise.

“To the goblin’s den,” Blacknail explained without turning around.

“What! You’re just going to leave us here?” Khita asked.

Blacknail sighed in frustration before turning back to glare at the humans. Why were they so slow?

“No, you have to follow me! I’m the leader,” he reminded them. How could they not understand this?

“I’m not going anywhere with a swarm of wild goblins!” one of the bandit exclaimed fearfully in reply.

“The very idea is insane.” Elyias added hysterically. “We have to leave, now!”

There was a general mutterings of agreement from most the other humans. They were still looking at the goblins with poorly disguised hostility and fear.

“They have food and a place to rest,” Blacknail pointed out.

There was silence as everyone considered this. Blacknail didn’t wait for a response. He started walking again and pushed his way through the bushes into the forest proper. The grey haired hobgoblin followed after him and so did the goblins.

After a few minutes of walking, Blacknail glanced over his shoulder.  His human minions had decided to follow him after all, but they were keeping a generous distance between themselves and the goblins.

“This is the stupidest thing I’ve ever heard of,” a female bandit announced. “Even the morons you hear about in campfire horror stories weren’t dumb enough to follow two hobgoblins and a tribe of goblins into the Green. We’re so going to die horribly.”

“So, stay here then, coward. I’m following Blacknail,” Khita remarked confidently.

“As long as they fatten us up before they eat us then I’ll die happy,” the bearded bandit added.

“I’m sure Blacknail isn’t going to betray us. He’s always been a loyal and stalwart comrade,” Geralhd added in an attempt to reassure the others. “I’m sure he has a plan.”

It took a few more minutes of walking for Blacknail to realize that he had no idea where he was going, so he gestured for the feral hobgoblin to take the lead. It also had the advantage of placing Gob where he could be easily watched; even being around him put Blacknail on edge. No one with a lick of sense would ever trust a hobgoblin.







ITG 8










After the goblin’s ambush, the trek through the forest was uneventful. The feral hobgoblin led the way for around half an hour, and they soon emerged from out of the trees into an overgrown clearing full of thick bushes that were too tall to see over.

Blacknail instantly recognized the area. The main road wasn’t too far from here. Last year, during his trip to Daggerpoint he had been attacked by the hobgoblin that had ruled this territory. After a long brutal fight to the death where Blacknail had been forced to use all his impressive cunning and skill, he’d then had to stop and rest with the local tribe for a while before moving on.

Gob hadn’t been around then. Blacknail eyed the hobgoblin suspiciously out of the corner of his eye. Gob must have been a mere goblin during Blacknail’s last visit, and only transformed into a hobgoblin after Blacknail had left to catch up with Herad and Saeter.

Well, the important thing was that the tribe should have plenty of food. Blacknail had spent a fair amount of time teaching the goblins here how to trap animals and smoke meat. If the stupid little critters had already forgotten his lessons then Blacknail was going to be very mad. One way or another, they were going to be providing him with as much food as he wanted to eat.

A breeze swept through the trees as Blacknail began to push his way through the bushes in front of him. His new goblin followers were right behind him, but a sudden low growl which was followed by a fearful yelp stopped his advance. He turned around to see what was happening and sighed. It was probably something dumb and annoying. His minions had problems with even the simplest instructions.

The people behind Blacknail had stopped moving. Gob was growling menacingly at Geralhd while standing in his way. The humans had backed away from the suddenly hostile hobgoblin and were looking nervous. Their posture was tense and a few of them had started to reach for their weapons. Scamp and Imp stood off to the side and watched.

“What now?” Blacknail mumbled to himself as he walked back to see what all the commotion was about. It didn’t look like Gob was going to attack anyone but he was obviously upset about something.

“What did you do?” Blacknail called out to Geralhd. 

“Nothing, he just won’t let us pass!” the young man replied with obvious exasperation.

As if in response, Gob growled again and glared at Geralhd menacingly. The hobgoblin wasn’t brandishing his weapon though, so Blacknail carefully observed the situation for a few moments before a possible explanation occurred to him.

“Ah, you need to bow!” Blacknail declared with sudden understanding as he met Geralhd’s gaze. It all made sense now.

“What?”

The hobgoblin ranger rolled his eyes. How could anyone possibly survive long enough to reach adulthood without knowing this sort of thing? It was so basic.

“Gob is angry because you’re strangers. You need to join the tribe before he’ll let you near his lair.”

“And how do we do that?” Geralhd asked.

“Bow before me, your great leader, like Gob did before.”

Why did he have to explain this? It was really obvious and he had just answered this question a second ago.

“I’m not doing that,” a blonde woman replied as she grimaced distastefully.

“There must be an easier way to show him that we’re not a threat,” Geralhd remarked.

“Sometimes goblin leaders piss on their...” Blacknail started to suggest before he was interrupted.

“Bowing it is,” the blonde woman quickly cut in.

“What happens if we do neither?” a bearded bandit whose name Blacknail kept forgetting asked.

“Then you stay here while I go get something to eat,” Blacknail replied callously. He was a little annoyed at being cut off.

After a lot of unhappy grumbling, all the bandits knelt in front of Blacknail, even if they did it reluctantly and as quickly as possible. Blacknail couldn’t stop himself from smirking the entire time. It was just too satisfying to see all his hard work and sacrifice pay off. He was finally being treated like he so rightly deserved to be, as the chief. When the last human had finished bowing, Gob nodded happily to himself and got out of the way. Blacknail felt a little better about having the hobgoblin around now. He was proving to be useful.

“Now that you have joined the tribe you can enter,” Blacknail told everyone before turning around and leading the way into the clearing. All the goblins except for Scamp and Imp had already gone ahead.

“I swear to the gods, there had better actually be food here or I’m going to kill someone,” a bandit remarked bitterly as he followed Blacknail. There was also a bit more grumbling from some of the others, but none of them decided to stay behind. They all trailed after Blacknail as he headed towards the goblin’s lair.

A few minutes later, a sense of nostalgia washed over Blacknail as he pushed aside the last bush. The goblin’s lair had changed a lot since his last visit but it was still recognizable. The tribe had built their home atop the old ruin of a large human dwelling. The worn down remnants of the building’s walls could be seen encircling it. The goblins had reinforced the breaks in the old brick wall with wooden stacks so that they had a defensive barrier. When Blacknail had been here before the wall’s interior had been almost bare. There had only been a few small structures made up of loosely piled branches leaning up against the walls, but now a large new building was visible.

This new structure looked large enough to hold a dozen men, even if they had to slouch over because of the low roof. It was made up of branches that had been carefully woven together and reinforced with twine. Layers of bark had been tied to the roof and walls to block out the wind and rain, although a few spots used tarp or bits of cloth that had obviously been stolen from humans.

The rest of the goblin camp was mostly packed dirt and a few tiny dwellings, except for where a large fire pit sat in the center of the site. Right where Blacknail remembered it, a huge old pot was hanging over the fire pit.

“Incredible, I didn’t know goblins still made things like this,” Geralhd remarked breathlessly as he looked around.

“I showed them how to do stuff like that,” Blacknail bragged.

“Ya, it’s great if you love dirt and twigs,” another bandit observed sarcastically.

“Where’s the food?” Khita asked. Her priorities were clear.

“Just wait. Soon we will have a feast to celebrate my great leadership!” Blacknail responded as he looked around.

The feral goblins were lurking around the edges of the camp. They were staring at the humans but also giving them plenty of room. In sharp contrast, Gob was sticking close to the intruders. He slowly circled them while glaring suspiciously their way, and his attitude clearly unnerved some of the bandits. Blacknail ignored all that. He quickly walked over to the fire pit and examined the pot. He was intent on planning his victory celebration. A great chieftain deserved a great feast.

The first thing Blacknail needed to do was round up some goblins, so that’s what he did. He stalked over to the closest one and grabbed it before it could escape. Then, he hoisted it up into the air and shook it a few times to get its attention. When he was sure the goblin knew who was the boss, he gestured towards the pot and then in the direction where he knew a creek lay. The goblin seemed to understand because it nodded along enthusiastically, so Blacknail dropped it.

Soon, Gob was leading a group of goblins over to the creek to fetch water. Through various physical threats, complicated gestures, and bouts of angry hissing Blacknail got a few more parties of goblins working on other jobs. Most importantly, he sent them out to gather food, or at least he hoped that’s what they were doing. It was either that or they were going to set fire to the forest. He would find out soon enough.

“You really should be trying to teach them some Elorian, it would make this much easier,” Gerlahd said as he observed Blacknail work. All the bandits that had come with Blacknail had found places to sit and rest at one end of the camp. They watched the goings-on with wary attention.

“What’s Elorain?” Blacknail asked doubtfully.

“It’s the language we are speaking right now,” Geralhd explained with obvious amusement. There was a slight smirk on his lips.

“Oh, right, I knew that. I’m just too busy right now for more lessons,” the hobgoblin replied.

“Then maybe I’ll do it. Scamp learned it fairly quickly,” the young man mused aloud as he looked towards the large hut the goblins had built.

“Go ahead,” Blacknail said distractedly as the first of goblins began to filter back in.

It wasn’t long before the big pot was filled with water and hauled up above the fire pit by Gob and a few goblins. Piles of leaves, roots, firewood, and small game where piled up off to one side. The goblin tribe was quite skilled at hunting rabbits, birds, and squirrels.

The feral tribe quickly grew excited as Blacknail began throwing ingredients into the pot. He had cooked for them during his last visit as well, and apparently they had liked it. They goblins slipped past the nearby humans in order to peer over his shoulder, and he had to smack a few to keep them out of his way.

“It’s done!” Blacknail announced happily a few minutes later. The smell of the stew now filled the air.

As the feral goblins fought amongst themselves over the few bowls they possessed, the bandits began serving themselves. They were briefly interrupted when a growling Gob forced his way to the front of the line. However, no one tried to fight the hobgoblin, so he took his food and withdrew peacefully.

“Huh, this isn’t half bad,” Elyias remarked in surprise after sitting down and tasting the food.

“It’s the nectar of the gods compared to the stuff we were eating yesterday,” another bandit added.

“Ya, if I went another day eating nothing but raw leaves I was going to go crazy,” a third agreed. “That and shit my brains out.”

When all the humans had gotten out of the way, an unruly crowd of goblins ran over to get their own food. Scamp and Imp had been behind the last bandit so they were in the swarm’s way. Scamp had to fight his way through the mob. He hissed and scratched anyone who got too close to the bowl he had pressed protectively against his chest. In sharp contrast, none of the ferals bothered Imp. Whenever one got too close he directed a cold stare their way and they scurried away.

Of course, Blacknail had taken the first bowl for himself. He just finished slurping the meal down when the feral goblins finished emptying the rest of the pot. However, since there were still plenty of ingredients left it didn’t take him very long for him to get another batch going. He was almost finished when his cooking was briefly interrupted by a loud screech from Khita that hurt his ears.

“Hey, that’s mine!” the redhead yelled as she jumped to her feet.

A goblin had somehow managed to get its hands on her knife. The little creature quickly ran off into the bushes outside of the camp and Khita disappeared after it. Blacknail snickered in amusement at the sight. What kind of idiot let her stuff get stolen by goblins?

After he had finished cooking, Blacknail yawned and decided to take a nap. He had stuffed himself and his full stomach was making him more than little sleepy, but before he could nod off he was interrupted.

“Blacknail, what are we supposed to do now?” Geralhd asked nervously after walking over to his side.

“Sleep,” the hobgoblin replied crossly.

“Where should we do that?” Geralhd enquired in a frustrated tone. “We need shelter and I don’t want to anger our... hosts.”

“We also need some way to prevent the goblins from slitting our throats while we sleep,” Elyias added. The young bandit sounded nervous and he kept glancing around every time there was the slightest of noises or movement by a goblin.

Blacknail sighed and sat up. Couldn’t the humans do anything for themselves? Did they really need him to tell them where to sleep?

After a brief conversation, Blacknail led Geralhd on a tour of the feral goblins’ camp. The young bandit was surprised when Blacknail pulled open a makeshift trapdoor to reveal a staircase that led downwards into the ground.

“Oh, this must be an old root cellar,” Geralhd observed as they walked down into a fair sized room with stone walls. There were a few goblins lurking about, but Blacknail hissed and they quickly disappeared into a small tunnel in one of the walls. This was where the hobgoblin had slept the last time he was here.

It was getting dark outside and there wasn’t much light in the underground chamber, so Blacknail walked over to the fireplace he had dug into the wall during his last visit. There was already a tiny bit of dry wood and grass inside, so it only took a few seconds to get a fire going using sparks from a piece of flint and steel.

“Yes, it’s a little dirty, but will work quite well,” Geralhd remarked as he looked around. “We can seal that hole there easily enough and then there is only one way in. I don’t mean to offend your... friends, but I know we’ll all sleep sounder in a secure location.”

“I don’t trust goblins either,” Blacknail replied indifferently. Why would you ever trust a goblin? Of course, humans were just as bad in their own way. Blacknail’s heart twisted painfully for a second as several memories suddenly overcame him. The only human he had ever really trusted had been Saeter, and now his master was dead. That meant Blacknail was the only trustworthy person left. Being so loyal and incredibly amazing was a lonely burden.

“I’m going to sleep now. Don’t bother me,” Blacknail announced before getting his blanket out and curling up in one corner of the room.The humans could sort everything out now, and he didn’t really feel like interacting with feral goblins right now, not even the female ones. For some reason, he just wasn’t as interested in them as he had used to be. They were kind of short and flat-chested... Wait, why was he thinking about this?

It wasn’t long before all the bandits started coming down into the cellar. Some of them brought wood to feed the fire. The flickering flames lit the room as everyone set up for the night.

It was several hours after that when Khita finally showed up again. Blacknail awoke to the sound of her stomping down the stairs. Her clothes were covered with mud and her exposed skin had scratches on it. She looked like she’d gotten into a fight with a thorn bush.

“Did you get your knife back?” he asked her snidely.

“Fuck you, you miserable bastard,” she snarled in reply before going to sit over by the fire. Blacknail was fairly sure that meant she hadn’t gotten her knife back.

After an otherwise uneventful night, Blacknail led the bandits out of the root cellar and back up to the fire pit. He sighed as he observed how nervous and fearful they were acting. Why were they so afraid of a few goblins and one hobgoblin? They were a bunch of big humans with steel weapons!

Gob greeted his new chieftain by kneeling on the ground before him, which pleased Blacknail greatly. Maybe the hobgoblin wasn’t so bad after all, and that meant there was no reason to kill him and make it look like an accident. Blacknail had spent some time last night thinking about the best way to go about that. Goblin chiefs weren’t supposed to kill their subordinates but it happened all the time, especially when those subordinates got uppity.

“Hey that’s my knife!” Khita exclaimed when she noticed the item tucked into the side of the hobgoblin’s loin cloth.

She reached over to take it, but Gob stepped back and hissed at her. The redhead and the hobgoblin then stared at each other. Neither seemed likely to back down.

“Don’t start anything,” Geralhd warned her. He clearly didn’t want a fight to break out.

“Make him give it back,” Khita told Blacknail.

“Get it back yourself,” Blacknail replied. He didn’t like the tone of her voice. He was the leader and didn’t take orders from anyone.

“Is this some sort of hobgoblin test? To see if I’m sneaky enough to steal it back and prove myself?” the redhead asked as her eyes narrowed with sudden suspicion.

“No, I just don’t care,” Blacknail remarked flatly. If Khita couldn’t hold onto her own stuff then that wasn’t his problem.

“You’ve become kind of an ass lately, Blacknail,” Khita huffed in reply as she scowled at him.

“Nope, wrong,” the hobgoblin replied dismissively. He was completely sure he hadn’t changed at all. There was just no one around to force him to do stupid things anymore, like care about Khita or take baths.

Life was better when you were the leader.







ITG 9














Blacknail ignored Khita and everyone else as he went to work on things that were actually important. The early morning sunshine shone down on him as he got breakfast going. Sleeping, like everything else, made him hungry.

More meat was brought over by goblins and roasted over the fire. There was enough that all the humans got to eat their fill, and there were still lots for the goblins. During Blacknail’s absence, the goblins had gotten skilled at hunting small game. Blacknail had shown them how to make slings and snares before he had left. The tribe had certainly grown larger, and none of them looked hungry.

“I never thought I’d be so happy to eat a squirrel, or that they’d taste so good,” Geralhd said after chewing and swallowing a bit of meat.

“They’re pretty nice eating, really. Much better than rats,” Khita replied from where she was sitting on the ground by the fire.

Geralhd blinked in surprise and he gave her a disbelieving frown. Khita noticed his reaction and shrugged indifferently. “It’s not like I’ve eaten a lot rats, but when you’re living on the streets and you’re hungry you eat whatever you can get.”

Her explanation just made Geralhd look more uncomfortable. He fidgeted and looked away.

“I used to live off rats and bugs, but now I prefer human food. It tastes less like dirt and it doesn’t fight back,” Blacknail added cheerfully.

Khita threw Blacknail a friendly grin, which Blacknail returned, but there was silence as Geralhd and the other nearby humans considered this piece of hobgoblin wisdom.

“Er, that stew from yesterday... What was in it?” Elyias asked as put down the rabbit on stick he had been eating. A few of the others grimaced and looked queasy as well.

“Lots of stuff. Saeter taught me how to cook it,” Blacknail replied. The last part of his explanation seemed to reassure the humans a little. Most of them resumed eating.

Blacknail smiled proudly to himself. He was a great cook, and he was glad they had enjoyed his cooking, even if it hadn’t been his best recipe. There had barely been any bugs in it at all! The next time he cooked he was going to make sure he had the ingredients necessary to give the stew a proper crunch. That was the best part. 

“This foray into goblin culinary habits has been fascinating, but we have some more important matters to discuss, like our next move,” Geralhd said after he had finished eating.

There was agreement from the other bandits and they began talking about their plans. A few humans had grown tired of hiking through the forest, but it was quickly decided that nothing had really changed. They still had no option but to try and find a trail that led North. After the confrontation with Werrick’s men, there was no way there weren’t enemies watching the main road.

“So we still have to walk through those gods deserted woods for what will probably be weeks,” one of the women said. “We’re lucky we made it this far without being eaten by something. Getting to Daggerpoint is going to be like trying to trek through one of the hells.”

“At least we got to rest under a roof last night and eat our fill for once,” said the bearded bandit who Blacknail kept forgetting the name of. Maybe he should just call the man Beardy. As the leader, he was allowed to change his minions’ names, right?

It was still early in the morning when Blacknail led his troupe of humans, and two goblins, off into the woods. Several of the bandits visibly relaxed when the goblin camp was out of sight, which was stupid. Things were at their most dangerous when you couldn’t see them.

The going was tough for the first few hours. The ground was uneven and there were plenty of obstacles, such a rock and trees, which had to be avoided. Most of the trees themselves were tall with long slender needles instead of leaves, and sap oozed from breaks in their scaly bark.

After a while though, the ground evened out, and smaller leafier trees began to appear. That was when Blacknail noticed something strange; their group had somehow picked up an extra human.

“Hmmm, how many people are we supposed to have?” he asked Geralhd, who was standing right behind him.

“What? Did we lose someone?” the young bandit asked as he spun around to look.

“No, the opposite,” Blacknail replied as he studied the bandits.

They had all stopped walking and were gazing at the hobgoblin with confused expressions. None of them looked unfamiliar... but it was hard to say for sure. Blacknail couldn’t always tell all his humans apart. Of course, the hooded man at the back of the line was deeply suspicious. Blacknail walked past everyone until he got to the individual in question. He had a nagging suspicion about the hooded figure, which quickly proved correct.

Blacknail glared angrily at the intruder as he spoke. “What are you doing, Gob? That’s my cloak trick. I did it first! Don’t copy me!”

The feral hobgoblin froze for a second and then made a shrug-like motion, before pulling down his hood. The cloak had been doing a terrible job of concealing his horns anyway; the tips had been pushing up the fabric. Underneath the cloak, he was still dressed in a loincloth but he was also wearing a brown shirt he had stolen from somewhere.

“By all that is holy!” Elyias cursed as he jerked back away from the hobgoblin that had been revealed. This reaction annoyed Blacknail. The hobgoblin wasn’t much of a danger now that he had been exposed, and his disguise had been terrible anyway. Only an idiot like Elyias would have been fooled by it. He wasn’t even wearing pants!

“Did he kill and replace one of us?” someone asked in horror.

“Everyone is still here. He just stole some clothes,” Geralhd quickly explained to keep everyone calm.

The two hobgoblins stared at each for a few minutes. Gob hissed and barked for moment and then Blacknail growled back. The humans watched the interplay nervously.

“Why is he following us?” Geralhd asked when they had both fallen silent.

“I don’t know. He just keeps making weird noises,” Blacknail explained.

“Please make an educated guess then.”

“He wants to stay with me because I’m such a great leader. I’m so handsome, strong, and wise that he will follow me anywhere,” Blacknail observed with a fair bit of self-satisfaction. Now that he had said the words aloud he realized that they had to be true. What other explanation could there be?

“Well, he can’t stay!” Beardy the bearded bandit sputtered. He sounded angry and more than a little fearful.

“Oh? Are you the leader now?” Blacknail hissed menacingly as he rounded upon the man and leveled a cold stare his way.

He hadn’t actually wanted another hobgoblin around - they couldn’t be trusted – but there was no way he was letting anyone else decide that! He was the leader, and now that Beardy was against it, Blacknail wanted Gob to stay.

“He’s a wild hobgoblin!” another bandit protested.

“Which means he’s way more useful than you, or anyone else here but me,” Blacknail countered.

A few more bandits tried to argue with Blacknail’s decision but he didn’t back down. Eventually, they had no choice but to accept Gob’s presence. Blacknail was the leader and more than willing to stab a few people to make a point.

“Are the goblins going to be alright without their leader?” Geralhd asked with a level of concern that confused Blacknail. Why did he care?

“Yes,” Blacknail replied simply. The goblins would probably be better off without the hobgoblin lazing about and stealing their food.

By this time it was clear no one was going to try and chase him away, so Gob turned around and yelled something incomprehensible. Immediately, four goblins with spears and one carrying a large sac ambled out of the bushes and joined the hobgoblin.

“Bloody lovely,” Beardy remarked sarcastically.

“If they can bring in food then I’d much rather have their company than yours,” a woman remarked.

The addition of a few more goblins certainly didn’t bother Blacknail. He just shrugged and walked back up to the front of the line. He then picked a direction at random and started hiking again. After a few suspicious glares, the human bandits followed him, and behind them came the feral goblins. Scamp and Imp stuck with the bandits. If anything they seemed more distrustful of the newcomers than the humans were. Scamp in particular gave them a few nasty looks and hugged his collection of pouches close.

The group walked for most of the day, with only a few breaks. The most interesting thing to happen was when they walked around a clump of bushes and spooked a herd of deer. The meeting was a surprise to both sides, but the animals were long gone before anyone could string a bow or try and bring one down. With fleet grace, the deer sprung away and vanished off into the trees.

When it began to grow dark and they stumbled upon a half way decent campsite atop a rocky outcrop, Blacknail signalled for a stop. As they were setting up camp, the humans objected to sharing their space with the feral goblins, but Blacknail pointed out that he was the leader and they didn’t get to decide anything. He also mentioned that it was better to keep the goblins close where they could be watched.

“They did share their camp with us earlier,” Geralhd told the other bandits. This bit of unasked for truth earned him some angry mutters and glares, but it did seem to placate some of the dissenters.

However, it was the goblins' ability to gather firewood, even when it got dark, which finally convinced the last of the objectors. When Gob built a fire for himself and the goblins the bandits shut up and took a seat around it.

Geralhd even sat next to Gob and tried to communicate with him for a few moments. It didn’t take long for the feral hobgoblin to grow annoyed by the human. Gob threw Blacknail a suffering look that was clearly an attempt to ask for permission to gut the noisy human that wouldn’t shut up, but Blacknail shook his head, so the feral hobgoblin was forced to try and ignore the man instead.

In the morning, the ferals further impressed the humans by catching several rabbits and squirrels. As was proper, they offered them to their great chieftain Blacknail, and he in turn shared the spoils with everyone else, after he had finished eating his fill. It wasn’t enough to fill everyone’s bellies, except Blacknail’s, but it was more than they would have had otherwise.

The early morning birds were out in full force as they set out. The sound of their singing filled the air. However, Blacknail soon began to grow tired of walking through the forest. It was nothing but the same mix of trees they had seen over the last few days. He was careful to avoid the older and darker areas where giant spiders might dwell as well as the overgrown clearings that Mimics preferred. That was the safe thing to do but it was also boring. Some excitement would almost be worth the risk of losing a few goblins or humans.

A sudden loud cracking noise jerked Blacknail to attention. Everyone else heard it as well, but the sound echoed through the forest in a way that made it hard to guess where it had come from. The group stopped in their tracks and they looked off in different directions.

There was another loud sound like wood shattering. This time Blacknail zoned in on the origin. He saw only trees in that direction, but then he noticed a place where the ground suddenly dropped away. He couldn’t see what lay at the bottom of the hill, but if there was something dangerous there he needed to know about it, plus it might be interesting.

Blacknail signalled for his followers to be quiet and then he stalked over to the top of the hill. The incline was steep and muddy. At the bottom, there was a clearing full of long grass, and it was bristling with activity. Blacknail stared at the commotion below. The clearing was occupied by ogres. The herd was trampling through the grass along the edge of the clearing where the trees were, and they were using the huge claws on their front limbs to pull branches off of the trees. The huge brown beasts then brought the foliage to their mouths and chowed down on the leaves before throwing most of the harder wood aside. This was the source of all the noise.

Several of the bandits including Geralhd joined Blacknail atop the hill. They let out quiet exclamations of surprise when they saw the ogres. Many of them had never seen the beasts before, so the group took a quick break to watch them.

“Wow, those are some huge hulking things,” Khita’s eyes were wide with surprise and awe as she watched the creatures amble about below.

“I’ve heard of ogres but I didn’t think anything got so large,” Elyias remarked. “You don’t see anything like them down south. They must be twice as tall as a man when they stand up on their hind legs.”

“Do you think they’re dangerous? Are we safe up here?” Geralhd asked.

Before answering, Blacknail took a moment to think the question over. He had only seen a herd of ogres before once, but because he was the leader he wanted to sound like he knew what he was talking about.

“We’re safe up here. Ogres don’t chase people. They will crush you if something scares them into stampeding, but they don’t actually chase people,” he explained.

“What could scare those giants?” Elyias asked with amused disbelief. He sounded like he thought Blacknail was joking.

“Lots of stuff,” Blacknail answered. “Trolls and drakes will hunt and eat ogres.”

“Drakes are real? I thought they were just stories meant to frighten people...”

“Of course they’re real. I mean, I’ve never seen one but I’ve read about them,” Geralhd said.

“I saw one chase some ogres. It was way bigger than a house and its teeth were longer than a man!” Blacknail told them as he held his arms out as far apart as possible to show everyone what he meant. “Its roar shook the trees and even Herad ran away from it.”

Khita grinned excitedly as she listened and her eyes shone with glee. “If we wait here do you think a drake will show up? They sound amazing!” she asked.

“I admit to a certain scholarly curiosity about the creatures as well, but that’s not going to happen,” Geralhd told her. “Our journey is dangerous enough without purposely trying to encounter a drake, and we don’t have time to waste.”

Blacknail had to agree with Geralhd. Waiting around would be stupid. He shooed a newly terrified Elyias back into line and quickly got everyone moving again. A long march still lay ahead of them, and they spent the rest of the day trying to shorten it as much as possible.

After another night in the forest, and an early morning start to the day’s hiking, Blacknail was forced to admit that he had no idea where he was or how to get to Daggerpoint. Somehow, one of his minions had gotten them lost. Why were his minions all so useless?

“Your plan isn’t working,” Blacknail accused Geralhd as he pulled him aside. A confused expression appeared on the man’s face.

“My plan?”

“Yep, the one where we walk North until we find a trail to a human city. I haven’t found any trails,” Blacknail pointed out. Geralhd winced as if in pain and sighed. He apparently didn’t like being told the obvious.

“Well, we can’t turn back now. We’ll just have to keep going and hope that we find a road, although I think we should head more towards the East now. That’s the way Daggerpoint should be,” he told the hobgoblin.

“Fine, whatever,” Blacknail replied. He wasn’t sure that was the greatest idea, but it didn’t matter to him. He was fine with wandering the woods. It was as good a place to be as any, and he still wasn’t certain what he would do when they got to Daggerpoint.

They resumed their march and quickly stumbled into a swampy area. Soon over half the standing green trees were replaced by white skeletal husks, and the firm ground gave way to mud. Pools of standing water blocked the way forward, and no one wanted to go for a swim. However, the real problem was the bugs. Swarms of buzzing insects descended on the bandits and goblins. The humans threw their hoods up and the goblins quickly rolled in the mud, and then they made a run for it. Blacknail led the charge away from the swamp and up to drier ground.

“Now you’ve really gotten us lost,” Blacknail accused Geralhd as he swatted a mosquito that had landed on his nose. They finally stopped running when they had reached a hill where there was enough wind to blow all the insects chasing them away.

“I have? What did I do?” Geralhd replied indignantly.

“It’s your plan so everything is your fault,” the hobgoblin explained.

“It hasn’t failed us yet. Let’s keep moving.”

“Yes, let’s keep walking off into the woods until we all fall over dead. That way the goblins get a free meal and don’t even have to raise a hand against us,” Beardy the bandit interjected. He didn’t actually sound as if he actually liked Geralhd’s plan.

“No, they just have to walk half a hundred miles. That’s stupid. The goblins are the only ones here that aren’t having any problems finding food,” Geralhd replied dismissively.

“Ya, you’re stupid,” Blacknail added. He felt it was his duty as the leader to point that out.

A few more of the bandits grumbled but they quickly shut up when Blacknail glared their way. It wasn’t like they had better ideas, or anywhere they could escape to, so the long hike through the seemingly never ending forest continued.







ITG 10










The forest was just beginning to darken as dusk fell when Blacknail’s band of misfits found themselves making their way up an unremarkable hill. A canopy of broad leaves towered above them and was supported by scattered broad tree trunks that rose out of the earth. Dark soil was visible underneath the thin covering of plants that covered the ground.

They had been walking through the trees without stopping since they had decided to head Northeast in search of some sign of human civilization. Blacknail was just about to admit defeat and start looking for somewhere to set up camp for the night when he stumbled across a nearly invisible game trail, where the earth had been flattened and no plants grew. It went almost straight North, so at first Blacknail didn’t give it more than a brief glance. However, it was an unusually wide path and that drew his interest because a lot of animals were obviously using it. It would be useful to know what sort of creatures were nearby, in case any of them liked eating people. Blacknail only had so many spares.

A brief sniff around revealed nothing more dangerous than some old wolf piss, but his eyes spotted something interesting. Saeter had taught the hobgoblin not to rely too much on smell and how to track by following physical signs. It wasn’t usually that useful but sometimes rain or time would wash a weak scent away.

Blacknail came to a stop and looked down at his find. “Your great leader has found something, because he is the best scout ever,” he announced to his followers.

“It’s not another weird mushroom you want one of us to eat, is it? Elyias still looks a little out of it, but at least he’s stopped mumbling to himself now,” Beardy replied. He was third in line and he didn’t sound too enthusiastic about Blacknail’s discovery.

Elyias was holding up the rear of the bandits and he looked more than a little green. Every once in a while one of the feral goblins would poke him and giggle before running away but the young man barely reacted. He just plodded forward and stared ahead with unfocused eyes.

“No, it’s a foot print, and Elyias will be fine. My minion’s just feeling... relaxed now that his stomach is full and he’s not so hungry. His skin color has never looked so good!” 

“A footprint? Is it a human one?” Geralhd asked hopefully from behind Blacknail as everyone stopped walking and looked toward the hobgoblin scout.

“Yes, from a boot,” Blacknail explained as he crouched down and pointed to where the heel of a boot had left an imprint in the dirt. The smooth curved edge was clearly visible, and a quick inspection of the surroundings revealed a few more signs of passing humans.

“It’s about bloody time! Gods, I hope this means we’re near a town or something. I thought the Green would be more exciting than this. All we’ve done is walk and then walk some more,” Khita remarked. She sounded oddly bitter and disappointed that the worst thing they had run into was goblins.

“I’m fine with it being boring. It couldn’t be Werrick’s men who made those tracks, could it?” A woman asked nervously from where she was standing near the back of the bandits.

“I can’t think of any reason they’d be way the hells out here. They can’t know where we’re headed and it’s a long walk,” Geralhd replied.

“This trail looks like it goes back to the road, and it runs North the other way,” Blacknail observed as he pointed one way and then the other.

“Why would anyone travel up that way? There’s nothing there but trees and then the mountains,” Beardy asked. “Nobody has ever crossed the Iron Teeth and nobody lives there.”

No one had an answer for him, so after discussing their options for a bit they decided on a course of action, which Geralhd then convinced Blacknail to take. Blacknail was the leader so he got to decide everything important, even when he had no idea what was going on. Luckily, Geralhd was there to explain things to him and remind him of important stuff, like that humans needed to eat a certain amount or they would die.

Thus, Blacknail agreed that they should follow the trail North. His bandit minions hoped the path would eventually turn East towards civilization or at least lead somewhere where they could rest and resupply.

As they followed the trail, Blacknail noticed plenty of other signs of human passage. It seemed like several different people were using the trail regularly. Even though they made good time, they didn’t reach the end of the trail before night started to fall. Everyone was subdued as they set up camp under a rocky ledge.

“Damnation, I want to keep going. The source of those tracks might be just out of sight, and that’s going to bug me all night,” a bandit said as he unrolled his blanket next to the fire.

“Go ahead, stupid, but I’m not going to track you down when you get lost in the dark,” Blacknail replied as he supervised everyone else’s’ work. He was the leader.

The only other person that did much talking was Geralhd. As had become routine over the past few days, he spent a while trying to communicate with Gob and teach him the human language. The goblins and the humans had gotten used to each other, but the bandits’ long journey had worn them down. Most of them stared out into the forest with fearful eyes, and even though they had been eating better they had continued to lose weight. In the light cast by the campfire, their faces were thin and eyes sunken. Blacknail wasn’t sure that some of them would last much longer. He didn’t want to lose any minions, but if one of them did die he hoped it would be the man with the nice red coat or Khita.

The goblins were a little spooked to be out in unfamiliar territory but otherwise fine. If anything the presence of so many large humans had come to reassure them. They had their own sentries but most of them curled up to sleep.

When the sun had risen early the next morning and everyone had gotten up, they started hiking again. The tantalizing prospect of stumbling onto the source of the tracks they were following energized the bandits. They moved more quickly than they had earlier, and soon the forest changed around them. The thicker leafy trees gave way to tall trees pine trees that were clustered tightly together. Their fallen needles covered the ground and smothered a lot of the underbrush, so there was little to block vision.

“Oh, benevolent goddess! I pray we reach succour soon. My feet are bloody killing me,” Elyias whined overdramatically. He was at the back of the group again, while Blacknail was leading the way up a shallow slope. He seemed to have recovered completely from the mushroom poisoning.

“Gods, you’re a whiny brat. How the hells did you end up here and how have you survived this long?” Beardy responded. The large man then spat contemptuously to the side.

A haunted look appeared on Elyias’ face and it took him a few moments to reply. “I don’t know... but by all that is divine, I wish I did. I joined up with Herad in Daggerpoint because it seemed like a sure way to make some easy money.” A miserable chuckle escaped his lips as he finished speaking.

“Ha, how’s that going for you?” Beardy asked as he grinned cruelly. The large bearded man seemed to find Elyias' suffering amusing. That annoyed Blacknail a little because Elyias was his minion, so Elyias was supposed to amuse him! It was almost disloyal...

“It was going fine until that big street fight with those mercenaries in Daggerpoint,” Elyias explained before sighing deeply. “I hadn’t signed up for that sort of shit. I’m a thief, not a soldier. However, when the fighting had all finished and I had relaxed, Blacknail showed up.”

“And then things became great! Because I made you my minion,” Blacknail interjected happily. He had been listening in.

“Something sort of like that,” Elyias remarked bitterly.

The young man turned to stare off into the forest. He seemed depressed. Maybe he needed another mushroom to cheer him up? There had been some funny looking purple ones a while back. Before Blacknail could speak up, Khita suddenly called out in an unusually loud voice meant to get attention. It worked.

“Hey, look over there!” she announced.

The group had just reached the top of the incline they had been climbing and could see beyond the top of it now. The forest abruptly ended about a hundred feet up ahead. The tree line just stopped and gave way to a large clearing. The open area wasn’t natural. Stumps littered the edge where the forest had been cut back not too long ago, and all the grass in the area had been trampled down. There was thus nothing to block their view of the settlement that stood in the middle of the clearing. Large wooden buildings could be seen behind a tall fence, and a pillar of smoke was rising up from a chimney.

“It’s a village or something,” a female bandit remarked as she stared past her companions. This pronouncement of the obvious earned her a few annoyed looks, including one from Blacknail.

“Everyone be quiet. Let’s not give yourself away until we’ve figure out who they are,” Geralhd said as he looked around at the forest to make sure they weren’t being observed.

“Ya, let’s do that,” Blacknail agreed. He took a second to listen carefully, but all he heard was the usual forest noises like the rustling of leaves. It didn’t sound like there were any strange people around. He would have heard them or smelled them unless they were waiting in ambush, and that was unlikely.  After a signal from their glorious leader, the bandits cautiously made their way over to the edge of the forest and stared out into the clearing. The goblins followed them.

“Hmm, it’s too big to be an outpost or a trapper’s hut. You could fit a hundred people in there. It must be village after all,” Geralhd observed.

“Look at the ground here in front of us. Most of it has been worked in the past and those areas closer to the wall there look like they’ve already been planted,” Elyias pointed out as he crouched down and stared at the dirt in front of him. “You would only do that if you were living here.”

Beardy scratched his head and scowled as he looked around. “They’re farming out here? I thought all these little villages got raided and wiped out a long time ago.”

“The bandits would have to find them first. This village is more than a little out of the way and even bandits stick close to the main roads. I’m guessing they try to keep their location secret as well,” Geralhd remarked.

“So they’re probably not too fond of visitors, and some small communities can get very intense about that sort of thing,” Elyias remarked warily.

“Well, not matter who they are, they probably won’t welcome a group of armed strangers in their hearth, and they definitely won’t appreciate us bringing a pack of goblins with us,” Beardy added.

“So what do we do now?” Khita asked. “I’m not staying out here when there’s a nice comfy house right over there. I want to sleep on a bed. No, I need to sleep on a bed, and I have no problem with stabbing a few people to get it either. ”

“We should wait out of sight until nightfall and then find a way inside. They won’t be expecting an attack. Those walls are for keeping beasts out, not people, and I’ll eat my boots if they get travellers out here.”

Everyone considered this plan for a few moments. Several people including Geralhd started to raise objections, but Khita cut them off. “What if we just grabbed some hostages? Then we could force them to let us in, and we wouldn’t have to wait so long. Nightfall is a bloody long time from now!”

“Huh, you might be right; waiting could be risky. They know the area and someone might stumble into our trail and alert the village. So instead, we could have Blackail climb over the wall and let us inside. He could probably manage that undetected in the day, and then we could grab the first few people we find as bargaining chips.”

“Why is every option you present so violent?" Geralhd asked as he glared at Beardy. “We have other alternatives, and not everything needs to end with drawn steel and bloodshed.”

Beardy delivered his reply in a cold and dispassionate voice. “Because I’m a starving murderous bandit who steals from people for a living, and because seeing my friends die bloodily and then taking a week long trek through the damned Green has put me in a shitty mood.”

“Fair enough, but let’s not jump into anything,” Geralhd replied in a carefully neutral voice. The other man’s reply had clearly unsettled him. “Antagonizing these people could cost us a lot more than it would gain us. We should try and parley with them first.”

“That would cost us the element of surprise, and we can’t trust them. They live out in the deep Green! No one normal does that. They’re probably all a bunch of cannibals or something worse,” Elyias said as he stared nervously at the buildings that sat in the middle of the clearing in front of them.

“What in all the hells do you have against rural villages? Did one murder your parents?” a woman asked Elyias.

“What do you think we should do, Blacknail?” Khita interjected as she threw the hobgoblin an excited grin.

It took a few moments for Blacknail to come up with a reply. He wasn’t against sneaking into the village and killing some people – that was kind of what he did – but he wasn’t sure what the point would be. In fact, what were they even after in the first place? The humans had very different priorities than him, because they were so stupid.

“What do you want from the village?” Blacknail asked the group as he shrugged. There was once again a quiet lull as the bandits considered the unexpected question.

“Food and rest?” Beardy replied uncertainly.

“Then we would need to kill them all or make nice,” Blacknail remarked as he stared at the villages fortifications.

“He’s right,” Geralhd said. “Infuriating the natives won’t get us anything. If we attack them they will fight back and we won’t be able to trust them or drop our guards. We can’t hope to kill them all either. Our only real way of securing a place to rest and recuperate is to talk to them and work out some sort of deal.”

“But what if they’re all a bunch of crazed inbred cultists that worship some twisted forest god?” Elyias asked. “Maybe that’s why they live way out here, and if we just walk up to their front door and announce ourselves the bastards may run out and slaughter us for supper.”

“Seriously, what is it with you?” the woman from before asked him.

“I’ve just had a few bad experiences with small towns, alright? They can be very unfriendly places, where the king’s law isn’t always upheld like it should be, and I’ve heard some things.”

“Ha, let me guess. You tried to steal or cheat at gambling and the villagers ran you out of town because you were an outsider,” Beardy suggested.

“They didn’t have a lick of evidence that I did anything wrong!” Elyias hissed angrily in reply. “I had to spend the night in an abandoned shed.”

“We need to get back on topic,” Geralhd told the others.

Blacknail nodded his agreement and spoke up. “How about I take a person and ask them some questions before we talk to the village?”

“You mean kidnap,” Geralhd corrected him. “You don’t take or steal people, you kidnap them.”

“I mean what I said.”

“Fine, that plan could work, but where how would you find this person?”

Blacknail grinned confidently to himself as he stared at the human settlement. “All prey must leave their lair to find food and water. We just need to watch and wait for an unsuspecting human to come to us.”

“Creepy, but it’s not a bad plan,” Beardy replied. “However, if we don’t want them dead set against us you’d better not let them know you’re a hobgoblin. That means one of us should do most the talking and the actual grabbing.”

“Fine,” Blacknail answered. He was never against doing less work.

“Someone leaving the village might not come out in this direction. There might even be villagers over in the forest on the other side,” Geralhd said.

“I’ll go look over there then,” Blacknail replied as he stood up.

“It’s a big forest maybe you should get help. I’m sure the goblins could track down a villager for us.”

Blacknail turned to observe the pack of goblins. They were all clustered off to the side at the edge of the forest where they could hide among some stumps and bushes. Like the humans, they were mostly staring at the village that sat in the middle of the clearing. As Blacknail watched, two of the goblins started hissing at each other and then began fighting. They wrestled for a second before Gob sprang into action and pulled them apart. The growling hobgoblin grabbed both of the goblins’ necks and pressed them down into the dirt until they shut up. He then let them go and they quickly scampered away.

“I don’t think they’re smart enough for that,” Blacknail said as he scowled at the scene before him.

“You had them doing more complex tasks than this before,” Geralhd pointed out.

“Yes, but not important things, just stuff that didn’t affect me if they messed up. Also, I can’t explain the details to them because they don’t talk well.”

“I think they understand more than you think, and I’ve been teaching Gob. He can give them the details.”

This idea didn’t sit well with Blacknail for some reason, but if it worked then he would have less work to do, so it was worth a shot. He sighed before responding.

“Fine, but if this goes badly it’s all your fault.”












INT: GWYW







Aris grunted as he lifted the bucket of slop up over the side of the enclosure and dumped its smelly contents into the tray below. It splashed upwards when it hit the bottom of the wooden container but none of the muck landed near Aris or his clothes. He was quite practiced at this. The pigs that had been idling about the mud filled pen immediately began trotting over to grab some food.

Aris smiled as he pulled the now empty bucket back over the fence. His heart lifted at the animals’ happy snorts and hurried waddling. They seemed so happy to receive the village’s kitchen castoffs. If only his own needs were so simple.

A sigh escaped Aris’ lips as he looked at his surroundings and his own problems came to mind. Around him were the crude wooden buildings that lay at the center of his village. Everything looked run down and dirty, although Aris had never seen them any other way. In fact, he had never seen any other buildings. Behind the buildings the settlement wall could be seen, and beyond that the tall trees of the forest loomed. It was a despairingly familiar scene that made him want to scream. The sight of the trees tormented him. They were a constant reminder of the outside world but also of all the barriers that shackled him here.

He had been born in the isolated village of Shelter over fifteen winters ago, and it was likely that he would die here. There had to be more to life than this! Aris grimaced as he carried the bucket back over to his house. Like every other home in the village, it was a squat structure with a thatch roof. There was only enough space inside for three cramped rooms. He dropped the slop bucket outside the front door before walking inside. His mother was working in the kitchen. There was a table in the middle of the room and she was chopping something up on top of it.

“I’m done with the morning chores, mother,” Aris told her as he stepped through the door.

“Ah, thank you,” his mother replied without looking up from her work. Although she wasn’t young anymore, the brunette was still attractive. She wasn’t slim but she moved gracefully and there was almost always a welcoming smile on her face.

“Is there something else you wanted me to do now?” he asked her as he came to stop in the doorway. There were always more chores to do.

“No, not right now. We can do some cleaning together later, but right now I need to focus on this. You can take a break for an hour or so.”

“Alright, I’m going to go for a walk or something then.”

“Oh, a walk? Are you planning to take it with anyone in particular?” his mother said as she finally looked up and grinned at him. Aris’ cheeks flushed slightly in response.

“Nah, no one in particular,” he replied unconvincingly as he quickly looked to the side.

“Sure, sweetie, whatever you say. Have fun with your walk,” his mother responded smugly. Aris quickly muttered something incomprehensible and then made a break for his room. He loved his mother but she could be so very embarrassing. Why couldn’t she just stay out of his business?

The room was shadowy and dark because the only source of light was one tiny round window, but it was enough to see by. Once inside his bedroom, he pulled out a drawer from his dresser and grabbed a clean shirt. It was still rough homespun and an ugly tan color, but at least it wasn’t covered in dirt and grime. He had to watch his balance as he changed because there was so little space in his cramped room. There was only a tiny piece of open floor between the bed and the dresser.

When Aris was finished, he tried to slip past his mother and back outside but she noticed him and spoke up in a worried voice. “If you end up going out into the forest don’t go too far, and make sure you obey all the rules, including taking at least two other people.”

“Yes, mother, of course,” Aris responded as he tried to hide a grimace. Did she think he was still a child?

“You don’t sound like you mean it,” his mother observed as she scowled his way. “We have those rules for a reason, as you well know. I shouldn’t have to explain them to you of all people.”

Aris simply nodded and smiled insincerely in agreement before hurriedly walking out the door before she could respond. He didn’t want to argue with his mother when there were better uses of his time. She was just being overprotective. Hardly any of the other villagers followed the three person rule. His mother was just paranoid about the forest because of how his father had disappeared. Years ago, he had gone out with one of his friends to do some trading in another village but had never returned. His mother was sure some sort of beast had taken him, but Aris wasn’t so sure. Maybe he had just grown tired of living in an isolated collection of hovels where there was no future and decided to leave his family behind. Aris barely remembered his father as more than a weathered smiling face with a brown beard.

As Aris was walking through the village towards his destination, a flock of small birds twittered and flew over the village. Aris watched them disappear into the trees on the other side of the wall and sighed again. The birds’ freedom filled him with envy. If his father had abandoned his family instead of dying then Aris wasn’t so sure he could bring himself to hate the man. He was more jealous than anything. Of course, since his father wasn’t around it was even more impossible for Aris to leave Shelter. Someone had to stay and help his mother. She was unlikely to remarry since there were so few unmarried men her age left in the village. Their life out here was hard and dangerous. Fatalities were far from unheard of, and men did most the dangerous jobs.

“Damn this place! Why did I have to be born here?” Aris swore as he moved. At least not everything was terrible. There were one or two good things about Shelter. Like Joan, whose house he was now approaching.

After a quick look around to make sure no one was within sight, Aris walked over to a window in the nearest house and looked inside. He didn’t see or hear any movement, so he grinned and moved to the door. He had wanted to make sure her parents weren’t home before entering.

“Are you here, Joan?” he called out eagerly. There was a shuffling sound from deeper in the house before anyone replied.

“Aris, is that you?” a girly voice asked. A young woman in a homespun dress then stepped out of one of the back rooms. She had long blonde hair that was tied up into a bun atop her head and a smile on her face. Her figure was slim in a healthy way.

“Yes, it’s me. I just finished my morning work, and I was wondering if you wanted to spend some time together,” he replied happily. Joan’s beautiful smiles never failed to fill him with joy. There were only about two dozen children his age in the village, so they had all grown up together, and Aris had known Joan forever. However, it was only recently that Aris had found himself being drawn to her and started asking to spend time with her alone.

“Well, I don’t know. I’m still working on finishing up some sowing and my parents are out,” Joan mused aloud. She sounded uncertain but tempted.

“I’m sure it can wait. I was thinking we could go for a short walk and have a nice talk.”

“That does sound fairly nice. A walk to where, though?”

Aris shrugged. He hadn’t really thought about it too much. “Just around the wall and then maybe over to the apple trees. No one will bother us over by the shed there.”

Joan shook her head, although there was still a smile on her lips. The movement did however cause several loose hairs to fall over her face and she had to brush them aside. “The orchard shed? That’s where all the grabby young men like to take their girls. I don’t think I want to go there. How about a real walk, like through the woods.”

Her response disappointed Aris. He couldn’t stop himself from pouting slightly. He had been looking forward to snuggling up next to Joan and seeing if maybe he could steal a kiss or too. The forest would be private but there was one huge problem with it.

“You want to go by ourselves?” he asked. Aris had a feeling that he already knew the answer, and that he wasn’t going to like it.

“No, we’ll definitely need a third person, silly. Those are the rules.”

That was what Aris had been afraid of. “Where are we going to find someone to go with us right now? We should just go to the orchard or go to the forest by ourselves instead.”

“I can just ask my brother. He’s just out back and it will only take a second. Wait here.”

Having said that, Joan smiled again and walked past him. Aris’ heart fell as she stepped through the door and out of sight. He had to wait there awkwardly for Joan to return a few minutes later, and behind her came her brother, Hassiol. Aris forced himself not to grimace when Hassiol threw him a cocky grin. Aris wasn’t thrilled by this new addition. Hassiol wasn’t overprotective of his sister, but he obviously enjoyed annoying Aris by getting in his way. He seemed to find the whole thing to be hilarious, which made Aris want to punch him. The two boys had never been close, even though they were only a year apart in age. They weren’t enemies but they hadn’t been really been friends.

“So you want to go out into the forest for a walk! That sure sounds romantic. Thanks for inviting me,” Hassiol told Aris as he smirked and his eyes glinted with amusement.

“No problem. I can’t think of anywhere else I would like to take you…” the other boy replied before muttering. “…and where I’d like to leave you for something to eat.”

“I’m so happy you two get along so well. Let’s get going!” Joan told them both. She seemed genuine in her excitement so Aris suppressed his own disaffection.

“I just remembered seeing some spring flowers the last time I went out into the forest,” Aris told her as he tried to ignore her brother. “I’ll show them to you. I think you’ll love them. They’re almost as pretty as you.”

“Oh, that sounds lovely,” Joan replied.

“Do you think I’ll like them? I can’t wait to see what color they will be!” Hassiol interjected in a tone full of sarcasm.

“I have no idea,” Aris replied crossly.

“Will they be as pretty as I am?”

There was a second of silence as Aris suppressed the urge to kick Hassiol in the balls. As much as the boy deserved it, it wouldn’t be a good idea in front of his sister. Aris was trying to leave a good impression.

“You’ll have to decide that on your own, or get one of the other girls to tell you. That’s if you ever find one that is interested in you,” Aris eventually replied as he stared hostilely into Hassiol’s eyes.

Joan laughed at their exchange before stepping between them and speaking up. “You two are so funny! But there will be plenty of time for joking around as we walk. Let’s get going. I want to see these flowers.”

The blonde girl then took Aris’ arm and led him towards the door. Her brother followed as they made their way towards Shelter’s gates. The warm feeling of her body pressed up against his overwhelmed Aris, even if her heavy clothes meant their skin wasn’t touching. His heart started beating louder and faster in his chest. He remained silent as they stepped outside the village, but then Joan let go of his arm and stepped away.

Across the barren fields outside the walls loomed the green trees that completely surrounded Shelter. Aris felt his good spirits drain away when they came into sight. He suddenly felt very alone, regardless of his company. His home village was a small speck in the center of an endless maze that he couldn’t escape. The outside world full of people he had never met and the grand cities that he had heard some of the elders speak of were all impossibly far away. Regardless of how well this little outing went he was doomed to die in this village where nothing happened but the slow grind of tragedy. None of the elders said it aloud, but everyone knew that the village was shrinking. Less planting was done every year, and life was constantly getting harder. Shelter was dying, strangled by the Green. It couldn’t survive on its own.

“Why did you stop? Let’s get going,” Joan asked from up ahead as she turned and gave Aris an inquisitive look.

“Oh, I was just thinking of how much I enjoy being around you,” Aris replied smoothly as he started walking again. Behind him, Hassiol gagged in disgust. They all followed the path to the edge of the woods and stepped into the shade cast by the branches overhead.

Birds twittered all around and leaves shook in the wind. Aris found himself praying as he followed Joan. “I wish something would happen, anything really. Tar-Galhd, lord of the Green, you’re the only god that could possibly hear me out here. I’ve lived my entire life in your embrace… Please, I beg of you, let me grow.”

Aris looked around. There was no sudden unnatural silence or divine sign, so he just sighed and kept moving. It had been stupid of him to suddenly be so dramatic. If he kept this up he was going to let a sour mood ruin a perfectly good date with a beautiful woman. The young man moved up next to Joan and smiled at her. When she smiled back he quickly forgot his prayer and the thoughts that had been dragging him down. He had feeling this was going to be a great day, even with Hassiol was around.








HAH 1








Blacknail walked away from the village that stood in the clearing behind him and headed over toward Gob and the feral goblins. They were lounging about among some bushes and tree stumps at the edge of the forest. Geralhd trailed after Blacknail.

“I’m surprised you didn’t talk to Gob more on the way here. You’ve barely said two words to him since your reunion,” Geralhd said as they moved.

Blacknail sniffed in annoyance before replying. “Why would I want to speak to him? He’s a hobgoblin so he has nothing interesting to say.”

“Well, if he learns a few more words...” Geralhd argued before Blacknail snorted rudely and cut him off.

“No, wrong. I mean Gob has nothing to say because he lives out in a forest with a bunch of goblins. I’ve seen the forest and I know all about goblins. Talking about those things would be dumb.”

Geralhd wasn’t able to come up with a reply to that before they reached Gob’s side. The hobgoblin looked their way and then bowed his head submissively towards Blacknail. This just caused Blacknail to snort again, however Geralhd greeted Gob with a cheerful wave and a smile. The two then began communicating through hand gestures and a few human words as Blacknail watched. Most of it was confusing nonsense but it certainly seemed like Geralhd was asking Gob to send out goblins to help scout the forest.

“Yes. Yes,” Gob replied in a scratchy voice after Geralhd had finished speaking. The hobgoblin’s head bobbed up and down enthusiastically as he spoke, and then he looked toward Blacknail. There was a questioning look in his eyes, and he was obviously seeking Blacknail’s approval to do whatever Geralhd had just asked of him.

He didn’t get it right away. Blacknail stared at Gob suspiciously for a second before reluctantly nodding. He had no reason to go against the plan now, but he couldn’t resist ending the nod with a haughty growl. Blacknail wanted to remind Gob who the boss was. It was him. He was the boss.

Gob immediately turned around and made a barking sound. The goblins who were loitering all around him perked up and looked his way. When he had their attention, Gob hissed and grunted at them a few times before motioning towards the forest.

Blacknail watched intently. He had no idea what any of those stupid sounds were supposed to mean. When he tried to command the goblins it usually took him much longer. Gob was certainly very useful to have around, which unfortunately meant Blacknail couldn’t kill him yet. The goblins muttered amongst themselves for a few moments before running off into the woods. One of them tried to stay behind, but Blacknail gave the lazy critter a swift kick that sent him scampering off into the bushes. The little pest was probably going to sit down somewhere out of sight, but there was nothing Blacknail could do about it. 

Soon all the goblins had left except for Scamp and Imp. Both of them were still sitting over by the bandits. Blacknail briefly considered giving them both a kick and forcing them out into the forest as well, but Scamp was useless and Imp was still wearing his backpack. Blacknail was afraid an impact might cause something in the sack to explode.

“I hope you know what you’re doing,” Beardy remarked as he walked up next to Geralhd.

Blacknail shrugged. “It’s Geralhd’s idea, so everything that goes badly is his fault.”

The bandits then fell into quiet conversation as they watched the village from afar and waited for the goblins to return. It took a little over half an hour for the first of the green critters to come back. The goblin scampered out of the bushes and ran over to Gob with an excited gleam in his eyes. The hobgoblin and the goblin grunted at each other a few times, and then Gob turned towards Blacknail and pointed out into the forest.

“It looks like they’ve found someone,” Geralhd remarked.

“Let’s see who it is,” Blacknail replied eagerly as he motioned for the rest of the humans to join him.

The hobgoblin had gotten sick of waiting around. Recently, when he stayed still he couldn’t help but think back and reflect on his memories. This wasn’t something he enjoyed. Whenever Saeter’s face came to mind cold rage flared to life in his chest. It was only by keeping busy that he had managed to stay calm.

When they were ready to move, Blacknail signalled Gob. The feral hobgoblin hissed at the goblin that had come back, and the pair began walking off into the forest. Blacknail and his human minions followed behind them silently.

They circled through the thick greenery around the edge of the clearing for a few minutes. The goblin then sniffed an exposed tree root and veered off deeper into the woods. Blacknail eyed the surroundings carefully as they moved. It was faint but the dirt here had been beaten down and hardened by footsteps into a trail that led from the village off into the woods. People were obviously using this path frequently.

The goblin and the bandits followed the trail for a few minutes, until the sound of voices reached Blacknail’s ears. Gob noticed them at the same time, and both the hobgoblins immediately stared ahead towards the noises’ source. As he listened, Blacknail raised a hand to signal for silence and slowed his pace. He took extra effort to move quietly as he continued to walk forward. It sounded like only two people were talking, a man and a woman. Blacknail smiled. That was a perfect size group for the bandits to target, so he kept creeping closer through the underbrush, and soon he spotted his quarry.

There were three humans, not two. One of them had simply been staying quiet. The first two were standing right next to each other. One of them was a blonde girl and the other was a brunette boy. They were a few feet from the path and looking at something on the ground. There were several branches and bushes in the way, so the details were hard to make out but that much was visible. Blacknail crept up beside a tree and peered around the trunk to get a better look, but he didn’t have any luck, so he switched to studying the third person. There was a second young man leaning up against a tree a few feet from his companions. He was blonde and he had a look on his face that betrayed a mix of annoyance and disgust as he watched the other two.

Apparently Blacknail wasn’t the only one that noticed the boy’s expression. The other young man with brown hair did as well, and he spoke up. “Why did you come with us if you are just going to glare and make stupid faces at my back?”

“You know the reason. Anyone going out into the woods needs to be in groups of at least three,” the blonde young man replied.

“But we’re only a few minutes away from home. This is practically our yard!”

“The rules still stand. You never know what’s out here. The forest is a dangerous place and I wasn’t going to let my sister come out here without any real protection, especially with you.”

“What the hells is that supposed to mean?” the brunette boy replied indignantly. There was a rustling as he rose to his feet, but the other boy just smiled.

“It means I don’t think you can take care of yourself let alone others, and if you trip over a root and crack your skull then I don’t want her to have to carry you back herself.”

There was a second of angry silence before the girl spoke up. “Come on boys, stop arguing, it’s just silly. Let’s have a good time.”

After that their voices grew quieter so Blacknail carefully retreated back to the rest of his party. He had heard and seen enough anyway. These people would make great hostages and would be easy to capture. They were clearly idiots with little in the way of survival skills.

“What did you see?” Geralhd asked Blacknail when he got back. His voice was quiet and nervous. Behind him stood the other bandits and Gob.

“Three scrawny and weak-looking humans. Two males and a female,” Blacknail replied.

“Great, let’s grab them!” Beardy said as he stepped forward. He didn’t get very far though, because Blacknail sniffed disdainfully and got in his way.

“No, that’s stupid. You can’t just rush in there or they will escape, stupid.”

“Then what should we do?”

“It’s obvious. You need to cut them off and encircle them,” Blacknail explained as he raised a finger and drew a circle in the air. As everyone listened the hobgoblin laid out his plan. If there was one thing that Blacknail was an expert at it was hunting down prey, especially human prey. They were very predictable.

When they were done planning all the humans split into two groups and headed off in different directions. Blacknail told Gob and the goblins to stay put, and then he followed after Geralhd’s group. A second later, he spun back around and hissed at the goblins that were shadowing him until they ran back to Gob. The stupid creatures really needed to take some initiative and learn a proper language so he could yell at them properly.

Geralhd led his half of the group through the forest for a minute until they were well away from their quarry, and then they stepped onto the path and leisurely began following it back. Blacknail pulled his hood up and kept to the behind his human minions. He was supposed to stay out of sight so that his fearsome greatness didn’t scare the humans too much, or something. He had forgotten the exact reason but it wasn’t important.

Before closing the last stretch and approaching the three youths, Blacknail raised two fingers to his lips and whistled to signal their approach. The sound was almost indistinguishable from that of a real bird, and from off in the forest there was a quick reply from the other party, so they kept moving. It hadn’t been a very good reply, unless the signaller had been trying to imitate a bird that had died halfway through its song, but it served its purpose. Both groups were in position, and the three youths came into sight.

“I’m telling you that last birdcall was weird. We should head back. What if it was a harpy or something?” the shorter brown haired boy told the other. The blonde woman was pressed up against him, and all three of them were standing on the path together and talking.

“There would have to be more than one harpy to threaten us, and they know better than to come near here. Every time one of those things shows their ugly face a hunting party is sent out to exterminate them. Our father still has a skull he got from the last hunt,” the blonde young man replied. He didn’t sound too concerned.

“What about goblins?”

“Those stunted wretches, what about them? I know the old folks like to tell horror stories about them but that’s all they are, stories. We’re in no danger from goblins. You’re just being jumpy.”

Suddenly, the girl looked past her companions and spotted the bandits walking their way. She froze as she studied them, and then she flinched and her mouth fell open slightly in shock. The two boys noticed her behaviour and turned to see what she was looking at.

“Oh, hello there!” Geralhd greeted them. His voice was pleasant and he waved a hand in their direction. The men behind him also smiled, but in a far less friendly way. They were about thirty feet away now.

The taller blonde boy was the one that replied. His voice stuttered nervously as he spoke and he had gone pale. He was clearly terrified but trying not to show it. “Who… are you?”

“I’m just a harmless traveller who has gotten lost and is looking to get some directions, and maybe some shelter for the night,” Geralhd replied with a broad reassuring smile.

The girl stepped closer to the other boy and hugged his arm tightly to her chest. She didn’t seem convinced.

“And what about all the men behind you with the weapons?” the blonde boy asked as he stuck out an arm and pushed the other two back behind him. All three of the youths then took a few nervous steps away from the bandits.

“They are my associates. The forest is a dangerous place for a lone traveller. You don’t need to be afraid of them,” Geralhd replied in the same calm voice.

It looked like the young humans were going to bolt off into the forest, but they didn’t get a chance. There was a rustling sound as the other group of bandits stepped out of the bushes and onto the path behind the youths. The youngsters paled even more when they saw the newcomers. They were surrounded now, and they knew it.

“Those are also some of my associates,” Geralhd said as the young woman began trembling.

“What do you want?” the shorter boy asked as he held the girl and glared defiantly Gerlahd’s way.

“I already told you. I just want to ask you some questions, that’s all. We can all be friends, so why don’t you sit down so we can talk,” Geralhd answered. This time there was a cold tone to his voice that made it clear that he wasn’t making a suggestion.

All three of the youths stepped closer together. There was a desperate look in their eyes as they searched for an escape route.

“Sit,” Geralhd ordered them as both groups of bandits closed in. All three of the youths immediately sat down on the ground. The rough looking and dirty bandits quickly took the opportunity to encircle them.

“If you harm us our parents and the others will hunt you down,” the blonde haired boy explained. There were amused chuckles from a lot of the bandits. Khita’s laugh was one of the loudest, and her voice drew the tall blonde boy’s attention, and he clearly had no idea what to make of her because he frowned in confusion.

“I don’t want to harm you,” Geralhd reassured them as he crouched down so that their faces were almost level. “I just want to ask you some questions and then maybe you can do us a quick favour and introduce us to your village.”

The three youths exchanged glances before the girl replied. “What do you want to know, sir?”

The question took Geralhd by surprise. He hesitated for a moment as he tried to come up with an answer. They hadn’t actually planned this part.

“Um… we just want to know about your village,” he eventually explained.

There was no immediate reply so Elyias took the opportunity to lean down and ask his own question. “Do you worship any strange gods that command you to murder outsiders or eat human flesh?”

“No... um... we have a small shrine to Ter-vur,” the blonde boy answered slowly. He had obviously been taken aback by the question, and now everyone was looking at Elyias weirdly.

“What kind of stupid question was that?” Beardy asked the other bandit.

“An important one,” Elyias replied defensively. “Do you want to be eaten by cannibals?”

Before anyone else could speak up Blacknail stepped forward and asked his own question.  “Do you have cheese?” The bandits had run out days ago and Blacknail dearly missed the taste.

This time it was the girl that replied. “A little? We have a few goats although the last cow died a couple years back.”

There was an exasperated sigh from Beardy, and before the hobgoblin could respond to the girl Geralhd glared at him. Oh right, he wasn’t supposed to be talking. Why had he agreed to that, again?

Without anymore interruptions, Geralhd interrogated the captives about their village. They were reluctant to talk about certain things, but soon a clear picture of the fortified community began to appear.

“It seems like a half decent place to get some supplies and maybe spend a night,” Geralhd observed. “They have empty homes and they don’t sound like a bunch of paranoid bastards we can’t trust.”

Most the other bandits agreed and they soon came to a decision. They would risk trying to contact the village and seeing if they could spend the night there. Blacknail went along with it mostly because it sounded much more exciting than staying out in the forest, plus they had cheese.

“Let’s grab these younglings and get moving then,” Beardy remarked impatiently.

“I volunteer to guard the girl on the way over,” Elyias said as he leered her way.

“As if, greenhorn. I’ll do that,” an older bandit remarked.

“I’ll watch her,” Blacknail said as he stepped closer to the blonde girl.

“Er, why? I thought you weren’t into that…”

“Into what?” Blacknail asked as he blinked in confusion. Why couldn’t the humans just make sense?

“You know…” the older bandit replied as he made several crude finger gestures. Blacknail stared blankly at him. He had no idea what the bandit was trying to get at, so he just clarified his own thoughts.

“I’m much faster and a better guard than any of you, and the other two little people smell horrible.”

“Ah, that makes sense,” the bandit said as the two boys gave Blacknail hostile looks. Humans could be weirdly sensitive about their smell even though their noses were barely functional.

The girl looked frightened by all the sudden attention. The captives had calmed down somewhat once it became apparent they weren’t about to be assaulted and murdered but they were still on edge.

“You should probably stay back and keep watch. You’re our best scout after all,” Geralhd quickly interjected before lowering his voice to a whisper and continuing. “And you promised to stay away from the captives! They can’t learn that you’re a hobgoblin.”

This caused Blacknail to snort in annoyance, but he didn’t argue the point. Without a word, he moved to the back of the group as they got moving. The captives were in the middle of the party as they made their way back up the trail and towards the village.

The three youths weren’t the only nervous ones, though. Most the bandit’s looked uncertain and moved stiffly. Approaching the village was something they had to do but it was also dangerous. They didn’t know exactly what they would find there. Soon enough, they reached the edge of the woods and began crossing the clearing and the worked earth within it. Ahead of them, the settlement wall made up of wooden stakes loomed. It’s hostile presence informing everyone that the village was prepared to defend itself from outsiders.









HAH 2











As they approached the wall in front of them, none of the bandits had their weapons out. They had taken pains to make themselves as presentable as possible after spending so long hiking through the forest. It hadn’t really worked. They still looked exactly like what they were, a pack of desperate bandits that sane people should avoid.

The captured youths that were now being herded by the bandits had said that there wasn’t usually a lookout on duty at the gate, just a guard, and that seemed to be true. Blacknail’s group got right to the entrance before they were noticed. Geralhd opened his mouth to shout for attention when he was interrupted by a spiel of swearing from the other side. That was quickly followed by the hidden man there yelling for backup and crying for the village to take up arms. 

“This already could have gone better,” Beardy commented. 

“Let’s run while we still have the chance,” Elyias muttered fearfully. 

“Just let me do all the talking and we’ll be fine,” Geralhd said as they waited for someone in the village to take charge. He didn’t sound too convincing. 

It took a few minutes for that to happen, but eventually a gruff voice addressed them from the other side of the gate. “Who are you and what are doing with those children?”

“We are just some lost travellers who happened to stumble upon your humble abode here and thought to introduce ourselves,” Geralhd replied politely. “We mean you no harm, and we certainly wouldn’t harm any children. We encountered them in the woods and thought maybe we could ask them some questions about your village. We were just curious and they’re here with us now because I thought you’d want them to come home after all this commotion.”

There was a disbelieving huff from the hidden man. “So you’ll let them go at any time?”

“Of course, although they can’t exactly go inside as long as this gate is closed.”

“Then how about you back up and leave them here.”

“That would hardly be very gracious on your part, and speaking of manners, you haven’t introduced yourself.”

“I’m Tannin, the headsman of this village. Other than a silver tongued liar, who are you supposed to be?” 

“My name is Geralhd Rhodeius, and it’s a pleasure to meet you, Tannin. Why don’t you open this gate so that we can talk properly? I assure you that we mean you no harm.”

There was no reply for a few seconds but then Geralhd had to step back as the wooden gate in front of him swung open. On the other side there were about two dozen burly men armed with various improvised weapons, including wood axes and pitchforks. All of them were wearing the rough homespun clothing that most peasants wore. Standing out front was an older man with thick arms and a long grey beard. His head was balding and thin of hair but his eyes were full of fierce energy. 

“Now, Geralhd, how about you let the children come over and you tell us what is it that you really want?” the man asked in Tannin’s voice. The bandits glanced at each other nervously but didn’t draw their weapons.

“We weren’t really holding them so of course they can leave,” Geralhd replied as he signalled to the men behind him, who stepped aside. 

The three youths promptly ran away from the bandits and joined the villagers. The headsman relaxed slightly when they reached him but he quickly shushed them and pushed them back behind his men where they were out of the way. 

“See, we aren’t here to hurt anyone. We only want to have a friendly conversation,” Geralhd said as he smiled politely. 

“We don’t get many visitors here and I have a low tolerance for bullshit, so why don’t you get right to the point and tell me exactly what you want,” Tannin replied. 

“Fair enough. My companions and I are travelling East but we need to avoid the main road. We want to buy supplies, get directions, and rest here for the night.”

Tannin’s eyes narrowed as he studied Geralhd. “And why should we let you in or deal with your kind at all? We could just close this gate and you’d be forced to leave.”

“It’s a nice wall but it’s hardly a real guarantee of protection. Besides, if you’re going to be that inhospitable to everyone that passes by then eventually you are going to anger someone. Such a person or group might stick around to cause problems for you and I really doubt you would want them spreading news of your community around when they do leave. You’d be better off staying on their good side and getting something out of dealing with them.”

“Ha, how do you propose to pay us for our goods?” 

“We have coin and a few extra small blades we could trade. Isolated as you are, I doubt you have much in the way of spare iron here.” 

“I might be able to arrange the things you want, but if we did let you inside what guarantee do I have that you’ll behave. You all seem to be armed to the teeth and that concerns me more than a little.”

“There aren’t enough of us to attack this settlement, and making enemies out of you would only come back to bite us. We have every reason to stay friendly.” 

As the armed villagers watched the bandits, Geralhd and the village headsman continued their talk for several long minutes. A dozen more armed villagers arrived to join their fellows, but Tannin’s expression grew less hostile and angry over time and he eventually decided to let the bandits in, and they began to bargain about the price. Things grew slightly heated when Tannin ordered the bandits to hand over their weapons but Geralhd didn’t back down.

“Even armed we are still too outnumbered to take this village, but without our blades we stand no chance at all of defending ourselves if you decide to just rob us instead of sticking to your word,” he argued. Tannin was unhappy with that line of reasoning but eventually conceded the point. 

“Fine I’ll show where you can bunk up and I’ll arrange to see what we can sell you. You’ll be under guard though, so don’t wander around or cause trouble,” the village headsman said. Blacknail thought he detected a sly slant to his smile but didn’t know what to make of it. 

Geralhd nodded in acceptance and grinned triumphantly to himself. There were sighs of relief as the bandits began following the villagers deeper into the settlement. It seemed like a fight had been avoided, but as Blacknail fell in behind the bandits Geralhd turned and whispered his way. 

“You should sneak away now, Blacknail. The goblins shouldn’t be left alone and you can meet up with us after dark. I’m sure you can make it into the village and find us without being detected.”

His words sounded a bit too much like orders to Blacknail, so the hobgoblin scowled. “I’m the leader and think I should stay here and instead you should go meet up with the goblins.” 

“Yes, you’re the leader... but they’re still suspicious of us and with your hood up you stand out. You can’t hide your skin color from them, and if the villagers do turn against us then you’re the only one who could sneak in and free us.”

That argument didn’t sit well with Blacknail. He wanted to stay closer to the cheese, but he had to admit Geralhd had several good points. He grunted in aggravation and then quickly spun around. Blacknail was only a few steps from the gate, and it took him but a moment to slip back outside the wall. Several bandits were between him and the villagers so none of them noticed him leave. The cloaked hobgoblin crept around the outside of the wall for a bit - to avoid any watchers - before sprinting across the fields and towards the forest. He would be back when it got darker. 

The sound of singing birds could be heard from up in the treetops overhead, as Blacknail trudged through the bush. It was a fair walk back to where he had left the goblins, but after a few minutes some of the bushes up ahead shook and a familiar pair of goblins scampered out. It was Scamp and Imp, and Imp was still hauling his heavy backpack around. They must have been waiting for Blacknail to leave the village and decided to meet up with him. 

“Where are the others?” Blacknail asked them. None of the feral goblins had appeared.

Scamp immediately threw a look back over his shoulder and a confused frown appeared on his ugly green face. It seemed like he hadn’t even noticed that the ferals weren’t around until just then. On the other hand, Imp just gave the hobgoblin a calm knowing look that irritated Blacknail.

“They left to follow a smell. Gob looked angry,” Imp explained. He didn’t seem too concerned, but then again he never did. 

“They’re not very nice so we stayed to wait for you, boss. You’re much better than them,” Scamp added helpfully. 

This news didn’t please Blacknail. Not only was he supposed to keep a watch on the goblins but Gob had acted without permission. This is what Blacknail had been afraid of and why hobgoblins couldn’t be trusted! He could only hope Gob wasn’t leading a raid on the human settlement at this very moment. He should have dealt with the other hobgoblin days ago. 

“What way did they go?” the hobgoblin asked.

Both the goblins immediately pointed in completely different directions. Blacknail groaned and rubbed his eyes. This was dumb. Was he going to have to go all the way back to the place he’d last seen Gob and track him from there? That would be a waste of his time and he probably didn’t have much left. 

“They went off into the forest away from the humans,” Imp added, which caused Scamp to nod along. Both the goblins dropped their arms. 

That was an important bit of news. Imp was undoubtedly the smarter of the pair... 

“Which way did they go again?” Blacknail asked as he got ready to move. 

Unsurprisingly, the goblins pointed in different directions again, but this time Scamp was clearly pointing far to the left of his last choice, while Imp’s orientation hadn’t changed.

“That way it is,” Blacknail grumbled as he broke out into a quick jog in the direction Imp had indicated. The goblins followed him as he cut through the forest and headed deeper into the woods. 

It took the hobgoblin a few minutes to stumble upon the feral goblins’ trail. Imp had apparently been right. They had made a lot of tracks and disturbed the forest. Blacknail picked up speed as he followed the signs and started running, but even then it took him over half an hour before he found anything. 

As the hobgoblin jumped over a fallen log he spotted the missing goblins. They were all crouched behind a clump of bushes and peering through the branches. Blacknail snarled as he saw Gob in the center of the group. He drew his sword and stalked toward the other hobgoblin. How dare he disobey an order! The noise drew Gob’s attention. He looked over his shoulder and then flinched in terror at the sight of Blacknail closing in on him. 

“What are you doing?” Blacknail hissed angrily. He didn’t appreciate having to run so much. 

“Enemy goblin,” Gob quickly replied as he lurched to his feet. There was an uncertain look on his face as he met Blacknail’s gaze but then he turned away to look through the bush again. Blacknail took a second to follow his stare. Whatever was there must be important, or this was some sort of trick. 

Up ahead the forest ended and gave way to a series of low rocky hills. Only a few scraggly trees spotted their desolate surface. The terrain on the way here had been uneven and steep, so the area they were in now was hidden away within a low valley that was surrounded by tall peaks covered in greenery. 

At first, Blacknail didn’t notice anything special about the place, other than all the rocks, but then something caught his eye. He ignored Gob and came to a stop. There was a post at the bottom of one of the rocky hills, and a human skull had been placed atop of it. Its empty eye sockets stared out into the forest. Colored feathers had been jammed into gaps in the wood and weird symbols had been carved into the post below the bleached bones. Half the symbols looked like crudely drawn genitalia, so this was probably the work of feral goblins. 

“Goblins attack goblin. Follow here,” Gob explained. 

“I see,” Blacknail mumbled to himself before glancing back at his hobgoblin minion. He understood what had happened now. One of the goblins he had sent out to scout must have stumbled upon a goblin from another pack. The two had fought and then things had naturally escalated until Gob had decided to raid the enemy himself and slaughter them all. 

That left Blacknail with only one real option: total war. These goblins were his minions – even if he didn’t really want them – so an attack on them was an attack on him, as well as a good excuse to have some fun. Besides, it was only a bit past noon now. It wouldn’t be dark for hours, and Blacknail didn’t want to sit around and wait. Geralhd had wanted Blacknail to keep the goblins out of trouble but he probably wouldn’t care about something like a small tribal war, or ever even know about it. Who would tell him? Most of the goblins couldn’t talk and Scamp was an idiot who rarely remembered anything that wasn’t beaten into him repeatedly over a long period of time. 

The problem was that post. It wasn’t something you would expect a small tribe to make, and Gob only had half a dozen goblins with him. The post was also too tall for a goblin to have placed that skull there alone, and teamwork was unlikely. Thus, it was most likely the work of a hobgoblin, and that would also explain Gob’s aggressive behaviour. The scent of the other hobgoblin must have enraged him. 

“You’re lucky I showed up,” Blacknail told Gob as he sheathed his sword. “You’re kind of runty for a hobgoblin, and it’s stupid to attack an enemy in their own territory without a plan.”

Blacknail grinned to himself as he stepped through the bushes and began walking over to the post. He was still feeling angry, but now he had a new target to focus on, one he didn’t have to hold back against. His hood was down and his hobgoblin features were plainly visible as he strode out into the clearing. The rule about walking into enemy territory didn’t apply to him. He was special.

Almost immediately there was a reaction. Two dozen goblins rose from hiding places atop the nearby hills and out from behind rocks. They growled menacingly and their ugly green faces were scrunched up into vicious snarls as they grabbed stones and raised them in preparation to throw. Blacknail calmly watched a single stony projectile zoom his way but it fell short and rolled harmlessly to a stop at his feet. With an amused grin, he then scooped the rock up and pulled out his sling. A twirl of the weapon sent the projectile straight back at its original thrower. It hit the surprised goblin right between eyes with a loud thud and knocked it unconscious. The other goblins fell silent as they watched their companion roll down the side of the hill.

“Now what will you do?” Blacknail mused as he looked around for the enemy leader. He still hadn’t shown himself. Gob and his goblins stepped out of the bushes and took up position behind Blacknail. The enemy goblins were starting to look afraid now. 

Nothing happened for several long moments as the two groups stared at each other, and Blacknail began to grow impatient. If the enemy wasn’t going to show himself then Blacknail would force his hand. The hobgoblin drew in a deep breath and then bellowed as loudly as he could. The unexpected blast of sound startled everyone, but as soon as Blacknail fell silent an answering roar rose into the air as the enemy hobgoblin finally stepped out from behind a large jagged boulder and into sight. 

Striking yellow eyes filled with hate glared at Blacknail from atop a long crooked nose. The hobgoblin was bulky and taller than any other hobgoblin Blacknail had seen before, but his two horns were short and straight. Several long pale scars decorated his skin, he was dressed in dirty rags that could only have once been human clothing, and he was holding a rusty axe. It was clearly a woodsman’s axe and its edge had dulled from neglect but it still looked dangerous. 

The hobgoblin’s appearance caused Blacknail to smile hungrily to himself. Blacknail was still outnumbered and in hostile territory, but it had been a while since he’d had an opportunity to let loose. This looked like it was going to be fun, and deliciously bloody. 





HAH 3








The swarm of feral goblins glared at Blacknail with hate-filled eyes. More and more of them were slipping into sight from behind rocky hills and grey boulders. Most of them gathered up behind their leader, the yellow eyed hobgoblin, until there were almost forty of them. They shook and fidgeted as they worked themselves into a fury and glared at the intruders. In the center of the group, their hobgoblin chieftain watched Blacknail with his bright yellow eyes. He stood confidently but seemed willing to wait.

“Let’s run away,” Scamp said as he cowered behind Blacknail. He clearly regretted coming out of the bushes that bordered the forest behind him.

“Run and I’ll make you into a loincloth,” Blacknail hissed in reply as he studied the enemy.

This wasn’t a small tribe at all, and they far outnumbered Blacknail’s own paltry force. Even with another hobgoblin to back him up they would quickly be swarmed over by the mob in a straight up fight. Even a good sword wouldn’t stop an angry green wave. Blacknail wasn’t too worried, though. It wouldn’t come to that, because that wasn’t how goblins acted. They were only slightly smarter than humans, but they were far less likely to commit suicide for no real reason. Still, it would be a terrible idea to let the enemy have time or let them think they had the advantage. If they sensed weakness then the wild goblins would attack all together.

“We’re going to charge. Follow me or I’ll rip your guts out,” Blacknail ordered his followers. He then eyed Gob and made an aggressive gesture that he hoped conveyed his meaning. The other hobgoblin didn’t have a great understanding of how to talk.

“What?” Scamp asked disbelievingly.

Instead of responding, Blacknail drew his sword and launched himself forward. Another roar echoed out from his throat as he closed the distance between himself and his target.

“Die, you snotty runts!” he yelled at the top of his lungs.

The enemy goblins flinched in surprise. Instinctively, they huddled closer together for a moment for safety. The yellow eyed hobgoblin froze for a split second but then quickly raised his axe. This didn’t faze Blacknail. He grinned savagely as he dove forward. Meanwhile, the massed goblins realized who Blacknail’s target was. The sudden noise and the attack startled them. Caught off guard, they didn’t have time to do anything but react. Screeching filled the air as the goblins dove away from the charging hobgoblin. It was one thing for them to seek safety in numbers from an enemy but it was something completely different to place themselves directly between two fighting hobgoblins.  

Blacknail didn’t waste this opportunity. He attacked the exposed enemy leader. However, one of the fleeing goblins was too slow, and didn’t manage to get out of the way in time. Blacknail kicked him aside before stepping forward and slashing at the yellow eyed hobgoblin. There was a loud thud as the hobgoblin pivoted away from the attack and knocked the sword blade aside with a swing of his axe. The blade bit into the wooden shaft but didn’t do much damage and bounced back.

The startled mass of goblins flinched away from the fighting like rippling water and dissolved into chaos. They didn’t know what to do. Their leader tried to step back and strike at Blacknail, but he was too slow. Blacknail growled and lunged forward at the same moment. Both their weapons were still locked together. A shimmer of fear flashed in the hobgoblin’s yellow eyes and he was forced to step back as Blacknail leaned forward and snapped at him. Blacknail’s teeth closed on empty air but the action startled everyone.

“You’re a big fish in a small pond, very small,” Blacknail hissed through his teeth as he stared at his surprised opponent.

A few enemy goblins that Blacknail had scattered decided to act despite their fear. Three of them jumped at him from the side, but that was when Gob joined the fight. With fists swinging wildly he waded into the fight and assaulted any of the goblins that tried to get close to Blacknail. The smaller fighters screeched as they were pushed aside by this new threat and then Gob’s own minions rushed in to support him. The melee descended into chaos.

One goblin did manage to get through, and Blacknail had to take a second to kick it away. This gave the enemy hobgoblin time to recover but Blacknail didn’t care. He just laughed manically as he turned back to face his opponent. The fearful goblins tried to stay out of their way.

“You have no idea what I am. You don’t know how afraid you should be!” Blacknail laughed as he raised his blade. The cloak draped over his shoulders rippled as he moved. It felt good to let his emotions out after controlling himself around humans for so long. Out here their rules no longer applied to him. He was free.

The uncomprehending feral hobgoblin simply hissed and sputtered angrily in response. He didn’t know what Blacknail had just said but the confidence he was projecting appeared to worry him. A shimmer of fear had appeared in his eyes, but instead of trying to retreat he attacked again. The yellow-eyed hobgoblin raised his axe up and swung it straight down at Blacknail.

The blow didn’t connect. A metallic ringing noise rang out as Blacknail parried the attack. He then stepped forward and slugged his yellow-eyed opponent in the face. There was a wet crack as the hobgoblin fell over backwards. His long green nose was now bent at an awkward angle and his eyes were wide with pain and surprise.

A nearby goblin saw an opportunity and jumped at Blacknail from behind. He was gripping a large sharp rock in one hand. Blacknail saw him coming, turned, grabbed his arm, and then used the goblin’s own momentum to toss him through the air and over a nearby pile of rock. Several other nearby goblins watched with impressed looks on their faces.

The yellow-eyed hobgoblin once again tried to catch Blacknail off guard. From where he had fallen on the ground, he whistled sharply, and then a goblin that had been hanging back out of the fight rushed forward and tossed something his way. The yellow-eyed hobgoblin caught the javelin out of the air, and then he whipped it at Blacknail’s head as he jumped to his feet.

The projectile zoomed past Blacknail’s face as he leaned out of the way. It all happened in a single instant, but Blacknail noticed that something had been smeared across the tip of the weapon. It was probably some sort of poison, and Blacknail made a mental note to watch out for such tricks. The enemy hobgoblin hissed in disappointment when his surprise attack failed. He reached down to pick up his fallen axe, but Blacknail didn’t give him time to take a defensive stance.  He extended the momentum of his dodge into a quick spin that ended with a slash of his sword.

“I’m bloody magic!” Blacknail hissed as his blade sliced into his opponents shoulder. “I have killed beasts and men far more dangerous than you!”

The cut wasn’t that deep but the pain made the enemy hobgoblin gasp and waver. Blacknail had no mercy. It was time to end this farce of a fight. He unleashed a flurry of attacks that leapt past his enemy’s defenses and drew blood. His opponent stumbled again so Blacknail slashed at his eyes. The enemy immediately ducked down out of the way but the attack had been a feint. As the yellow-eyed hobgoblin dropped, Blacknail’s booted foot smashed into his groin.

There was a shrill squeak and a pop as the enemy hobgoblin’s eyes crossed and he collapsed. He looked like he was in a lot of pain so Blacknail helped him out. Before he had even hit the ground, Blacknail swung his sword around in an arc and the tip of his blade ripped the hobgoblin’s throat out.

“Ouchie,” Scamp remarked from the edge of the fighting. There were groans and gasps of shock from many of the other goblins and all of them immediately stopped fighting. They all stared at the victor of the duel uncertainly.

Blacknail took a moment to stomp on his fallen opponent’s body and end the annoying gargling sound it was making before turning to meet the gaze of the onlookers.

“All of you. Big goblins and small ones, you have no idea what lurks outside your territory, the things I have seen. You are all so petty and stupid, just beasts that live in the dirt,” Blacknail said as sneered at the nearby goblins. They cowered and shifted nervously under his vicious gaze. Their fear amused Blacknail.

“That’s kind of mean,” Scamp remarked. Blacknail ignored him since he was too far away to kick and that would ruin his moment.

The joy of victory had lifted Blacknail’s spirits. All his previous doubts were as nothing. Why had he even cared about such stupid things? He was full of confidence and energy. He could do anything.

“I am the greatest of hobgoblins! A chief among chiefs!” Blacknail screamed triumphantly as he stomped on his fallen foe's body a few more times. Conquest felt good. A lot of Herad’s old actions made more sense now. He should do this more often.

No one interrupted Blacknail, but after a few minutes standing around and gloating to a bunch of goblins got boring, so Blacknail stepped away from the yellow-eyed goblin’s corpse and looked around. An eager Gob walked over to Blacknail and gibbered something before motioning towards the nearby hills. He was practically vibrating with energy and his eyes were wide with excitement.

“You’re right, Gob. Let’s go see what I’ve conquered,” Blacknail replied as he began to walk over to the nearest hill. There had to be a lair around here somewhere.

As he searched the hills for a cave or crevice, the defeated goblins began to disperse. It was clear now that Blacknail wasn’t going to try and slaughter them all right this instant so they had things to do. One smallish local goblin with a bluish tint to her skin hesitantly wandered over to one hill and called out to Blacknail. When the hobgoblin looked over she pointed towards an opening. She was obviously trying to get on Blacknail’s good side by being his guide. That was fine with Blacknail.

Closer inspection of the opening revealed a dark crevice that the yellow-eyed hobgoblin had apparently been using as his personal chamber. It was big enough to hold a dozen goblins but it looked and smelled like only the hobgoblin had slept here. There were few items stashed around the place, but nothing more interesting than a few yellow rocks.

Once he was done looking that cave over, Blacknail’s guide led him to several other small caves that were being used by the goblins. None of them caught Blacknail’s attention, but as they were walking, other local goblins approached him to offer the conquering hobgoblin tribute. Blacknail took most the berries and fresh meat for himself but passed the shiny stones and other such things to Gob. He had enough of that sort of stuff already.

The last cave he was led to was different from the others. The entrance was at the bottom of a hole near the post, and it took a second to climb down. This cave was much larger than all the others and didn’t look like the goblins had used it much. It was wide and extended deep into the ground until it ended at a pile of rubble. It looked like there had been a cave-in at some point. Unfortunately, it was hard to make out the details since it was too dark even for goblin eyes to see clearly inside. One small section of the wall did contain a bit of the yellow metal that humans liked, though.

Once Blacknail had completed his inspection, he walked over to the tallest hill and took a seat atop of it. From there he could see everything in the rocky area and the forest beyond it. He was no longer feeling quite so euphoric but his mind felt clearer than it had during the march North. Gob and several goblins waited for him at the bottom as Blacknail began to think. Gob knelt there reverently and a few of the goblins copied him, although most of them just sat down.

Now Blacknail was the chieftain of another bunch of goblins. Did that matter? Was that what he wanted? The joy of shedding blood and destroying his enemies had begun to fade. Taking this place had been fun but staying here seemed boring. It couldn’t compare to being a part of Herad’s band. These were just goblins. There was no Saeter here, no sense of home. Blacknail’s memories still tugged at his heart. He had things to do; even if he didn’t know exactly what it was he had to do or how to do it.

The sky overhead had begun to darken as the sun fell toward the western horizon, and Blacknail sighed. It was time to get back to the human village and the bandits. Who knew what sort of trouble they had gotten themselves into without him around? Blacknail took a few moments to explain to Gob that he was now in charge of everything while Blacknail was gone and that he didn’t want to be followed. Gob appeared to reluctantly accept this command, so Blacknail left everyone behind and sprinted off into the woods.

Blacknail ran at a fast pace that soon left him out of breath, because he didn’t want to take too long or be out in the forest when darkness fell. That was when things got truly dangerous. As he ran, Blacknail realized that he could just leave Gob and the others behind now and they would never bother him again. That was an idea worth considering. The goblins were more than a little annoying.

After about half an hour, the hobgoblin reached the village and its tall wooden walls came into sight. No ravenous beasts or monsters blocked his way. After waiting a few more aggravating minutes for the sun to set a little more and for the night to grow darker, Blacknail crept out of the bushes at the edge of the clearing and stalked across the empty fields. He reached the wall without incident and listened carefully for any sign of watchers before choosing a deserted-looking section of the wall to climb over. He took off his boots and his claws made the ascent simple. They dug into the soft wood and easily found purchase.

The village was largely quiet. Before proceeding, Blacknail took a moment to pull his hood up and put his boots back on.  There didn’t seem to be much in the way of late afternoon activity here, unlike in larger human settlements such as Daggerpoint. Blacknail moved cautiously and kept to the shadows as he searched for Geralhd and the others. He hoped they hadn’t all been killed. He already had enough dead humans to avenge, more important ones.

The village only had thirty or forty buildings of various sizes, so it didn’t take the hobgoblin too long to find his first clue to his quarry’s location. Several armed villagers were standing out in the middle of one section of the street and watching three nearby homes. Blacknail was pretty sure he knew what that meant, so he slipped into an alley and circled around to the back of the buildings.

Once in the dark and tight space between the homes where no one could see him, the sound of conversation drew Blacknail’s attention. He snuck up to a ground story window and listened.

“Thank you again for your hospitality, master Tannin,” Geralhd said.

“Ha, there is no need for stuffy titles out here, lad. I’m just another villager, and not a master of anything but myself,” Tannin replied.

“Still I’m grateful.”

“Feel free, graciousness is never unwanted; however let’s talk about something more important. You seem like a bright young man, so I bet you’re wondering why I let you all in. You’re clearly not just a bunch of lost travelers, not armed like that you’re not.”

“We have no intention of causing trouble.”

“I’m not saying you do. The truth of the matter is that you’re hardly the first bunch of miscreants to wander by, although you’re the largest yet.”

Blacknail took a chance and peered through the window for a second. There was a small room on the other side, and no one was looking his way. Tannin and Geralhd were both seated at a small table across from each other.

“Er.. and what happened to those people, may I ask?” Geralhd asked nervously.

Tannin laughed loudly in amusement and slapped his thighs. “Nothing too terrible, lad. I’m one of them. Anyone who wanders out in this direction has reasons to want to stay out of sight, and this settlement is always looking for more manpower.”

“If that’s an invitation to take up residence here we will have to decline. Several of our group are looking forward to getting back to civilization.”

“Ah, that’s too bad. You seem like a useful person to have around. I’ll let you think about it overnight and discuss it with your companions,” Tannin replied jovially as he stood up and pushed his chair aside.

As Blacknail squatted in the alley and listened, a realization crystallized in his head. It had been nagging at him for weeks but only now was it clear. He didn’t want to go to Daggerpoint. There was nothing for him there. Events had been forcing Blacknail to react and do what other people wanted. That was going to end. It was time he figured out what he really wanted and how he was going to get it. In the shadows, the hobgoblin began to plan...










HAH 4










Of course, the problem was all the humans. Their weird mental issues really complicated Blacknail’s plans. The tight alley was dark and shadowy as the hobgoblin leaned against the side of the building he had just been spying into. It seemed unlikely that anyone would stumble his way, so he had plenty of time to think.

What did Blacknail want for himself? Food? Shiny things? No, he wanted to kill Werrick. Blacknail’s mouth began to water whenever he thought about it. The memories of Saeter’s last moments were still fresh in Blacknail’s mind, and they demanded action. Blood had to be paid with blood, but killing Werrick would be very difficult and dangerous.

None of the survivors of Herad’s camp were anything like Saeter. Blacknail had travelled with the humans for a while now but it hadn’t filled the hole in his heart. Going to Daggerpoint wouldn’t satisfy him at all. His master couldn’t be replaced by anyone else. It was pointless to try. Only vengeance was left to him.

Werrick would be difficult to kill, though. He was a powerful Vessel and he had a horde of minions. Being sneaky wouldn’t be enough, which meant Blacknail needed more power, and the easiest way to get that was by increasing the size of his tribe. Werrick had a large army so Blacknail needed one too. Unfortunately, while that idea was very appealing, it would be hard to actually accomplish.

After observing his human minions for a while Blacknail had come to the troubling conclusion that most of them didn’t like having him in charge. Even though he had done such a great job as their leader and saved their lives too many times to count they didn’t trust him, and it was obviously because he was a hobgoblin. What a bunch of stupid herd animals.

Blacknail sighed as doubt clouded his mind. There was no way he was ever going to build a human army the way Herad or Werrick had. Being the strongest wasn’t enough. Did that mean his goal was impossible? Maybe he was just thinking about this the wrong way. What if he thought about this like it was… a hunt? Yes, that could work. He had certain tools available and it was all about using them correctly in order to corner his quarry. Most of the tools were humans, and they were defined by their fear and their greed. Controlling them was simply a matter of introducing the right type of motivation at the right time. He also had some other tools available, like the goblins, even if they were useless for anything that required an attention span of over a minute.  

After going over his options for a while Blacknail was forced to take a break. The pieces weren’t falling into place. He had hit a mental wall and while he had been thinking night had fallen around him. It was almost pitch black outside now. The only noise was from far off night birds and the occasionally rustle of a rat moving through the garbage behind the hobgoblin.

“Time to sleep. I can think later,” Blacknail yawned. He then turned and climbed through the nearby window that led into the home Geralhd was using.

The room on the other side was lit by a single flickering candle. Geralhd was still sitting in his chair at the table, but it looked like he had fallen asleep. He was slumped over and his chest rose and fell slowly as a quiet whistling sound issued forth from his mouth. Blacknail walked over and poked him on the cheek.

“Ah, what?” the man exclaimed in surprise as his now wide open eyes jerked around the room before focusing on Blacknail.

“It’s just me, be quiet,” the hobgoblin replied as Geralhd visibly relaxed.

“Oh, Blacknail, it’s you. I was waiting for you, but I was beginning to wonder if you were ever going to show up tonight.”

“I had stuff to do,” Blacknail said as he looked around the room and then peered through a doorway into the bedroom beyond.

“Well, I was talking to Tannin, this village’s headsman, and it doesn’t seem like they’re going to trick or attack us.”

“Yes, I heard.”

“If you were there then why didn’t you come in earlier?”

“There was someone coming so I had to leave,” Blacknail lied smoothly as he walked into the bedroom and stared down at the bed that was up against the far wall. He walked over to it and began ruffling up the blankets.

“Actually, I was planning on sleeping there…” Geralhd muttered after getting up and talking to the doorway.

Blacknail ignored him and sat down on the bed. The hobgoblin’s mouth stretched wide open as he yawned.

“I guess I’ll just use the smaller bed in the next room,” Geralhd said. He sounded quite annoyed but Blacknail didn’t care.

“Did anything important happen while I was gone? You humans keep getting into trouble.”

“Nothing much, except what I already told you. The plan is that we take a day off to buy whatever we can and rest our feet. We can leave for Daggerpoint the next day.”

There was a creaking noise from the bed as Blacknail leaned over sideways so he was lying down. He kept his eyes on Geralhd and scowled slightly out of irritation. He was still the leader so  he was the one who got to decide when they would leave , although another day to think up his own plan would probably be enough. While Geralhd was here, Blacknail decided to ask him some questions. He had heard the man discuss something interesting with Tannin, and maybe a human’s point of view would help the hobgoblin. Geralhd was the most human-like human Blacknail knew. He was slow to react, confused about everything, and loved saying pointless things that barely made sense.

“I give you all permission to do that, but I have some questions.”

“Oh, what do you want to know?”

“Tannin asked you if you wanted to stay out here in this village,” Blacknail pointed out.

“Ah, that. You don’t have to worry about any of us wanting to stay out here. Only a few of our band would ever be open to that. Staying out here in the wilds isn’t a very appealing choice. This place is just a bunch of dirty shacks. I’m a city man myself and I can’t wait to get back to civilization, where people bathe and women have less facial hair.”

“Hmm, what’s the first thing you want to do when you get to the city?” Blacknail asked. He wanted to understand the humans’ motivations a little better.

“Ha, that’s easy. I want to hit up a tavern and purchase a hot meal and a hot bath. It will cost more than few coins but it will be worth it. That’s probably what most the band will do. We still have a fair bit of silver between us but we can’t spend it out here,” Geralhd laughed.

This answer greatly interested Blacknail. There was a new cheery shine to his eyes as he replied. “Which minions do you think want to get back to a human city the most?”

Geralhd laughed again before replying. He seemed to enjoy discussing the topic and thinking about civilization. While he was talking, Blacknail took a second to match names to faces and remember how much he liked those people.

The hobgoblin and the man talked for a few more minutes before Blacknail yawned again and let Geralhd go. By that time, Blacknail had gotten the inspiration he had wanted. When he was alone, Blacknail took off his boots and coat. He curled up on his bed and smiled to himself before closing his eyes. He had a plan now. The hunt was on.

The next morning Blacknail got up before the sunrise. He got dressed and slipped out of the house before Geralhd was awake. While the other bandits where exploring the village and getting ready to the next day, he was making his own preparations. He ran through the forest and back to the goblins’ lair where Gob was.

When the rocky hills that concealed the caves below came into sight, several goblins that were climbing over them immediately noticed Blacknail and one of them let out a trumpeting screech. A few seconds later, Gob hurried into sight and approached Blacknail.

“You are back, great chief! Command me,” Gob said as he gave a quick respectful bow.

“Yes, your amazing leader is here,” Blacknail replied as he stared appraisingly at Gob. Having another hobgoblin around had originally annoyed Blacknail to no end. There was just something wrong and dangerous about it, but after careful consideration he had decided that the advantages outweighed the disadvantages.

Blacknail turned to look at the nearby goblins who were wandering around the clearing. This tribe was a lot bigger than Gob’s old one. Blacknail wasn’t even sure how many of them there were, but there were at least fifty. Several different groups of various sizes lived in the nearby caves.

The plan Blacknail had come up with last night would only work if he could somehow turn this chaotic goblin tribe into a useful force that would follow orders. It was going to be very hard, but Blacknail had a few good ideas that might work, and since he was the smartest hobgoblin in the entire world, if anyone could do it then it was him.

After collecting his thoughts for a moment, Blacknail began giving orders to Gob. A primitive camp like the one here wouldn’t do. A more secure base had to be built and provided with a steady supply of food. In order for all that to happen the goblins here had to be brought to heel, so the first thing Blacknail ordered Gob to do was to select a group of loyal followers he could stalk and force into obedience. Once they had been beaten into submission they were to be taught how to use traps and stone tools. Loyal lieutenants could be selected from their ranks which in turn would bring more goblins under Blacknail’s control. Blacknail was too busy and important to do that himself.

“Can I rejoin the humans now? I want to see Geralhd,” Scamp whined as he wandered over and interrupted Blacknail’s conversation. Imp was right behind Scamp but he just watched the proceedings with his usual inscrutable expression.

“No, they don’t want you,” Blacknail replied scornfully.

“That’s not true. They pet me and give me tons of treats!”

“They are with other humans who don’t like goblins, so you have to stay here,”

“Not fair!”

“Shut up before I throw a rock at you,” Blacknail threatened as he glared at the goblin.

“I hate it here, everyone is so mean and the food sucks,” Scamp muttered as he turned to leave.

“I didn’t say you could go,” Blacknail added as he reached down and grabbed Scamp’s shoulder.

“Eh?” the surprised goblin said as he stared at Blacknail in confusion.

“You know a lot of human tricks, so help out or I’ll string your puny body up from a tree by your slobbery little tongue.”

Herding goblins was a difficult task, and before Blacknail had accomplished all that much the day began to approach its end. That meant it was time to get back to Geralhd and the others. Blacknail took a moment to stretch himself out before heading back into the forest. As he ran, the hobgoblin considered the next step of his plan.

About an hour later he arrived back at the village. He got there without a problem and easily snuck back inside. Going over the wall was easy in the dark. However, instead of visiting Geralhd again Blacknail snuck around the town and met up with a few of the other bandits. He talked to them for several hours before slipping back into the house Geralhd was using and going to sleep.

The morning of departure came and found Blacknail leading the way towards Daggerpoint. The sky was still dark overhead and the forest was a maze of shadows. They had left the village at the break of dawn to avoid unnecessary attention. There was no wind but the early morning storm of bird song was at full force.

“Ha, I can’t wait to get to Daggerpoint. I know we still have a long way to go, but it seems like we’re almost there to me,” a short bandit with dark hair and a moustache announced happily. He was following right behind Blacknail.

“Don’t say that. Now you just know some horrible beast is going to jump out of the bushes and attack,” a taller bandit with fair hair replied.

“Oh, don’t worry. That’s not going to happen,” Blacknail replied before chuckling to himself.

There was a brief pause before the fair-haired bandit spoke up. “You’re unusually talkative today, Blacknail.”

“It’s a good day. Don’t you agree?” the hobgoblin asked as he smiled at the man.

“I can’t argue against that. It’s certainly seems like it’s going to be better than I thought it would. I’m definitely richer than yesterday.”

There were only four men and Blacknail within sight. The hobgoblin was leading the way as they walked between a maze of tall trees. The earth was dark and soft where it was visible between the short broad-leaved plants that dotted the ground.

“Are you sure no one is going to catch up to us?” Elyias asked nervously as he looked back over his shoulder.

“Yes, we aren’t following the same path as before and none of them are trackers,” Blacknail answered.

“Some of the villagers could be half decent woodsmen,” the mustached bandit pointed out.

“They’re just humans, and I would hear them if they got close. As long as you’re with me you don’t need to worry about anything else,” Blacknail replied.

“That’s right, they’re just a dumb bunch of peasants. The inbred dirt famers probably never leave their shacks, and we’ve got Blacknail with us. He has proven that he knows what he’s doing.”

“I definitely have a plan,” Blacknail agreed. It was nice to finally get some proper appreciation.

The group of five bandits hiked through the forest for several hours. The sun rose in the sky until its light shone straight noon through the branches overhead. Up ahead, Blacknail spotted a hill through the trees. It wasn’t a particularly tall mound but there was plenty of room to sit on top of it and it was nice and dry. A small creek with a rocky bottom ran through the trees and passed by the bottom of the hill. The bubbling water looked clear and clean.

“This looks like a good place to stop. There’s a creek right there. I’ll make stew,” Blacknail announced as he put his pack down.

“Do we have time for that? We should probably keep moving,” the mustached bandit replied.

“It will be quick. I have everything already prepared. I just need to heat the water,”

“Still, we should save the large meal for supper. We can just eat a quick bite of dried trail food right now.”

“I wasn’t asking for your advice,” Blacknail hissed. He stopped unpacking his bag for a second so that he could glare at the man. “I’m stopping to make stew. You can walk off into the woods by yourself if you want. Are you going to do that?”

“No… I’m not. You’re the boss, so let’s eat,” the man admitted reluctantly. He looked more than a little angry at being forced to concede. Normally, this would have annoyed Blacknail but the hobgoblin was in a forgiving mood.

“Yep, that’s me. I’m the leader,” the hobgoblin agreed cheerfully as he tried to get a fire started. He had brought a bit of dried firewood with him for this exact purpose.

The other bandits settled down to rest as Blacknail began cooking. The hobgoblin took his time and enjoyed the process. He liked the process of throwing ingredients into a pot and boiling it.

“I have to admit that I was skeptical of your plan when you met with me last night, but it’s going perfectly,” the fair-haired bandit said. “We might actually come out of this horrible trek through the woods with some real gains. I thought that when Herad fell we were doomed.”

“Damn right,” another bandit agreed. “I just regret not being there to see that whinny wimp Geralhd’s face when he realized that we’d run off with everyone’s coin and valuables!”

“Split between just the five of us there is enough coin to have a proper good time when we get to Daggerpoint. This is a plan worthy of a hobgoblin. It’s cunning and merciless! I like it,” the mustached man added as he grinned.

“I’m very smart, and I didn’t get anything out of guiding a bunch of idiots to Daggerpoint. So why would I do it?” Blacknail said as he returned their smiles. He was practically blushing now from the unexpected compliments.

Elyias was silent as Blacknail passed out bowls of stew. He looked uncomfortable but also too nervous to talk. When Blacknail had recruited him for this betrayal it had been less of an offer and more of a threat to disembowel him and choke him to death with his own guts.  It was only when Blacknail went back to stirring the pot without handing him any food that he finally spoke up.

“Um, where’s my bowl?” he asked.

“You don’t get any,” Blacknail replied as one of the other bandits began coughing.

“What? Why not?”

“Because I poisoned it, you pink idiot,” Blacknail answered as he stood up.

The other two bandits were both coughing as well now. All three were struggling to breath and their eyes were wide with fear. They grasped at their necks in a vain attempt to gasp down some air. One of them managed to struggle to his feet but the other two were writhing on the ground. Blacknail drew a knife and walked over to the man who was standing. The bandit desperately flailed in an attempt to keep Blacknail away but the hobgoblin easily dodged the blow and cut the man’s throat.

“That’s part one of the plan complete. Now for part two,” Blacknail exclaimed happily as the bandits died and Elyias watched on with horror.









HAH 5









The corpse of the man Blacknail had just killed lay on the ground. Blood leaked from his torn open throat. The other two men the hobgoblin had poisoned had also stopped choking and gone still. A mere minute ago, they had been talking in a friendly manner with Blacknail, and then the hobgoblin had killed them without mercy or warning.

There was a look of complete horrified shock on Elyias’ face. His eyes were wide with terror as he took a fumbling step back away from Blacknail. “Oh gods! What the hells? Have you gone crazy? Are you going to kill me now? I knew this was going to happen, but no one listened to me. Oh gods, why didn’t they listen?”

“You’re fine,” Blacknail reassured his minion. “Didn’t I tell you about this part of the plan? I thought I had told you…”

“Plan? You can’t just kill people!”

“They betrayed the rest of the band, so it’s fine. That’s the kind of people you’re supposed to kill. Herad did it all the time.”

“You were the one that convinced them to do that! You led them out here, so you’re just as responsible as them.”

“Don’t be silly. I’m the leader; I can’t be a traitor. It was a test and they failed,” Blacknail replied as he rolled his eyes in a condescending manner. Humans sure could convince themselves of some crazy things.

Elyias stared slack-jawed at Blacknail. He didn’t seem to know what to say at first but then he opened his mouth. “Why did you bring us out here if you were just planning on killing them? It makes no sense. You’re insane!”

“It makes lots of sense, too much sense for a minion like you,” Blacknail answered. “You’re here to help me carry things, and I brought them out here because they were in the way of my plan.”

“What plan? Is it to see how many humans you can lure out into the woods and murder?” Elyias yelled. His voice echoed through the trees.

“No, that’s dumb. That plan is for later. I don’t want to kill you humans. You’re part of my tribe and I’m trying to help you.”

“By lying to us and poisoning our food?”

“Phh, I’m trying to help most of you, the ones that deserve it. Like you, you’re a good minion. Aren’t you?” Blacknail asked as he stared meaningfully at Elyias. The human minion got the message.

“Er, yes?” he responded carefully in much lower voice.

“Good. Going to Daggerpoint through the forest was just a stupid idea. We all would have died,” Blacknail replied. Elyias was always fun to have around. His reactions were so amusing and he was easy to control with threats. 

“You still haven’t explained your plan at all.”

“And I’m not going to right now. There’s a lot to do and you need to get to work.”

Despite the man’s obvious reluctance and residual fear, Blacknail ordered Elyias to help him move the bodies somewhere out of sight and to gather up their valuables, including all the coins they had stolen from the other bandits.

“What do you even want all this money for?” Elyias asked as he picked up the last coin purse.

“Nothing. I just don’t want other people to have it,” Blacknail replied.

When they were done, the hobgoblin led the way back. Elyias had no option but to follow him. They were in the middle of the forest and Elyias wasn’t anything remotely like a woodsman.

“Shouldn’t we have gotten back by now?” Elyias asked after a few hours of hiking at a steady pace. He had a large pack on his back and the effort of carrying it had tired him out. His brow was sweaty and he was breathing heavily.

“We would have reached the village if that was where we were going,” Blacknail answered without slowing or turning around.

“Where are we going?” Elyias asked in surprise. He didn’t sound happy.

“You’ll see soon,” Blacknail replied.

After only a few more minutes of walking, the pair arrived at the caves where the goblins lived. Gob was standing at the base of one of the hills and supervising a group of goblins. He noticed Blacknail right away and hurried over to meet him.

“Where did all these goblins come from?” Elyias asked Blacknail as he looked around. “There are a lot more of them here than before. Even goblins don’t breed this quickly.”

“I conquered them. It was a great battle! I had to fight a ten foot tall hobgoblin with a poison spear,” Blacknail replied proudly.

“Do hobgoblins get that large?”

“Of course. I think I know more about hobgoblins than you,” Blacknail replied.

“Alright, but what are we doing here? Why didn’t we go back to the village?”

“I’m not doing anything here. I’m leaving. You’re going to stay here, though,” the hobgoblin explained.

“What? I’m not staying out here with a bunch of goblins!”

“I’m the leader so you don’t have much of a choice.”

“You can’t just imprison me!”

“Yes, I can. I’m the leader and you betrayed the tribe. If you try and run I’ll hunt you down and skin you alive.”

Elyias was overwhelmed by indignant horror. He could only gape as Gob arrived and Blacknail turned towards the other hobgoblin.

“Guard this human. Make sure he doesn’t go anywhere and keep this gear safe. I don’t want any goblins stealing anything,” Blacknail told Gob as he shoved Elyias his way.

Nothing appeared about to explode or catch fire so Blacknail saw no reason to stick around. It was already late in the afternoon. He dropped all the stuff he had taken from the bandits he’d killed and got ready to leave.

“Yes, chief,” Gob replied as he nodded and grabbed Elyias’ shoulder. The smaller grayish hobgoblin was being his usual obedient self, but Elyias still seemed to find him threatening.

“Hey, where are you going? Gods damn it all. You can’t leave me here! What if they eat me?” Elyias wailed.

“Don’t let anyone eat him,” Blacknail yelled at Gob as he began to jog away. There was a wordless scream of frustration from behind him but he ignored it.

The next stage of plan was to talk to Geralhd again. Blacknail ran back over to the village. He was really doing this way too much lately. All the running back and forth was getting very tiresome. When the hobgoblin reached the clearing that contained the village, he pushed aside the bushes and saw something unexpected. There was a figure sitting on a chair over by the gate. After peering at the man for a few seconds Blacknail realized it was Geralhd. He didn’t appear to be injured or in distress, so why was he sitting there?

What was going on? This wasn’t something Blacknail had predicted would happen, and it certainly wasn’t part of his plan. Blacknail had been planning to wait until dark and then sneak back in, but somehow a stupid human had already managed to mess things up. The hobgoblin stared at Geralhd for a few seconds before shrugging, pulling up his hood, and stepping out of the forest. He didn’t really have any other option but to go and talk to the man.

Tentatively, Blacknail walked over the barren fields and into sight of the walls. Before he got halfway there was a sudden jerk of movement from Geralhd as the man noticed Blacknail. He jumped to his feet and stared at the hooded hobgoblin.

“There you are! Thank the gods. I was afraid you had disappeared as well. I’ve been out here for hours. I didn’t know what else to do. I’m sorry I missed the meeting this morning but some unfortunate events occurred,” Geralhd exclaimed as Blacknail walked closer.

Geralhd had missed the meeting this morning as well? That was convenient. Blacknail had originally been planning on claiming he had been distracted by a crisis. He had spent a fair amount of time coming up with the best excuse possible - like getting into a fight with another hobgoblin - but apparently that had been a complete waste of time.

“You answer my questions first. What are you doing out here?” the hobgoblin asked as he threw a suspicious glance towards the village walls. There was probably someone watching from there.

“I had to get your attention somehow. There are things you need to know and I didn’t want you trying to sneak into the village.”

Blacknail stared at Geralhd’s face. The man didn’t seem suspicious at all, and he actually even sounded apologetic.

“What’s going on?” the hobgoblin asked coyly. There was no point incriminating himself.

“Four of our compatriots disappeared this morning. We think they stole some things and then ran off. As if that wasn’t bad enough, the whole mess has made Tannin unduly suspicious of our group. He has the entire village on lock-down, which is why sneaking in would be a terrible idea.”

Blacknail tried to look surprised and outraged. “They took stuff and headed off into the forest, by themselves? Who? Why?”

“Rhgalt, Helf, Elyias, and Abjar are gone. The sons of whores must be headed back to civilization by themselves. I don’t know what they could possibly be thinking but they couldn’t have gone anywhere else.”

“Elyias? That traitor! I thought he was loyal. I have been betrayed,” Blacknail hissed dramatically.

“I thought they all were. Have you seen any sign of them?”Geralhd asked.

“No, but I can check for their trail. If they left towards Daggerpoint there will be signs. Do you want me to hunt them down or will we all go after them together when we leave?”

Geralhd grimaced before replying. “We won’t be leaving anytime soon.”

“What?” Blacknail asked with fake outrage. This actually sounded exactly like what he had been aiming for.

“On top of the stealing, the deserters also destroyed quite a few pairs of boots and other gear. Following after them would be very hard, if not impossible,” Geralhd replied. Blacknail had to hide his smirk. He had enjoyed cutting that stuff up.

“How long of a wait?” Blacknail asked as he pretended to glower angrily.

Geralhd grimaced and looked uncomfortable before replying. “That’s the thing… some of the men want to stay for a while now. The men who left were some of the most vocal advocates of leaving, and without any coin even if we get to a city we will basically be on the streets. Laying low here for a while sounds pretty tempting to some of the men and women, especially since Tannin has made it clear that we are welcome.”

“So we aren’t leaving?”

“Probably not anytime soon, no.”

“You don’t get to decide that! I’m the leader, and I don’t want to stay here,” Blacknail hissed furiously, if ingenuously.

“I uh... don’t think we have much choice. I certainly don’t enjoy the thought of dwelling out here in these boonies for a second longer than we have to. They don’t even have an inn! It’s nothing but a collection of shacks, but what’s the other option? We have no money.”

The first solution that popped into Blacknail’s head was that they could rob someone. That was an activity they had some experience with. However, bringing that up wouldn’t serve Blacknail’s purposes, so instead he took a step forward until his face was only a few inches from Geralhd’s and growled. “Fine, but you all owe me. This is a debt that must be paid.”

Geralhd flinched as the hobgoblin’s hot breath hit his face. There was a hint of fear in his eyes as he responded. “Um, what do you want?”

“Cheese,” Blacknail whispered fervently as he stared into Geralhd’s eyes. “The village has cheese and as long as we are here you and the others will bring it to me.”

“Not a problem. I’m sure I can get that for you,” Geralhd replied nervously as he took a step back.

A smile appeared on the hobgoblin’s lips. His plan was coming along perfectly, and his cheese supply had been acquired. “You’d better. Now explain why you met up with me in sight of the village. That’s not very sneaky.”

“Like I said, Tannin is paranoid. I had to negotiate to leave the village at all. He thinks we might have allies hiding out in the forest and that we’re planning to attack the village from within and without at the same time. I had to reassure him that there was only one person out in the forest and that I needed to talk to him.”

“You told him about me?” Blacknail asked. Geralhd had been the one telling the hobgoblin to keep his presence a secret.

“I told him you’re a ranger that hates being around people and didn’t want to stay in the village. The story is that your face was mutilated by a run in with a bear and that’s why your voice is so… unique. You can keep your hood up and rap a scarf around your jaw when you meet him.”

“Meet him? Why would I do that?”

“Um yes… I had to promise him a quick conversation with you, so that he would know I was telling the truth. It shouldn’t be big deal. We’ll just head to the gate and you can say a word or two.”

This wasn’t part of Blacknail’s plan. He didn’t think it was going to be too big of a problem though.

“Fine,” the hobgoblin agreed as he pulled on a pair of gloves. Geralhd handed him a scarf which he then wrapped around his face.

That done, the pair got up and headed over to the gate, which began to open as they approached. Someone had indeed been watching. When the gate swung open, Tannin stepped out. The bearded older man had a smoke pipe in his mouth, and there was a hard expressionless look on his face as he studied Blacknail’s hooded form.

“See, there’s no reason to be concerned. It’s just as I explained. There is no one out here but our scout, and he is no threat to you or yours,” Geralhd said with false cheer as they came to a stop in front of Tannin.

“That remains to be seen,” the older man replied before turning back to Blacknail. “So you’re this mysterious scout of theirs. I thought I noticed one of you slipping away yesterday, and the young ones mentioned a creepy cloaked fellow.”

“Yes,” Blacknail replied in his best imitation of a human voice. Its high hiss-like tone still left something to be desired.

“You’re not exactly talkative, are you?”

“No.”

Tannin grunted in dissatisfaction. “I hear you’re a sodomite.”

Geralhd let out a startled cough. Blacknail didn’t react. He wasn’t familiar with that word, but it sounded like an insult. Normally he would have responded violently to such a display of disrespect, but he was trying to lay low and killing or injuring Tannin would probably ruin his plans. Cheese was worth a few unkind words.

“What? Preposterous. Why do think that?” Geralhd asked with obvious surprise.

“The young lassie you kidnapped before, Joan, mentioned some of the things your bunch said around her. Like how this one here wasn’t interested in women.”

“That’s a misunderstanding, and a large one. Like I said, Blacknail just isn’t social at all. His injuries were rather extensive…”

“Blacknail, that’s an interesting name. I don’t believe you’ve mentioned it before.” Tannin said as a sly smile appeared on his lips.

“Yes,” the hobgoblin responded dead-pan. Tannin was clearly trying to annoy him so that he would talk, but that wasn’t going to work because Blacknail was too smart. Also, he still had no idea what they were talking about. Every time Blacknail thought he had learned every human word they came up with a new one.

“Blacknail is but a silly nickname. We all have them,” Geralhd said as he shrugged. He had obviously intended for the gesture to look nonchalant but he couldn’t disguise his nervousness.

“Oh, it sounds like there is an interesting story there. Care to share it?”

“I have a black toenail,” Blacknail explained slowly.

“I see…” Tannin responded cautiously as he puffed on his pipe. He seemed to be at a loss for words.

There was a few seconds of silence as both Tannin and Blacknail stared at each other. Neither one of them spoke up and a hostile atmosphere began to build up. Their staring competition was interrupted by an unexpected yell from someone within the village.

“Blacknail, there you are!” Khita shouted as she ran over.

The young redhead was smiling joyfully. Blacknail felt a shiver of dread work its way up his spine, and Tannin frowned at the intrusion. He clearly didn’t know how to handle the young woman.

“I was beginning to think you were avoiding me,” Khita said as she came to stop in front of the hobgoblin. Blacknail’s answering grimace was hidden by his scarf. He had been avoiding her.

“So you and this man are friendly, are you?” Tannin asked with obvious interest.

“Of course, we go way back,” Khita replied cheerfully. “We’ve fought together a dozen times, and his master used to train me as well.”

“No,” Blacknail said.

“His master?” Tannin enquired before blowing some smoke from his pipe. He looked thoughtful.

“She means Saeter, the ranger that trained him,” Geralhd quickly interjected.

“Was this before or after he was maimed by the bear?”

“Before,” Geralhd responded just as Khita said, “after”.

There was an awkward moment of silence and Tannin grinned smugly. He obviously wasn’t convinced by Geralhd’s cover story.

“This is all beside the point. Khita shouldn’t be here,” Geralhd argued.

“She’s half the reason I’m inclined to trust your group. If you truly meant me and mine harm then I doubt she could keep it a secret from me,” Tannin replied.

“Well, then you should extend that same trust to Blacknail. He really is just a ranger that likes to keep to himself. You’ve met him and had a nice little chat so he probably wants to leave now,” Geralhd argued.

“Yes,” Blacknail agreed succinctly.

“Ya, let’s go,” Khita added.

“We?” the hobgoblin asked as he experienced a growing sense of horror. He needed to get out of here.

“Well, I’m not staying here while you have adventures. That stupid kid Hassiol keeps bugging me, and these dirty bumpkins want me to do chores.”

“We are giving you a house. How do you expect to earn a living without working?” Tannin pointed out in exasperation.

“It’s not my fault this stupid mud heap isn’t large enough to support a proper gang.”

“Why would we want a street gang?” Tannin replied as he glowered at Khita.

“It doesn’t matter, because I’m joining Blacknail. I can be a forest ranger with him and scout out all the secret trails while we find hidden treasure.”

This idea didn’t seem to impress any of the other people listening to her. The young redhead had managed to annoy and drive everyone else to exasperation in under a minute. There was no way Blacknail was going to let her accompany him.








HAH 6













“Are we almost there yet?” Khita asked Blacknail as she ducked under a low hanging branch.

“Yes, I already told you that!” the hobgoblin hissed in response. This was the third time he had answered her annoying question.

“Then how come we haven’t gotten there yet? We should have if we were actually close.”

“Because that’s not how it works! Shut up and walk.”

It hadn’t even been an hour yet and Blacknail already wanted to kill Khita. He really wished Gerahld hadn’t explained all the reason he couldn’t. Tannin would be highly suspicious if she disappeared and that would ruin all of Blacknail’s plans. Why was he never allowed to kill Khita? It was if the world was trying to keep her alive just to annoy him.

“We’re here,” Blacknail hissed as he stepped out of the bushes at the edge of the forest.

The rocky hills that made up the local goblins’ lair lay in front of them. Khita took a moment to look around after pushing a bush aside. The young redhead was wearing tall slim boots that went up to her knees and a leather vest over her long green shirt. It was the same outfit she had worn during the trek North but it had been washed and patched.

“This is a terrible secret base. It’s just a bunch of rock piles,” Khita replied as they began walking toward the hill. They had attracted the attention of quite a few goblins but they all recognized Blacknail and kept their distance. None of them wanted to attract his attention. Khita also didn’t seem too disturbed to see the goblins either. Blacknail had to speed up his pace in order to prevent her from walking ahead.

“I just conquered it. It will get better soon,” Blacknail replied defensively. What did she expect? A fortress?

They passed through a pair of hills and the center of the clearly came into sight. Gob was standing on a flat patch of rocky earth there. The hobgoblin was surrounded by a squad of goblins. Each of these goblins was holding a spear and standing straight. Gob noticed the newcomers but after glancing at Blacknail to make sure he didn’t need anything he turned back to the goblins he was teaching and went back to work.

“Wow, you didn’t waste any time before rounding up the local goblins. There sure are a lot of them,” Khita remarked as she looked around. She didn’t seem scared at all, even though she was among so many unfamiliar goblins.

“They started it.”

“But you ended it, like the bloodthirsty boss you are,” Khita laughed. “So what are you scheming? I know you, Blacknail. There’s no way you weren’t involved in everything that’s happened. You’re up to something. It looks like you’re building a goblin army here, and I don’t think Geralhd would approve.”

“I'm not plotting anything. That’s dumb. You’re dumb. Shut up,” Blacknail quickly replied as he tried to look innocent. “I’m just hanging out in the forest and doing normal hobgoblin things like… umm sleeping?”

“Ha, I don’t believe that for a sharp sliver of a second. You’re plotting something. You’re like me. You’re a scrapper and you can’t stop until you’re the king of the heap.”

“Nope, I’m lazy and want to sleep all the time. It’s all I do.”

“Really? So you haven’t lied to anyone and you aren’t planning anything?”

“I just told you so. I’m completely trustworthy.”

“Then why is Elyias right over there, when he’s supposed to be with the deserters?” Khita replied.

Blacknail turned to look in the direction she was pointing. Elyias was indeed right there. He was surrounded by another small squad of goblins with spears that appeared to be herding him towards Blacknail. Scamp was leading the group as they headed towards Blacknail. His chest was puffed up proudly as he swaggered forward, and it looked like he was in charge.

“Oh, it’s you. Did you get yourself kidnapped as well?” Elyias called out when he noticed Khita. He sounded depressed but he looked fine. The goblins hadn’t hurt him.

“No, I asked to come here. The village was boring and full of mud-brained bumpkins,” Khita answered.

“Really? Then you’re the dumbest person I’ve ever met. I knew you weren’t the straightest of arrows but that’s just crazy.”

“I’m not the one that’s being pushed around by a bunch of naked goblins,” she replied scornfully.

Scamp smiled and waved at Khita and she returned the friendly gesture. The little goblin looked quite happy to see Khita. He ran over to her side and Khita gave him a pat on the head.

“Khita!” Scamp exclaimed cheerfully as he hugged her leg. “I missed you!”

“I missed you too,” the young redhead replied.

“I knew you would. Do you have any food?” Scamp asked as he looked up at her with a sad begging expression on his face.

Before anyone else could distract him, Blacknail spoke up in a commanding voice.  “I think Elyias should be quiet. If he talks those goblins will probably poke him painfully with their spears. Goblins do that.” The hobgoblin emphasized certain words to get his meaning across.

“Huh?” Elyias said as a goblin suddenly poked him in the ribs. “Ow, stop that. Ow.”

The stone tipped spears didn’t penetrate his shirt, but the goblins kept poking him every time he gasped in pain. It seemed like it was going to be an endless cycle.

“No, only if he talks,” Blacknail hissed in frustration.

“He is saying ow,” Scamp pointed out from where he was watching.

“That doesn’t count.”

Scamp shrugged and then made several grunting noises. The other goblins lowered their weapons. Elyias glared at them but kept his mouth shut.

“Take him away for now. I’ll talk to him later,” Blacknail told the goblins. “Right now there are more important things I have to do.”

“Sure thing, boss,” Scamp replied. He then walked over and gave the nearest goblin a forceful push before leading the other goblins away. He seemed very proud and happy to have assumed a leadership position within the tribe, even if he was only really a translator.

“Let’s get back to what we were talking about before. You were explaining your plan,” Khita said when Elyias’ group had disappeared behind one of the nearby hills.

“No, I wasn’t,” Blacknail replied. He wasn’t going to fall for that. He was too smart.

“So you admit to having one?”

“No, I don’t! I have never admitted anything. You have the wrong person.”

Khita rolled her eyes. She didn’t seem convinced. She was obviously too stupid to understand him properly.

“You’re right. You’re not sharp enough to come up with a good plan. I bet your plan is really stupid.”

“That’s not true. My plan is the best ever!”

“Oh, what is it?”

“I’m going to… Wait, this is another trick,” Blacknail replied uncertainly.

“You may as well tell me. I already know about Elyias and you just confessed to having a scheme in motion.”

“Elyias proves nothing. He got separated from the others and lost in the woods when they left. Some goblins found him and brought him here. I’m hiding him because the others are angry and I’m such a great loving leader,” Blacknail growled in explanation. He had known the two humans would probably meet if Khita followed him, so he had come up with an excuse earlier.

“I don’t believe that for a moment. You’d bleed him dry if he betrayed you. There isn’t a shred of mercy in your body, Blacknail. You may have the others fooled but not me.”

She had a point about his lack of mercy. It was also clear that Khita was not going to believe his lies, no matter how convincing and well thought out they were. That was alright, though. He had a backup plan for dealing with her and it was more fun anyway.

Blacknail took a sudden step towards Khita. The unexpected movement caught her off guard and she flinched. The hobgoblin grabbed the front of Khita’s vest and pulled her forward. His strong grip kept her off balance as he glared at her. Their faces were only a few inches apart.

“What?” she exclaimed. She sounded mad but also nervous. Blacknail didn’t reply right away. Instead, he growled for several long seconds. His lips rose to reveal his long jagged teeth. Fear shone in Khita’s eyes but instead of trying to pull away she went perfectly still. Her reaction satisfied Blacknail. It was time to scare this girl into line. He was the great Blacknail and she would do was she was told.

“Listen, little human. I am the leader here, the chieftain,” Blacknail hissed as he stared into her eyes. His face was twisted up into the most menacing visage he could muster. “If you tell anyone anything about my plans I will hunt you down. I will pry your eyes from your skull and slurp them down while I cut off your delicate fingers and chubby little toes. Obey me or suffer.”

Khita didn’t move. Her face was so pale it seemed almost frozen, but as Blacknail watched it came back to life. The fear faded and Khita smiled excitedly. This… wasn’t the reaction he had been hoping for.

“Anything you want, Blacknail. You can trust me. It’ll be just like before the battle, except now you’re the big boss.”

The urge to groan and throw his hands up in frustration welled up in Blacknail, but he resisted it. He just gripped Khita’s shirt tighter and shook her a bit. “No, I’m not trusting you with anything! I’m just scaring you into silence. Be scared!”

“Meh, it’s all the same. You’re just like my brother. All his yelling and threats were just to toughen me up so I would get stronger. That’s how I knew he cared.”

Her response flabbergasted the hobgoblin so much he wanted to claw at his own eyes. Blacknail was beginning to suspect Khita’s relationship with her brother had been more than a little abnormal. The hobgoblin tried to think up some way he could get his point across without leaving any incriminating marks on her, but nothing occurred to him. He let out a frustrated hiss as he let Khita go. The young redhead caught herself and then casually brushed the front of her shirt off.

“So, are you going to tell me your plan now? I want to help.”

“Fine, as long as it will shut you up,” Blacknail hissed in reply. He had given up. There was no way he was going to tell the redhead all the details of his scheme but she could probably be trusted with some of it. Her particular type of crazy stupid meant she was unlikely to betray him.

“You’re building a goblin army aren’t you? You’re going unleash a horde of green killers and conquer the North!”

“What? No, that’s stupid. Goblins make terrible fighters. They’re too small and cowardly.”

“Gob is training a bunch of goblins to fight right over there. I can see them.”

Blacknail snorted and waved dismissively. “That’s just discipline training so they will work harder and smarter.”

“Then what is your plan?” Khita asked. She sounded disappointed that there would be no screaming goblin horde invading the North.

“I will kill Werrick. Herad and him fought over territory. My mistress lost but I will fulfill her wish and take everything from Werrick.” Blacknail explained proudly. Although he hid it, the hobgoblin felt a twinge of embarrassment saying all that aloud.

“Ha, I knew it! There was no way you were going to run away from the Wolf. You’re not a spineless wimp like the others. So what’s the plan if you aren’t using goblins?”

“I do want a few goblins and hobgoblins, but not an army. I want a group that can move faster and sneakier than humans. Then I will strike at Werrick from the shadows and prey upon his minions,” Blacknail answered as he grinned savagely. He was really looking forward to it.

“You won’t beat him that way. He can afford to lose a lot of men. He’s the top dog around these parts so all the weaklings flock to his side.”

“I’m not stupid; I know. That’s just the first part of the plan. Once I’m famous I will use other humans against him.”

“How will you do that?”

“I will tell you later if you behave,” Blacknail replied. Hopefully, that would motivate her to keep her mouth shut.

“Fine, then at least tell me what you doing here in this camp right now so that I can help out. Oh, I should get a tour!”

Blacknail shrugged in response. That actually didn’t seem like a terrible idea. He might even be able to find some make-work for her to do that would keep her out of trouble while he told Elyias what he was allowed to say. He didn’t want Khita learning everything.  Blacknail led the way and they walked around the camp. He showed her the highlights and most important parts.

“And this is another cave. It’s not the biggest one but it’s very dry.”

“Is there anything here but rocks and caves?”

“Goblins, lots of goblins,” Blacknail answered.

Khita groaned. “Well, I’ve seen enough damned caves. What is Gob up to?”

“I have him training goblins how to hunt using traps,”

“Then why are most the goblins he is talking with holding spears?”

“Those are to use against other goblins. The stupid runts need to keep the stupider runts in line or they will steal from the traps.” Dealing with goblins was as frustrating as dealing with humans but in a completely different way.

As they walked over to Gob, Blacknail explained that he was building a core of loyal goblins that would keep the others in line. That was almost as important as training trappers, since goblins weren’t very diligent workers unless they were being threatened with physical punishment or they were the ones that got to deal out the physical punishment. He also told Khita about the foragers he had sent out to gather materials. Gob was planning on building a longhouse like the one he had built at his old lair. Poles made from young trees would be tied together using rope. Thankfully, several of the goblins that had come with Gob knew how to make rope from plant fibers and they were teaching others. The ropes were also an important part of making traps and tools.

The pair stopped a few feet away from the circle of goblins around Gob. They watched the goblins working at their tasks. None of them seemed to be doing exactly the same thing. Some were clearing making tools of various kinds while others were simply watching as Gob hissed at their companions. Blacknail let out a nostalgic sigh as he watched. He himself was a master of rope-making. He had spent a long time learning such skills under Saeter, and he was planning on putting that knowledge to good use now. Everything he had been taught would help him get his vengeance.

“What are those goblins over there doing?” Khita asked as she pointed to Blacknail’s left.

The hobgoblin turned to see what she was talking about. Someone had built a fire pit at the base of one of the nearby hills. Two goblins sat next to a ring of stones that contained a small fire.  A large flat-sided rock jutted out of the hill behind them. It formed a small cliff like wall, and there was a pile of branches piled next to it. Blacknail instantly recognized one of the goblins. It was Imp.

“What are you doing?” Blacknail asked as he walked over.

Imp looked up and gave Blacknail a blank look before answering. “I’m helping burn things.”

This piece of information didn’t clarify anything. Imp had always made Blacknail uncomfortable. He was a weird little goblin and Blacknail really didn’t understand what went though his head. He was always watching silently from somewhere or doing inexplicable things.

“Why are you burning things?” Blacknail asked.

“Practice,” the other goblin beside Imp replied as he turned to smile at Blacknail.

This new goblin’s eyes glowed with feverish excitement as they reflected light from the fire. He was an average sized goblin that Blacknail had never seen before. His body was slightly on the skinny side and his skin had a pale grey cast to it. He had messy reddish brown hair that covered the top of his head and orange irises. If anything this new goblin looked even weirder than Imp. Blacknail hoped he wasn’t a mage. That wouldn’t likely end well.

“I like your hair! It’s a great color,” Khita remarked cheerfully as she studied the goblin. She then reached down to pat him on the head and mess up his hair. The goblin didn’t appear to know how to react to this. He flinched and threw Imp and Blacknail confused looks. Blacknail just shrugged in response. He didn't know how to deal with Khita either.

“I bet he doesn’t have a name! Can I name him?” Khita asked Blacknail. She didn’t wait for an answer.  “I think it should be… Ferrar!”

Blacknail opened his mouth and started to ask her why she had chosen that name, but he stopped when he realized he didn’t really care. Khita answered anyway. “It means fire or something in Old Imperial, so it matches the color of your hair!”

“Why are you two really making fire?” Blacknail asked the goblins. He still found them suspicious even though Khita had distracted him.

“They are probably cooking or something,” Khita said.

“It’s not time to eat yet.”

“We will need it later. Fire is important.” Imp answered matter-of-factly. Blacknail didn’t disagree, but he wasn’t sure they were thinking of the same things.

An idea suddenly popped into Blacknail’s head. While it wasn’t time to eat quite yet, it would be soon. A large part of his plan was to feed the goblins a lot so that they would stick around even when he made them work, but he didn’t have a pot to make stew. Sending Khita to get one would get her out of the way for a while so he could talk to Elyias and get some work done.

“I need you to go get a big pot from the village so I can cook. Geralhd owes me, and I will send some goblins to help you,” Blacknail told her.

“Fine, this tour has been boring anyway, but I want to take Ferrar with me,” Khita replied. Blacknail turned to look at the goblin in question. He was poking the fire with a stick and giggling as sparks shot up into the air. In his other hand he was holding a steel fire striker that Imp had probably given him.

“Alright, but don’t burn the village down,” Blacknail replied warily. “I need those humans.”










HAH 7










The village of Shelter didn’t end up burning down, although Blacknail had been sort of been expecting it to. Khita and the goblins returned with a large iron pot and without causing a commotion. The goblins kept to the woods and never went near the settlement, or anything flammable.

“I just walked up to the gate and asked for it,” Khita told Blacknail. “Geralhd found one for me as soon as I told him that you sent me. He also gave me this.”

The young redheaded woman passed Blacknail a small wrapped up parcel, which he quickly unwrapped. There was a small wheel of yellow cheese inside. It had been far too long, almost a week. Blacknail felt his eyes began to water as joy overwhelmed him, although it might have been caused by the poignant smell wafting off the cheese. It was a very strong blend.

“It looks like you’re trying to inhale that,” Khita remarked as she took a step back and pinched her nose.

Blacknail’s nose was pressed against the wedge of cheese. He took a deep breath and just enjoyed the blissful aroma for a second. Even several of the nearby goblins gave him strange looks but he didn’t care. After licking his prize a few times the hobgoblin wrapped it back up and shoved it into his coat for later.

“You brought the pot so now I’m going to cook up some stew!” Blacknail told Khita. “It’s an important part of my plan!”

“Oh, well, I need to borrow a bowl or something because I didn’t bring any,” Khita replied. Blacknail stared at her for an awkward few seconds.

“Bowls… right,” he mused to himself as he scratched the side of his nose. He had completely forgotten about those. He had one for himself but that was it.

In order to eat stew his goblin minions were going to need bowls as well. You couldn’t eat soup or stew without something to put it in. This was a pain because Blacknail was fairly certain none of them had any. How could his minions forget something as simple as bowls? It was annoying how dumb they all were.

“Do you think anyone would get suspicious if we asked the village for a hundred bowls?” Blacknail asked Khita.

“Ya, I think that would get some of them thinking. Can you make your own?”

“How?”

“People usually make them out of wood or clay. You could try that.”

“You mean I could get goblins to make them out of wood or clay,” Blacknail clarified. He wasn’t going to be making bowls for stupid little goblins. If goblins couldn’t be forced to do physical labor then what was the point of them?

“None of the goblins here use clay or whittle?” Khita asked.

“Nope,” Blacknail answered after a second or two of thought. He hadn’t seen any evidence of that.

The hobgoblin knew what clay was. Saeter had once pointed it out to him at the bank of a stream. The grey material had definitely been one of the better tasting types of dirt, but that wasn’t saying much. Blacknail vaguely knew that humans made stuff out of clay but he had no idea how. Khita didn’t know much about it either and it sounded too complicated to figure out quickly. He also had no clay to work with.

“It’s too late to work. I’m going to eat,” Blacknail announced as he headed over to the fire pit Imp and Ferrar had made. Both goblins were once again sitting and watching the fire.

Blacknail couldn’t cook any stew but that wasn’t the only thing he knew how to make, it was simply the best. The goblins Gob had been training had been stockpiling food. There was a rack covered in rabbits and squirrels from the traps that had been skinned and drained of blood, and there was a pile of edible roots and leaves. Blacknail looked over the ingredients for a while before deciding on a recipe.

“I need Wakev leaves,” Blacknail mused to himself.

The plants had large fan-shaped leaves. They themselves weren’t edible but you could cook things in them for flavor. The short stubby plants were also very common and grew on the ground. Blacknail rounded up several goblins and sent them out to harvest the leaves. He also sent a goblin to bring over Scamp and Elyias.

“You two can help me cook,” the hobgoblin told Ferrar and Imp. He didn’t plan on doing all the cooking himself and the sooner he taught others how to do the sooner he could make them do it for him. As disturbing as these two goblins were they also were among the smartest of his minions.

“Yes, chief,” Imp replied as he stood up and walked over to Blacknail’s side. Ferrar continued to stare at the fire for a few more seconds before smiling at Blacknail and getting up. Scamp and Elyias then appeared.

“Watch and copy what I do, if you can,” Blacknail told everyone there.

“Yeah, grunt work! At least it beats sitting around or following Scamp,” Elyias huffed indignantly.

As his minions watched, Blacknail began cutting up the meat and the veggies on a nearby flat rock. He didn’t plan on putting too much effort into this, so large chunks were good enough. He chose a pale round root and some small spicy leaves to add to the mix, and left the other veggies for another time. When the goblins started dropping off the leaves, he mixed the ingredients together and wrapped them in the leaves to make small packages.

After he was finished with the first serving, all the others began chopping and sorting. They quickly got quite a few wraps down so Blacknail hung them above the fire using a rack made of sticks and twine.

“That smells pretty damn good,” Khita remarked.

“Of course, I’m amazing at everything,” Blacknail replied confidently as he took a seat on a nearby rock and relaxed. “Now get back to work.”

Soon, the rest of the goblin tribe began to gather as the smell of the food drew them in. By the time the first bit of food was done cooking there were dozens of them. Blacknail handed out cooked parcels to all of Gob's overseers and everyone who had helped cook.

“Yummy!” Scamp declared as he started eating. The goblin only stopped eating in order to smugly look down on the goblins that hadn’t gotten food yet.

“Why are you putting so much effort into cooking for these goblins?” Elyias asked. He sounded like he had accepted his situation for now.

“It’s motivation so they learn and stay loyal. Now they know why they are hunting,” Blacknail explained as he chewed.

A small riot broke out behind him. A mob of goblins that hadn’t gotten food yet banded together to raid a smaller group that had. Screeching goblins wrestled and bit each other as they fought for the food. Blacknail didn’t interfere. He just smiled contentedly and nodded proudly to himself. It seemed like the goblins enjoyed his cooking. As the humans got clear Gob intervened with a squad of overseers. They started indiscriminately beating all the fighters with the butts of their spears.

“No fighting here! The great chief has blessed you with yummies! Rejoice!”  Gob yelled as he kicked a goblin out of sight.

The fighting soon stopped and order was restored. Night began to fall and the rocky clearing grew dark as everyone finished eating. The fire was still burning brightly in the middle of the goblin mob but no one was still cooking. Blacknail decided that there was little point in staying up so he decided to go to sleep for the night. He had a cozy new cave to try out.

“Where am I supposed to sleep?” Khita asked when Blacknail got up and started to walk away. Elyias and Scamp had already claimed another small cave as their own earlier.

“I don’t care,” Blacknail replied before yawning. He was definitely starting to feel tired.

“Don’t be like that. There’s plenty of room here in this cave,” Khita remarked as they arrived at the entrance to the cavern.

Blacknail briefly considered chasing the annoying redhead away but he didn’t feel like going through the effort. His cave was also more than big enough for the two of them.

“Fine, but you’re sleeping over there,” Blacknail replied as he pointed to the other side of the cave. Khita yawned and nodded in agreement. They both unrolled the blankets from their pack and went to bed.

Early the next morning, Blacknail got Khita up and went back to work. There was a lot of things that needed done in order to fix up this camp. Khita had been right when she had called it just a pile of rocks. Herad and Saeter had built their old base camp from nothing into a small village and Blacknail planned to do the same. He had sort of been paying attention to most the things they had done.

“What are we doing now?” Khita asked after she had gotten dressed and they had both eaten.

“We still need bowls. Let’s try making wood ones. Maybe it will be easy!” Blacknail announced as he went to find a suitable piece of wood.

It wasn’t easy. It only took a few minutes to find a large enough branch and to cut it down, but trying to whittle it into shape proved very frustrating. Blacknail used the axe he had taken from the slain hobgoblin and his own knives. As he had been taught, the hobgoblin had cleaned and sharpened the axe as soon as he claimed it. It had known it would be useful later.

“This is stupid,” Blacknail huffed as he tossed the piece of wood he had been working on away. It was shaped nothing like a bowl and still had some bark attached to it. There was no way goblins were going to be able to make bowls using stone tools anytime soon and Blacknail wasn’t going to waste any of his knives by giving them away.

“There must be another way,” he growled as he turned to stare at Khita. Humans made civilization seem so easy. Blacknail refused to fail at bowl making. He was pretty sure that was one of the simpler things humans made, but he had never been taught how. All the humans he knew had just carried the things around with them, or they had killed another human and taken them.

“Um, I’ve heard some people in the West drink from skulls,” Khita suggested hesitantly.

That was an idea. Blacknail liked it. The top of people’s heads were just the right shape to hold liquids. Why hadn’t this idea occurred to him right away? It was so obvious.

“Great, but where can I get so many large skulls…” Blacknail mused.

There were a few lying around but not nearly enough. The only creatures around in sufficient numbers and with big enough heads were goblins. Killing a few dozen of them to make dishes seemed wasteful though, and might cause problems with recruitment later. Maybe he could find another tribe and start a war? Still, cleaning those skulls seemed like a lot of messy work.

“We will collect skulls but they won’t be enough,” Blacknail admitted in defeat.

Since he hadn’t come up with a solution to his dishware problem the hobgoblin decided to focus on making food that could be eaten by hand for now. Preserving meat was first on that list.

While Gob continued to train the goblins how to hunt and make rope, Blacknail picked out a few of the smarter looking ones and began to teach them how to smoke meat. It wasn’t all that hard, so even goblins could do it. The first step was to dig a hole a few feet deep. Firewood was placed at the bottom and then sticks were inserted into the sides of the hole up above that to make a grill for the meat. Green branches from pine trees were placed over the top to keep most the smoke in. The important part was having an overseer around to poke goblins that tried to eat the meat, and making sure the overseers themselves weren’t hungry.

Two goblins actually volunteered to help with the smoking, Ferrar and Imp. Both of them walked over and began to copy the goblins Blacknail was instructing. At first the hobgoblin was tempted to chase them away since they were so creepy, but they both quickly mastered the skills. They were too useful to chase away, even if they were super suspicious. Ferrar probably just wanted to play with fire, but Blacknail had no idea why Imp ever did anything.

Soon, the pair of goblins began teaching the others and Blacknail took the opportunity to step away. He was a leader now so he never worked at anything unless he couldn’t find someone else to do it, besides there were other important things he needed to do.

Blacknail looked around the goblin lair. The center of the rocky hills he had conquered through strength had already changed a fair bit. It had been completely bare before but now there was a large fire pit and several racks where meat was hanging. Signs of habitation were everywhere.

Another thing that Blacknail noticed was that a lot of the food left over from last night had disappeared. Even some of the uncooked roots were gone. That was annoying but hardly surprising. They had been left unattended in the middle of a goblin settlement after all. Blacknail decided to do something about it. He found the coldest cave and kicked all the goblins out of it, although there were only a few there since it was so cold. Next, he had all the food that wasn’t being used moved into the cave, and then told Gob to post a guard at the cave and another at the drying racks at all times. Exercising his amazing leadership skills left Blacknail feeling very proud of himself.

“I’m bored. Let’s do something interesting now. I followed you out here because I wanted excitement!” Khita told Blacknail as she walked over to him. She had wandered off somewhere earlier.

“Alright, I feel like hunting. You can come. Just be quiet and try to learn,” Blacknail told her.

“Great! Let’s go. I hope we run into something dangerous, like an ogre.”

That was the exact opposite of what Blacknail wanted and he said so. “I hope we run into something useful, like a poor lost cheese merchant.”

After walking back over to his cave, Blacknail grabbed his gear. He took a water flask, some jerky for a snack, and his bow. The sky overhead contained a scattering of white puffy clouds but there was still a lot of blue to see, and there was next to no wind.

“I need a bow. I lost mine way back,” Khita observed.

“Then you need to find or make a new one later,” Blacknail hissed dismissively. She didn’t really need one anyway since she was mostly there to carry stuff for him. Khita tried to argue but Blacknail shushed her.

“No talking in the forest. You have to be quiet while hunting,” he told her. It was even sort of true.

There was a small stream that ran along the western edge of the clearing. The hobgoblin decided to follow it North, away from the human village. He hadn’t actually been out that way yet. This part of the forest was completely unknown to him, so he wanted to explore it. There might be interesting or useful things there.

Like on the other side of the camp, the terrain was rough. The same tall tree-studded hills rose off in the distance and hid the horizon. The morning chatter of birds echoed through the forest as Blacknail and Khita walked along the edge of the stream. The trees here weren’t very tall, and they only formed a patchy canopy overhead that let a lot of light through. Most of them were evergreens with brown trunks. They didn’t have much in the way of branches near the ground to block Blacknail’s sight, so he could see clearly in most directions.

The stream cut its way through the earth as it rushed down a series of hills. Its winding banks had long ago exposed the occasional large grey rock, but the water was surrounded mostly by hard packed dirt and the roots of trees.

After a few minutes of hiking, a flash of movement up ahead caught Blacknail’s attention. He raised a hand to signal for Khita to stop, and began to creep silently forward. Blacknail climbed up the steep bank of the creek and up to the trees. He hid behind the closest tree trunk and then peered out from behind it. Up ahead and around the bend, there was a deer drinking from the stream. The beast looked like a fully grown doe with brown fur and white spots on its flanks. Blacknail grinned as he drew an arrow and readied his bow. He had found some worthy prey.

Without wasting another second, the hobgoblin stepped out from his hiding spot and lined up his shot. He let the string go and his arrow zoomed straight towards his target. It slammed into the deer’s neck. The beast screeched and took off like a shot. It scrambled down the slippery bank of the creek and out of sight. It was wounded but far from dead yet.

“Did you get it?” Khita asked breathlessly as she ran up beside Blacknail.

“Yes, let’s go,” he replied.

Blacknail jumped down to the creek and ran over to where the deer had been standing. He scanned the muddy soil there and then sniffed it. There were clear hoof prints visible and drops of blood were scattered around. He had the creature’s scent and he knew it was bleeding. The wound he had given the deer was fatal. It wouldn’t get far before it lost strength and faltered.

“What now?” Khita asked.

“Now you be quiet again and follow me,” Blacknail hissed as he began to jog after the deer.

He had no doubt in his ability to track down his wounded quarry. Even without his amazing sense of smell he could clearly see the trail of broken branches and hoof prints it had left. The only question was whether something unexpected would happen. Another predator might appear or they could stumble into something else deadly. The forest was a dangerous place, and the hunter could quickly become the hunted if they weren’t wary.









HAH 8













The sound of rushing water grew louder, as Blacknail tracked the deer he had shot through the vibrant green forest. Khita was right behind him as he ran along the edge of the stream. Blacknail knew he was going the right way. The beast’s muddy hoof prints were plain to see, and the scent of its blood was thick in the air. The smell excited Blacknail. Hunting down wounded prey was always a red hot rush. He wanted to drop down to all fours so he could sniff the earth as he moved. He suppressed that urge but he couldn’t stop himself from salivating in anticipation of running down his bleeding prey. There was no escape from him now. Soon, the deer’s sweet flesh would be his to feast upon.

The creek he was following lay at the bottom of a shallow gully, and it continued to wind its way past rows of short evergreen trees until it suddenly ended up ahead. Blacknail approached the spot where the water disappeared into thin air and looked down. There was a cliff below him and the stream at his feet rushed over its edge and became a roaring waterfall. The white water fell for thirty feet or so before slamming into a wide pool below. Mist spread out from the base of the waterfall and washed over the pool’s rocky shores. The air here was cool, humid, and full of energy.

Khita walked over to Blacknail’s side and started to say something, but the hobgoblin elbowed her in the stomach and she shut up. He was scanning the scene below carefully and he didn’t have time for the redhead’s stupidity. A moment later, he looked away from the pool and to each side. The forest continued on his left but he saw no sign the deer had gone that way. To his right, the ground sloped downwards and there was a path down towards the bottom of the cliff. Almost immediately, he spotted a splatter of dark red blood on a rock there.

"This way,” he hissed quietly to Khita as he headed after the deer.

The roaring of the waterfall drowned out almost all the other noises. Even Blacknail’s long sensitive ears were a little deafened, so the hobgoblin was wary. He carefully observed his surroundings for movement as he stalked forward into the rocks. It wasn’t until he reached the bottom of the incline that he spotted something. Something brown was poking out from behind a large triangular rock. Blacknail crept silently over to get a better look and got ready to draw his sword, just in case. However, the identity of the object soon became obvious. It was the deer. It had collapsed at the base of the rock, and its still chest indicated that it was no longer breathing. Blacknail’s arrow was still sticking out of its now blood-stained neck.

“We got it!” Khita exclaimed happily when she walked up behind Blacknail.

“We?” the hobgoblin grunted in reply. It seemed like the hunt was over. He was almost disappointed that it hadn’t been more exciting. Some real struggle from the prey would have been nice.

“Let’s get out of here before something comes to try and steal our prey,” Blacknail told Khita as he scanned the nearby trees suspiciously. The deer was his prize now, and he didn’t want some big fat lazy beast stealing it.

It took a fair bit of time and effort to get the deer carcass back to camp, but most the effort was Khita’s, so Blacknail didn’t care. This was the reason he had allowed her to come, to carry things. On the way, the pair spotted a few deposits of grey clay along the stream bank. It seemed like procuring clay wouldn’t be hard. Now they just needed to figure out what to do with it.

That wasn’t Blacknail’s first concern, though. The priority was skinning and butchering the deer he had just brought down before it went bad. He also wanted to use this opportunity to teach his minions, so he rounded up his larger followers. Khita was already with him so he went and found Gob and Elyias.

They watched as Blacknail dragged the carcass over to an empty spot near the drying rack and got to work. First, he slit the dead animal’s throat and hung it up so that the blood would drain out. Blood went bad quickly and would taint the meat. Next, he took out a knife and began to cut the skin away from the flesh. He had plans for the pelt so he tried to keep most of it in one piece. The bloody work quickly drew a small crowd of curious goblins. Blacknail ignored them, and when the hide came free he put it aside and started to butcher the animal. His knife split open the animal’s guts and he reached in to pull out all the organs.

Gob diligently watched everything Blacknail did. Goblins usually just ripped their prey apart and nibbled them down to the bone so this was all new to him. Khita had done similar things a few times before when she had been learning from Saeter but Elyias was a city boy. He scowled in disgust as Blacknail worked, especially when the intestines were pulled out and dumped into a steaming pile on the ground.

The final step of the butchering was to cut the carcass up into smaller pieces. Blacknail used his long knife to cut off the deer’s hunches and strip the flesh from the bone. When he was done there wasn’t much left of the deer but its detached head, squishy organs, and bloody bones.

“See, even idiots like you can do it!” Blacknail told his minions as he plucked the eyes from the animal’s skull and slurped them down. They were the nice and chewy reward for his hard work.

“I will remember everything you have done, great chief. A hundred deer will be laid at your feet,” Gob replied as Blacknail nodded happily. That was the kind of enthusiasm and drive he liked in his minions.

“Ha, Blacknail’s right, you two are dumb as bricks,” Khita laughed. For some reason she thought she had been excluded from his comment.

“I hate you all,” Elyias cursed.

However, Blacknail had already turned away and was busy planning his next job. Having all this fresh meat in front of him just reminded him that he still needed to figure out how to make bowls. The deer’s bones would have added flavor to a stew.

“Do any of you know how to use clay?” he asked the others.

“You mean baking it to make pottery?” Elyias replied uncertainly.

The young man didn’t much know more than Khita, and Gob just stared uncomprehendingly at Blacknail and shrugged. Blacknail groaned. Of course, none of them were useful. As usual, he was going to have to do everything himself.

“You need to go back to the humans and find one that can make bowls from clay,” the hobgoblin told Khita.

“And what do I do when I find such a person?” Khita asked.

“Learn from them, or if it’s too hard bring someone who knows back with you. I can meet them.”

“What if they don’t want to come?”

Blacknail frowned thoughtfully before replying. “I can talk to them at the village, but if they try to keep clay making secret from me then I will sneak in and grab them when it gets dark. They will talk.”

“Sounds like a plan,” Khita answered as she smiled and rubbed her hands together gleefully.

“Why does that excite you, and whose side are you on?” Elyias asked in disbelief.

“My own. I don’t owe anyone anything,” Khita snorted. This caused Blacknail to glance her way.

“Except maybe Blacknail. We’ve saved each other’s lives more time than I can count,” she quickly corrected herself. Blacknail was sure she couldn’t count very high, but he let the comment go.

The young redhead didn’t waste any time in heading back to Shelter. Blacknail sent Scamp and a couple goblins with her to keep her out of trouble and so that she could send him a message if they needed to meet up later. When she was gone, Blacknail let Gob get back to his own projects and started tanning the hide of the deer he had caught.

With Elyias’ help Blacknail scraped the remaining flesh from the underside of the hide. When all the flesh and fat had been removed they took it to the creek and washed it thoroughly. The hide was then stretched out the drying rack and tied in place so that it wouldn’t shrink. That was all they could do for now since it would take a few days to dry.

Since Khita wasn’t back yet, Blacknail decided to wander around and see if there was anyone that needed bossing around. After yelling at a few goblins that were lazing around he stumbled over to where Gob was working. The other hobgoblin had finished training the overseers and teaching goblins basic skills, so now he was building a structure of some sort.

Gob had been sending out goblins to collect materials for a while now. He had built up a stockpile of twine, bark, and poles made from slender trees, and now he was using them to create a longhouse. Blacknail had seen the small one Gob had created at his old tribe’s lair, and this new one looked like it was going to be a fair bit bigger. He already had the frame of the building up. Poles had been stuck into the ground, bent to form an arch for the roof, and tied into place. They weren’t all up yet, but when they were the large strips of bark would be tied to them to form walls. The finished building would be a comfier place to sleep than in a cave.

While Gob was working Blacknail decided to procure some of his materials in order to build himself a bed. A few pieces of lumber would make the frame and he could pile some dry plants on top to soften the surface. Gob looked up but didn’t say anything as Blacknail begin to drag several poles away. He put them down near the entrance to his cave and then used the axe to cut them up. He had just about finished when Scamp ran over.

“Khita found some people who know the thing you want to know,” the little goblin exclaimed excitedly as he ran in a circle around Blacknail. “They want to meet at the village.”

Scamp’s blabbering wasn’t very clear but he probably meant that Khita’s mission had been successful. It was good that they apparently didn’t need to kidnap anyone, but Blacknail still had some concerns.

“How many people?” Blacknail asked.

“Um, she didn’t say,” Scamp replied as he stopped running in circles.

The hobgoblin nodded and went into his cave to grab his backpack. He opened it, put on gloves, wrapped a red scarf around his face, and pulled his hood up. If he was going back to the village then he needed to disguise himself. When he had finished dressing, Blacknail hid a few extra daggers around his person. He didn’t trust the humans of the village and wanted to be ready to fight his way out.

With that done, Blacknail headed out into the forest. He jogged through the trees at a steady pace until he spotted something out of place. Several sets of paw prints crossed the trail he was running along. Blacknail took a second to crouch down and study the tracks. They definitely belonged to a pack of wolves. Normally that wouldn’t have bothered Blacknail too much, but one set of prints was much larger than any he had seen before. Blacknail looked up and scanned the forest around himself nervously. Only when he was sure there was nothing nearby did he lean over and sniff the ground. There was something off about the smell of the prints as well. An out of place mineral scent similar to that of Mahedium’s workshop lingered where the animal had been. Disturbed, Blacknail got up and studied his surroundings again. He didn’t like this development, but the forest seemed normal, so he got up and began running again. Just to be safe, it would be a good idea to start sending his minions out in groups now, especially Khita, at least until he wouldn’t be blamed for her death.

The rest of the trip to the village was uneventful. Blacknail reached the area of clear ground that surrounded the village. He eyed the front gate suspiciously for a few moments before sauntering out of the woods and crossing the fields. There was no point in being sneaky.

“Open up,” Blacknail shouted as he pounded on the door.

“Gods above, man. You don’t need to raise such a ruckus,” the guard replied as the entrance swung open.

“I’m here to meet some people, and not to do anything unfriendly or suspicious,” Blacknail said as he stepped inside. He was out of practice when it came to talking to humans.

“So I’ve been told,” the man replied as he gestured for the hobgoblin to go on.

Blacknail didn’t need any further invitation. He quickly walked past the man and into the village. There were a bunch of small houses lining the main street and an older woman bustled by, but he didn’t see Khita anywhere. The young redhead was supposed to be waiting for him. Where was she?

Feeling very annoyed, Blacknail concentrated on listening for her voice. At first he didn’t hear anything, but then he heard a laugh that sounded like it had come from Khita off in the distance. The hobgoblin scowled and stalked towards the source of the noise. He slipped into an alley between two homes so that he could stay out of sight. Another closer burst of laughter allowed Blacknail to pinpoint Khita’s location, so he lengthened his stride. A few seconds later, he turned a corner and saw her standing in front of a shed that lay behind a house, and she wasn’t alone. Blacknail recognized the faces of the three young humans the bandits had used as hostages when they had first arrived at the village.

“Ya, I’ve been in around a dozen battles and killed at least twenty men,” Khita bragged. She was facing the three smaller humans and there was a proud look on her face.

“Really, that sounds so terrible,” the blonde girl gasped in surprise.

“Nah, I’m not afraid of anything,” Khita replied dismissively. “It was all the other bandits that were terrified of me and my sword skills!”

Blacknail remembered Khita’s sword skills quite clearly. He had trained alongside Khita under Vorscha, so he knew that when she had a sword in hand Khita was most dangerous to herself.

“Did you ever see any real magic?” the taller blonde boy asked. He sounded excited and curious, but he was looking to the side as if trying to prove that he didn’t care all that much.

“Sure, I saw tons of magic!” Khita answered. “Our band had a mage and a few Vessels. The mage was always throwing flaming balls of fire around.”

“Vessels are real? I thought they were just exaggerated stories,” the younger lad with short brown hair remarked.

“Of course they are real. You’ve even met one,” Khita replied as she rolled her eyes.

With sudden haste, Blacknail’s hooded form stepped out of the shadows and headed for Khita. She had said more than enough already, and it was time to shut her up before she revealed something important. He was almost directly behind her so she didn’t see him coming, but her companions did and they froze in surprise.

“Eeep,” Khita squealed as Blacknail placed a hand on her shoulder.

She spun around to see who it was and only relaxed when she recognized Blacknail’s distinctive clothes. An awkward smile forced its way onto her face.

“So you’re not afraid of anything?” Blacknail chuckled as he stepped up beside her.

“I wasn’t afraid; I was just on guard,” Khita countered.

“Blacknail’s the only person who can sneak up on me like that. We both trained under the same master ranger,” she quickly explained to the others.

“Greetings, Mister Blacknail. Khita has told us a bit about you. You probably remember me. I’m Joan,” the blonde hesitantly interjected in order to introduce herself. She gave him a friendly nod.

“She’s been more than a little vague about you, though. Why do you hide your face all the time? It’s bloody suspicious,” the older male asked as he glared at Blacknail.

“Don’t be rude, Hassiol,” Joan told the blonde male.

“Why shouldn’t I be rude? It’s weird how welcoming everyone is being to these newcomers. Some of them seem dangerous to me. I mean look at him!” he replied.

“You’re one to talk. You’ve been trailing after Khita like a hound,” the younger lad countered. Blacknail remembered that his name was Avis.

“I have not! Anyway, Khita isn’t the problem here,” Hassiol protested.

The youth’s bickering didn’t seem like it was going to end any time soon, and Blacknail didn’t have all day. If they had been goblins he would have just smacked them around a bit, but they weren’t, so he delegated.

“I came here for a reason. Shut these younglings up and take me to the person who knows how to shape clay,” he hissed quietly at Khita.

“Ah, that’s Joan. Don’t worry I have these young fools eating out of my hand. I’ll shut them up and get her to show you the trick,” she replied.

To Blacknail, Khita didn’t seem all that different from them. Hassiol was the same height as her and probably weighed more. Blacknail held his tongue though, and Khita quickly got the two boys to quiet down.

“Why do you want to learn this stuff, anyway?” Joan asked as she led the way over to the shed.

“Um… just normal human reasons,” Blacknail quickly replied.

“Right…” Hassiol commented suspiciously. He was now glaring at Blacknail again so the hobgoblin must have said something wrong.

“He broke his favorite bowl and wants to replace it himself. Blacknail is all about self sufficiency and he has a lot of free time out there in the forest,” Khita interjected.

“Ah, that makes sense,” Joan observed cheerfully as they all stepped inside.

There was easily enough room in the shed for the four humans and the hobgoblin, even though there was a small table in the center of the room and a large shelf stood against one wall. Joan went over to the shelf and picked up a large chunk of dry clay. She carried it over to the table and began to explain how to use the material and shape it.

“I used to make a lot of little pots and cups from clay when I was a little kid, because it was a lot of fun. My parents would bring me the stuff and help me fire it,” she told everyone as she smiled brightly.

Blacknail watched and listened carefully. Joan rolled up her sleeves and then crushed the clump of clay into dry powder. She then added a bit of water to rewet it and began rubbing it between her hands to make a ball and several long cylinders. The bowl began to take shape when she had flattened the ball to make the bowl’s base and placed several rings of clay on top of it. After that, she smoothed the clay out with her fingers until it looked like a real bowl.

“Now you just need to fire the clay. Here in the village we use a kiln but you don’t need one. You can use a fire pit if you know what you’re doing,” she explained as she held up her little grey bowl.

“That seems easy enough,” Khita observed. She sounded confident but Blacknail was sure she hadn’t been paying attention during half the lecture. He would have to make sure he remembered everything.

“It’s just dirt. Why are you all staring at it?” Scamp asked from where he was standing next to Blacknail.

The little goblin was peering up over the table at the unfinished bowl in Joan’s hands. Everyone turned to look at him when he spoke up. No one had noticed him approach, but he was the center of attention now. Blacknail groaned. Things had been going so well…







HAH 9









“Oh, hello,” Scamp said as everyone in the shed turned to look his way. The goblin gave the humans a friendly wave and smiled at them. He looked like he was enjoying all the attention.

The three young villagers didn’t return the goblin’s grin. Joan went stiff from fear and Aris stepped in front of her protectively. Hassiol just looked really confused and more than a little disbelieving. His eyes were wide with surprise.

“A goblin!” Aris yelled dramatically, as if he was doing something more than stating the incredibly obvious.

Blacknail wondered if it was too late to kill Scamp and pretend he knew nothing about him. It wasn’t impossible that a goblin could randomly wander in here.

“Yep, I’m a goblin. You’re smart for a human.” Scamp replied cheerfully.

This forced Blacknail to acknowledge that it was too late to kill him. Random feral goblins didn’t talk like that.

“You can’t be here!” Blacknail hissed. “You’re supposed to stay out in the forest. The villagers aren’t supposed to see you!”

“Staying behind is boring, and you didn’t say I couldn’t come,” Scamp whined back. “I miss the others. I want to see Geralhd.”

“It talks! How can it talk?” Aris asked. He sounded like he was in shock. A good punch to the side of the head would probably clear his mind, or wipe his memories. Either would work for Blacknail.

“Scamp isn’t dangerous,” Khita hurriedly explained as she stepped over and placed a hand on top of the goblin’s head. “He’s a pet that was trained by a member of our band.”

“Goblins can talk?” Hassiol asked in a great display of human ingenuity in the face of the unexpected.

“They can if you teach them,” Blacknail grumbled. “There is no point though, if they are too stupid to follow orders.”

“Don’t be so mean to him,” Khita told Blacknail as she patted Scamp on the head. The little goblin looked smug.

“How did it get in here? We have walls and the gate is watched,” Avis asked.

“I snuck through a hole under the wall, it wasn’t very hard,” Scamp explained helpfully.

“Goblins can talk?” Hassiol asked again. He didn’t seem to realize that that question had already been answered, and his obnoxious repetition was really starting to grate on Blacknail.

“I’ve never seen a goblin this close before,” Joan remarked as her shock gave way to curiosity. Scamp wasn’t all that intimidating for a goblin, unless you counted his smell.

“I have. A few years ago, one got its hand stuck in a hole in the side of a barrel, while it was reaching for the apples inside,” Avis said. “The beasty caused quite the commotion right outside our window that night, so my mother grabbed a broom and went out to deal with it. She got a few good smacks in before the critter gave up on the apples, pulled its hand out, and ran off.”

“We should report this to Mr. Tannin,” Hassiol told his friends. This earned him a place on Blacknail’s most annoying human list. It wasn’t a long list, because people kept dropping off of it, usually in spectacularly fatal ways. Life was funny that way.

“There’s no need to tell anyone. Goblins probably sneak inside this village all the time, like in Avis’ story. What is Tannin going to do about it?” Khita replied before chuckling dismissively.

“He should still know.”

“What, are you afraid of the little goblin? He’s just a pet,” Khita teased him.

“Of course not,” the blonde boy quickly replied as he blushed a bright red. He tried to stand tall and look confident but since he couldn’t meet Khita’s eyes he just looked insecure.

“Then a tough guy like you doesn’t need to tell anyone about a harmless goblin like Scamp. This can be a small secret just between us,” Khita told him as she smiled suggestively. Her words actually caused Hassiol to smile back and nod, although Blacknail had no idea why. It was more than a little weird.

“I’m not harmless…” Scamp muttered before Blacknail placed a gloved hand on top of his head and gave it a firm squeeze. To the others it looked like a friendly pat, but Scamp flinched and quickly shut his mouth.

“I can understand why you kept the trained goblin a secret,” Joan observed. “A lot of people don’t like the little pests and wouldn’t want it wandering around.”

“They’re just being stupid,” Avis added. “I’ve never seen a goblin attack anything bigger than a chicken. They’re not nearly as dangerous as the adults like to pretend.”

“Yes, completely harmless,” Blacknail pretended to agree as he nodded. Since the whole Scamp issue seemed settled, he turned to Joan.
“Thank you for the lesson,” he told her.

“It was nothing. We’re all supposed to be getting along now,” she replied as she gave him a bright cheery smile.

“Even with the creepy faceless ranger who hangs out in the forest,” Avis muttered to himself. Blacknail heard him but chose to pretend he hadn’t. The kid wasn’t worth his time.

Since the demonstration was complete and he had learned what he wanted to know, Blacknail spun around and left. The human settlement unnerved him. It was full of hostile humans, and unlike a larger city there weren’t any abandoned places he could hide. The cloaked hobgoblin sent Scamp back to sneak out the way he had come in and then headed to the village gate. Khita said her own goodbyes and then followed him. They left the settlement and crossed the fields until they reached the forest. As soon as the greenery shielded them from any watchers at the village, Blacknail called for them to stop.

“We will wait for Scamp,” he announced.

“Huh, that’s unlike you. Why are we waiting for him instead of going on ahead?” Khita asked.

“I saw wolf tracks on the way here. There is a pack around, so no one should go out alone,” Blacknail replied as he scanned the forest around them. Nothing seemed out of place.

“You’re afraid of some wolves?”

Blacknail turned and snarled at Khita. “I’m not afraid. I’m just smarter than a dumb girl like you. One of the wolves smells wrong. It might be a threat.”

“They’re just some dumb dogs,” the redhead replied defensively.

Her response infuriated Blacknail. He didn’t need to hear such nonsense from a weakling like Khita. She had no idea what she was talking about. The hobgoblin spun around and smacked her across the side of the head.

“Ow,” Khita cursed as she reeled away from him in surprise. One of her hands came up to rub her sore head. It hadn’t been a strong blow but it had still hurt.

“Enough; listen instead of talking!” Blacknail hissed “You will not enter the forest alone until I say so. I am the leader and you are the minion. The Green is dangerous. You do not question, and you will do as I say!”

“Fine, sorry. I won’t underestimate the danger again,” Khita answered.

Her response didn’t fool Blacknail. He saw a defiant gleam in her eyes and noticed that she hadn’t really promised to obey his orders. Normally, he would just hit a few more times, but as tempting as that was, his hands were tied due to his promise to Gerlahd. A more delicate solution was required. Blacknail sighed and grimaced at Khita. This wasn’t going to be fun.

“You did good job back in the village,” he admitted. It was true; somehow the redhead had actually managed to help out and not screw anything up.
Just saying those words gave Blacknail a nasty headache, though. However, they caused Khita’s eyes to shine with surprise. The young redhead straightened up and threw Blacknail a questioning glance as if she couldn’t quite believe what she was hearing.

“But, you need to listen to me. If you die all the stupid people will blame me,” Blacknail quickly added. He didn’t want Khita to misunderstand the reasons for his concern. He just didn’t want her to mess anything up.

Instead of immediately replying, Khita lunged forward and wrapped her arms around the hobgoblins waist. He tried to jerk away from her but her hug was too tight. A giigle could be heard from Khita, and a shiver of disgust went down Blacknail’s spine. This was uncalled for. What did the annoying girl think she was doing?

“Thanks for caring,” Khita exclaimed.

“Let go of me,” Blacknail told her. If he had known this was going to happen he would have just left her to die.

After one more friendly squeeze, Khita stepped back away from the cringing hobgoblin. Blacknail was spared having to tell her anything by the timely arrival of Scamp. The goblin scampered out of the bushes and headed their way.

“Why are you standing around?” he asked as he walked over.

It took a few moments for Blacknail to warn Scamp about the wolves, but then they all headed back to the goblin lair together. Blacknail led the way along the now familiar trail. As the hobgoblin hopped on top of a tree that had fallen across the path, he caught the scent of something that put him on guard. He stiffened and quickly turned to survey his surroundings. The scent of blood was on the wind, goblin blood.

Immediately, Blacknail snarled and drew himself up defensively. Practically anything could be watching from nearby. There were plenty of places to hide among the trees and branches overhead. The back of Blacknail’s neck itched. Looking carefully, he spotted a patch of wet ground up ahead by the base of a tree. He jumped down from the log and stalked over to it. He moved cautiously, but once there he crouched down and sniffed it. It was definitely goblin blood.

Scamp had detected the same smell. His expression was alert and he kept right behind Blacknail, where it was safest. Even Khita had realized something was wrong. She kept her mouth shut and looked slightly nervous as she followed the hobgoblin.

Blacknail ignored them and began to sniff around the tree. A trail of blood spatters led away from the roots and towards a bush. He pushed the branches aside and found another patch of wet ground. There was also a tuff of reddish fur stuck to one of the branches, and it smelled of wolves.
“A goblin was killed here, one of mine,” Blacknail growled angrily as he stepped back from the bush with the fur in hand.

He vaguely recognized the scent of the goblin. It had been from his tribe even if they hadn’t interacted much. Still, a pack of wolves had entered the territory Blacknail had claimed and attacked his tribe. This could not stand. He wouldn’t let it.

“Poor little thing. Was it killed by the wolves you warned me about?” Khita asked.

“Yes,” Blacknail hissed as he threw the fur aside and began walking down the trail again.

“Where are you going? And what are planning to do?”

“Back to camp. I can do nothing now. The wolf scent is from hours ago,” Blacknail explained as his companions began following him again.

It wasn’t unusual for a goblin to be eaten by something like a wolf; in fact it happened all the time. However, Blacknail knew that there was more to this. He could feel it in his bones. This pack of wolves wasn’t normal, and it was going to strike again, so he had to be ready for them. The hobgoblin began to think this new unwanted problem over as he headed back to his lair.

By the time he stepped out of the forest, he realized that there wasn’t much he could do. He wanted to hunt the beasts down and rip them apart with his bare claws, but that wouldn’t work. He didn’t have the time to try and hunt down a pack of wolves, and he could afford to lose a few goblins anyway. As the leader, his time was more valuable than their lives.

Gob had to be informed though, so some basic precautions could be put in place. Khita and Scamp went off to do their own thing, as Blacknail walked into the clearing and passed the rocky hills until he found Gob working away at building the longhouse. The other hobgoblin had several goblins helping him out, and they had accomplished quite a lot. All the poles were up to create the building’s frame, and now they were working on weaving the bark walls. Blacknail interrupted the work long enough to explain the new threat to Gob.

“If you send goblins out make sure they move in groups and have spears. I don’t want to lose any useful minions,” Blacknail told him.

“Yes, great chieftain. I shall be careful as a clam and if I see these wolves I will kill them myself, for your glory!” Gob replied. The hobgoblin then bowed reverently.

"That’s not what I said. Don’t try to kill the wolves yourself. You’ll die,” Blacknail told his minion.

“As you wish, great master. I will let you have the honor of killing the beasts. They will fall before you.”

“Sure…” Blacknail replied uncertainly. Now that Gob was getting better at speaking he was saying some weird things. Blacknail no longer questioned the hobgoblin’s loyalty, just his grasp on reality. Still, it was nice to finally be appreciated by someone.

After dampening Gobs excitement a bit, Blacknail went right back to work on his main project, making some gods-damned bowls, so he could cook up some bloody stew. He now knew how to use clay and where to find it, so it was time to go get it.

Blacknail quickly rounded up a few of the nearest overseers and then had them gather up a several other goblins. Blacknail led the way over to the stream at the edge of the camp, and followed it until they found a deposit of grey clay. Behind him came the goblin workers that would do the actual digging and carrying, and behind them came the overseers who watched the other goblins and used their spears to poke any of them that tried to run away or get out of work. It was an inefficient system but it worked, and best of all Blacknail could stand back give the orders without having to dirty his own hands. He didn’t have to worry about all the workers and could just punish the overseers if anyone messed up.

Soon, the work party was heading back to base. Every worker was covered from top to toes in mud and was carrying a big lump of clay. Once at the lair, the spoils were piled atop a large flat rock where they could dry in the sun. Blacknail admired the grey blobs for few minutes before getting bored and wandering off. He had been hoping it would be more exciting.

Since it was starting to get late, Blacknail had his overseers round up a new group of cleaner goblins and put Elyias in charge of making supper. Blackail then took it easy and went back to building himself a bed. After taking a break to eat he managed to finish and get the construct made of strapped together poles moved into his cave. With some stuffing made of dried plants under his blanket it was even sort of comfy. When she came in to sleep for the night, Khita saw it and decided to make her own eventually.

“It’s too bad there isn’t anyone nearby I can steal a bed from,” she muttered as she went to sleep on the ground.

The next morning, when Blacknail woke up he decided his next personal project would be some sort of door for his cave. There had been a bit of a draft last night. However, since he didn’t have the materials for that right now he put it on hold. There were lots of other things that needed done anyway.

The early morning sun was just peeking above the trees as Blacknail stepped outside. From his vantage point at the cave entrance he could see the various projects underway in the middle of the rocky clearing. Where empty rock had once been several drying racks stood, and the frame of the longhouse Gob was building was off to the side. In the center of everything was a pit ringed by a circle of stones where most of the cooking was done, and off by itself was another pit used to smoke meat. Two goblin guards were holding spears and watching the cave that Blacknail had made into a larder.

The hobgoblin yawned and decided to head to the larder so he could make sure the food wasn’t being stolen, and he could grab something to eat while he was there. Of course, there was some food missing but that was to be expected. The guards would keep other people out but there was no one to prevent them from stealing the food themselves. As long as they only took enough to fill their own stomachs that was fine, though.

Once in the cave, Blacknail chowed down on some smoked rabbit meat and a large white root. It was going to be a busy day so he wanted a full stomach. Things were finally falling in place. He had gathered minions, materials, and knowledge. Now it was time to start building up the base for real. It would be hard work but Blacknail intended on creating a goblin village. The hobgoblin growled as he walked back outside, and the guards stepped back away from him. Patience was difficult but it was necessary if he ever wanted his sweet bloody vengeance. One day, Blacknail would avenge his master, no matter what it took.










HAH 10









After stomping out of the larder, Blacknail shoved his volatile emotions aside and went to work. The most important thing Saeter had ever taught him had been how to control his rage and how to focus on things you didn’t want to do. There was no one forcing Blacknail to do anything anymore, so he had to do it to himself. Only ruin awaited him if he forgot his master’s lessons and acted out. He had to be patient and cunning, like a spider weaving a web.

The clay was still airing out in the sun, so Blacknail headed over to the drying rack. The pelt of the deer he had slain was still stretched out on the rack. It looked ready for the next step of the tanning process, so Blacknail went off to gather some helpers. Gob was busy teaching basic tasks to goblins and disciplining the overseers so he tracked down Elyias and Khita. Both of them could be found sleeping in their respective caves. Humans usually slept-in very late for some reason.

“Do I really have to do this? Why can’t you just get a blanket from Geralhd or something?” Elyias asked as he and Khita followed Blacknail over to the drying rack.

“Stop being lazy. You’re not doing anything but sitting around,” the hobgoblin told him.

“Because you’ve basically kidnapped me and are holding me here in this gods-forsaken place against my will!” Elyias replied angrily.

“Exactly, you can’t leave so you may as well make yourself useful.”

It wasn’t by mistake that Elyias had ended up stuck with Blacknail. Goblins could do simple tasks like fighting and hunting, but for some things Blacknail needed helpers with a bit more brains in their skulls. He didn’t have time to teach all the goblins by himself, so he planned to teach Elyias and then have Elyias pass the knowledge on. Since Khita had interjected herself into his plans the hobgoblin planned to use her for this as well.

“Isn’t there something less boring I could help with?” Khita asked.

“No, you wanted to follow me and help, so this is what you will do. Watch and learn,” Blacknail told her.

The hobgoblin then proceeded to show them how to finish tanning the stretched out hide. First, he took the skin down and carefully scrapped the hair from it. Next, he took a big rock and bashed the animal's disembodied head until its skull broke open like an egg. The brains were then scooped out, thrown in the bucket, and mixed with water until it became soup-like. The resulting goop was worked into the hide by hand.

“This is so disgusting,” Elyias remarked as he cringed back away from the slop in the bucket.

“Yet tasty,” Blacknail replied. He enthusiastically licked his fingers to prove the point.

“Can I not do this?” Khita asked.

The answer was no. Blacknail needed both of them to learn to do this. There was a near endless supply of smaller hides that needed to be preserved, and he wasn’t going to do it. He was the leader after all. The only reason he was working so much right now was to avoid more work later. Hopefully, once he had all his minions trained he could start napping all day while goblins brought him the best morsels of food.

Once the hide had been thoroughly massaged with the brain oil by all of them, it was wrapped up and placed in the larder, where it would keep cool and be allowed to soak until tomorrow. It was annoying how making things the human way took so much time. There always seemed to be several steps where you had to just leave the material alone for hours or days. Why couldn’t the humans have created better ways of doing this stuff? Were they just lazy?

“Are we done now?” Elyias asked.

“Yes. Now we can start making things from clay,” Blacknail replied.

“Can I at least wash my hands?”

“Your loss,” Blacknail answered as licked his fingers clean.

Now that the clay Blacknail had procured yesterday was dry it was ready to be processed. Joan had explained the process yesterday, and it hadn’t sounded that hard. The dry clay was already on top of a flat rock so the workers immediately began using smaller stones to break it up and crush it down to powder. Blacknail then gathered up the dust and ran it though the loose cloth he had been given yesterday by Joan. This removed all the small rocks and bits of plants. He had been told it was possible to use your hands and pick out the unwanted debris but that this was easier. He liked easier.

“I can’t believe I was tricked into becoming some sort of menial laborer for a hobgoblin,” Elyias moaned as he halfheartedly smashed the clay. “Where did my life go so wrong?”

“If you want to continue getting free food and a warm place to sleep you will work harder,” Blacknail hissed back.

“There’s more to life than eating and sleeping. This primitive shit is going to drive me mad.”

Khita put down her own rock and threw Elyias a disdainful look before speaking up. “This is the easy life compared to what I went through as a kid. The streets are a harsh place to grow up. Sure when my brother was still around and in charge things were softer than this, but that’s life. The gods raise us up and knock us down, but that works both ways. I’m here because I expect this horse to catch its stride and start going places soon.”

“Just because I had proper parents doesn’t mean my life was a piece of pie,” Elyias replied defensively. “My family wasn’t rich, and I’m the third son so even before the draft I had to head out and find my own way in life. I got nothing I didn’t earn myself.”

“I used to fight rats that were bigger than me for garbage to eat,” Blacknail told them. He had seen a few human street children before and they really didn’t have it that bad. Goblins usually had it much worse.

Elyias grumbled to himself but went back to work without another complaint. Blacknail added water to the clay powder until it became a malleable blob that kept its shape.

“Huh, Joan was right. This is pretty fun,” Khita remarked as she took a blob and began to shape it into a bowl.

Blacknail and Elyias were both doing the same thing. They soon had a dozen crude bowls ready to be fired.

“Now for the fire!” Blacknail said as he admired his creations.

“Yes, the fire!” a raspy voice agreed.

What? Blacknail glanced over his shoulder to see who had just spoken. He was quickly treated to the sight of a pale goblin with a huge smile plastered on his face. It was Ferrar.

“What are you doing here?” Blacknail asked. How did these stupid goblins keep sneaking up on him?

“I’m watching,” Ferrar replied as he smiled at Khita and Elyias. Blacknail had already known that, so the goblin’s vague answer annoyed him.

“Where’s Imp? You two creeps are always together.”

“He’s sleeping.”

“That doesn’t sound like him,” Blacknail remarked. Imp always seemed to be up and about somewhere.

“Things change.”

The vague words sounded vaguely threatening, but Blacknail decided it had to be unintentional. There was no way the feral goblin knew the language all that well. Blacknail was frankly surprised he could speak at all since he was originally from this territory. Imp must have taught him.

“Fine, stay and watch. You will like this part.”

Earlier, the hobgoblin had ordered some goblins to dig a pit and gather wood and tinder. Now it was time to finish up this experiment. Blacknail, Khita, and Elyias each grabbed two bowls and placed them in the middle of the pit. Blacknail then carefully arranged a ring of firewood around the clay items. After adding a bit of tinder, he used his flint and steel to set it all ablaze.

When the wood was completely ignited and several minutes had passed, Blacknail carefully added more wood. Over the next half hour, he kept building the fire closer and closer to the bowls until the flames touched the items. That was when he placed a large pile of wood right on top of the clay and created one huge bonfire. By this time the waves of heat thrown off of the blaze was causing him to sweat profusely.

Now that the fire was burning steadily, Blacknail didn’t feel the need to stick around. Someone needed to watch it, though, and he had other things for Khita and Elyias to do. That left only one option, Ferrar. Normally Blacknail wouldn’t trust a goblin to pay attention that long, but Ferrar seemed to spend most his time around fire.

“Keep this going for at least three hours and then let it cool down during the night,” Blacknail told the goblin.
“Burn things made in fire!” Ferrar responded excitedly. The goblin then ran over to the pile of firewood and threw another log on bonfire.
“Good enough,” Blacknail grunted. He would come back later and make sure everything was alright.

After working so hard, they all went to the larder to grab some food. Once they had filled their stomachs, Blacknail had Khita and Elyias start to teach groups of goblins how to tan and preserve animal skins. They didn’t have any more deer pelts but they did have a near endless supply of rabbits from the traps the goblins were putting out.

While the others were doing that, Blacknail took another group of goblins and overseers out to gather more clay. They would need quite a lot more of the grey ooze to start mass-producing bowls and other useful items.

Everyone worked hard teaching and gathering materials until it got dark. Blacknail then once again threw a huge feast using the food the goblins had brought in and stored in the larder. As the chattering masses of goblins rushed over to eat, Blacknail counted quite a few new faces. More goblins were either coming out of hiding or were wandering out of the forest and joining the tribe. There were now at least sixty goblins living in Blacknail’s outpost. Sixteen of those were trained overseers that would actually obey orders. Weirdly, both Scamp and Imp didn’t show up, but Blacknail didn’t think too much of it. Maybe one of Imp's magic stones had finally exploded and killed them.

The next morning, Blacknail woke up early and walked over to the smoldering remains of the bonfire he had put his clay bowls in. Khita and Elyias followed him, and Ferrar invited himself along. When they got there, all that was left was a pit full of black charcoal and white ash. Blacknail reached in and started rummaging through the ash to find the bowls.

“You might want to use a stick or something. That could be hot,” Khita remarked as Blacknail yelped and withdrew his hand.

“Say it faster next time,” Blacknail hissed sourly as he sucked his sore thumb. Khita was so useless and annoying. It was infuriating.

Further digging using a stick unearthed the clay bowls. Five of the nine had survived the firing intact and were now an earthy brown color. Their uneven and crude shapes were none-the-less functional. The other four had split in half or shattered into fragments and were thus completely unusable.

“These three are mine! They all worked,” Blacknail proudly congratulated himself as he selected three of the intact bowls at random. He was a master craftsman.

“That one has my fingerprint on it,” Khita pointed out.

“I meant this one,” Blacknail replied as he quickly switched the bowl with another successful one.

No one said anything, but the humans both rolled their eyes. Blacknail didn’t care what they thought. They were just jealous of his obviously superior skill.

Since the experiment in making clay had mostly worked, Blacknail got goblins working on producing more. He needed a lot more than five bowls. Groups of goblins were sent out to gather clay, process it, and to dig the firing pits. Elyias was put in charge of the overseers and Ferrar volunteered to help him burn things.

That left Blacknail and Khita free to finish up the tanning of the deer hide. They took the hide out of the cool larder, cleaned it a bit, stretched it out between them by hand, and then softened the hide by hitting it with a stick. An odd surge of bittersweet emotions welled up in Blacknail as he worked with Khita. He could clearly remember doing this with Saeter, although the stretching part had been more respectful and less like a game of tug a war, which Blacknail had easily beaten Khita at.

Once the hide was soft enough it was ready to be smoked. Blacknail sewed up the tears in the hide and placed it above the fire using a rack made of sticks. He threw green wood on the coals to produce lots of thick smoke. He smoked both sides for an hour each before taking it down from the rack and holding it up proudly.

“It’s done! Aren’t I great at hunting and making useful things!” Blacknail bragged.

“What are you going to use it for?” Khita asked dryly. She made no comment about the hobgoblin’s own question.

“I want to hang it at the cave door to keep the warmth in.”

“You already have blankets. You should give it to Gob.”

“Nope, it’s mine, I caught it.”

“Gob has really done a lot…” Khita started to say before Blacknail cut her off.

“Shut up, I’m the leader. I want this. It’s neat,” he told her as he walked off to hang up his new trophy. Who cared what Khita thought?

After admiring his work, the hobgoblin helped the goblins processing the clay when they ran into a problem. They only had the one cloth to sort the dust and it was already wearing down. Blacknail consulted with Gob and together they came up with the idea of using the soft fibers under all the bark Gob had collected to weave a mesh of their own. It took a lot of time to make the cloth, but Blacknail didn’t trust the goblins to sort anything properly by hand. They were too lazy and stupid.

The clearing full of rocky hills that the goblins used as a base was now constantly humming with activity. Groups of goblins were always walking around and working at different things. There were gatherers and trappers bringing back food and materials. Overseers were watching over the food. Several goblins were putting hides and meat up on the drying rack. Gob and a few helpers were almost done building the longhouse. Other goblins were firing clay or chipping stones to make tools. Blacknail had just lain down to rest for a bit in the sun, when Elyias showed up and started bothering him.

“It’s Scamp. He is sick or something!” the man told him.

“So what?” Blacknail replied grumpily. The heat from the sunlight was pleasant and he didn’t want to move.

“He could die!”

“More food for everyone else.”

“Um, it might be contagious?”

The little nuisance had been very quiet lately. With a sigh, Blacknail got up and followed Elyias over to the cave he shared with Scamp. It was smaller and mustier than Blacknail’s. It was little more than a rocky overhang with three walls and a large open entrance, but that probably suited Elyias fine since humans didn’t see well in the dark. Scamp was entangled in a dirty blanket and sleeping against the back wall.
“What’s he doing?” Blacknail asked as peered at the goblin.

“Nothing! He hasn’t moved all day. At first I thought he was just being lazy but it’s clearly more than that.”

Feeling suddenly uneasy, Blacknail walked to the goblin’s side and looked down. He scowled at what he saw, and then he kicked Scamp in the ribs. There was a solid thud noise but the goblin didn’t react. Blacknail kicked him again.

“What are you doing?” Elyias asked. He sounded alarmed by the sudden violence.

“Working out my frustration.”

“He hasn’t done anything wrong. He’s sick.”

“He’s not sick. Scamp’s sleeping because he’s turning into a hobgoblin. Look, he’s got tiny little horns,” Blacknail hissed angrily. There was indeed a pair of horn tips growing from the goblin’s head.

The entire point of building up the goblin lair and disciplining the local goblins had been to create hobgoblins. However, Scamp wasn’t the type of goblin Blacknail had wanted to transform. He would probably just become even more useless and eat more, a lot more.

“So, he will wake up soon?”

“Yes, in a day or two,” Blacknail answered before suddenly freezing.

He had just had a terrible thought. Imp had been awfully quiet lately. In fact, he had disappeared at the same time as Scamp. Blacknail immediately dashed out of the cave. He had no idea where Imp usually slept so he quickly tracked down Ferrar. The goblin was busy shaping clay to throw in the fire.

“Has Imp been sleeping all day?” Blacknail asked Ferrar. The goblin considered the question for several seconds before nodding in the affirmative. Blacknail resisted the urge to choke him to death.

“Things change. Goblins change,” Ferrar answered as he squished a clump of wet clay between his fingers.

This news didn’t sit well with Blacknail. He hadn’t been expecting hobgoblins to appear yet, and Imp wouldn’t have been one of his first choices anyway. He was smart but creepy, and Blacknail didn’t like having powerful unpredictable minions. He wanted nice followers that were easy to control. However, a hobgoblin version of Imp would probably prove smart enough to be useful…

Wait, he was missing the main point. Having a pair of newly changed hobgoblins running around the camp unsupervised was a terrible idea. Having a new hobgoblin running around with a backpack full of magical explosives was worse. Blacknail wasn’t going to let that happen. He needed a plan, one that would allow him to keep the new hobgoblins out of trouble - and most importantly - keep himself in charge. Things were going to become interesting when Scamp and Imp woke up.








AMAZON 





I just released my first ebook on Amazon. I have been talking about it forever without actually doing it, but now it is done. No take backs. I'm very nervous.

I've put a lot of effort into making this ebook worth buying. I hired and worked with a professional editor, and I went through a rather long process where I tried to commission the perfect cover. Even discounting the countless hours spent writing and editing, getting all this done was very expensive, especially since I had no idea what I was doing. None of it would have been possible without my lovable patrons. I am super in debt to all of you. Thank you so much.

If you enjoy my writing then please purchase this book. It helps me out way more than just putting a few bucks in my pocket. The more people buy the book on Amazon the more it will be advertised there. That means it will be easier for new people to find, and thus I will get more sales. A big boost from you guys will really help to get the sales ball rolling. Every purchase helps, like a lot.

The other important thing to do is to review the book on Amazon. Every single good review helps promote my ebook there. Reviews by verified purchasers are especially important, so if you buy the book please take a minute to review it. I will be ever so grateful to you. It really means a lot.

The Goblin's Tale chronicles the first book of the web serial. The story goes from the beginning of the serial to just before the characters set out for Daggerpoint. Some changes have been made to focus the plot and I have added some new scenes as well. Compared to the web serial the book is much more professional and streamlined. I think it is worth getting even if you have already read the web serial. It might just be time to reread the beginning of the story and remember all the things you missed. That sounds like fun to me. Wink

I chose the current price based on other novels. The Goblin's Tale is actually much longer than a lot of other books. It's over 120,000 words and its price reflects that.

You can also review the book on Goodreads. I plan on releasing a physical book eventually, but I'm very busy right now, so I don't have a time frame. I'm super busy getting all the stuff for this book launch done, and to top it off I will be moving soon. Its a good thing I own next to nothing.

Buy the book. Tongue








INT : SIR










“And that’s how you milk a goat,” Tannin announced as he stepped back away from the animal. There was a satisfied look on the old man’s face.

“Fascinating, I feel enlightened by your succinct yet thorough explanation of this wonderful natural process,” Gerahld replied from a few feet away. He was smiling in a way that looked very forced and unnatural, almost as if he was being sarcastic.

Both of the men were standing in a large dirty shed. Piles of hay littered the floor and there were several goats wandering around. The grey beasts were mostly ignoring the humans. They all seemed focused on chewing things, although Geralhd had no idea what. He hadn’t seen any of them eat anything.

“I may not be a scholar of any sort but I know what sarcasm is,” Tannin answered dryly.

Gerahld coughed and made an effort to reply in a more polite and respectful tone. “It would be unfair to hold your circumstances of birth against you. You seem like a very wise man to me.”

“I wasn’t born in this village, young man. You’re just digging yourself deeper. Like you, I stumbled upon it and then eventually decided to take up residence,” Tannin explained as he walked out of the shed.

He immediately looked up at the sky. It was a cloudy morning outside but it didn’t look like it was going to rain. The white clouds were slowly but steadily being dragged across the sky by a lofty wind that was barely touching the land below.

“No one in my group is settling down quite yet. We’ve merely been forced into taking a temporary reprieve from the road,” Geralhd replied as he followed the older man out.

“Your speech sure has grown fancier since you got here. I don’t like it.”

“I had different priorities during the adventure that led me to your door. Sleeping indoors and proper meals also agree with me, but I will be leaving when the time is right.

“That’s what I thought as well, when I first arrived. It didn’t last.” Tannin said as he headed down the main road towards the center of the village. “Your bunch has the look of people with nowhere else to go. I can tell you’ve got demons on your tail that you can’t outrun. Finding somewhere to lay low is probably your best bet and there’s nowhere better for that than here.”

“You sound like you’re speaking from experience. Why did you settle down here?”

“The people were halfway decent when I got to know them, and no one here ever tried to tax me or declare themselves my better by virtue of their blue blood.”

“I can appreciate that sentiment, but what were you running from exactly?”

“Trying to pry into my past, eh? That’s alright; it’s ancient history. I was accused of being a thief by a noble and had to disappear. My father was a carpenter and the noble didn’t want to pay him what his work was worth. Or at least that was what I told my wife. The truth may be more complicated,” Tannin explained as he gave Geralhd a conspiratorial wink.

The young man smiled awkwardly in return and then looked away. “Ah, that’s quite similar to another tale I’ve heard. A woman I once knew was in a similar situation.”

Tannin ignored the sad look that appeared on Geralhd’s face and kept talking. “That doesn’t surprise me, but let’s speak about something more relevant to the here and now. Did your education happen to include anything useful? The other members of your group have been helping out with farm work or heavy labor, but you haven’t been contributing much, and you didn’t seem to be paying much attention when I was showing you how to milk that goat. Maybe you know medicine or some sort of trade perhaps?”

“I learned nothing even remotely that pedestrian. My tutors taught me the higher fields of study such as philosophy and math.”

“Well, if I need someone to count the local chickens I will come find you,” Tannin huffed.

“Not that I don’t appreciate your generosity, but you’re being awfully welcoming to me and my friends.”

“Bah, you’re a young and healthy bunch. That’s the kind of blood that we need around here. There a few young widows that have been giving you a few sideways glances.”

“Huh, I’m sure there are, but I’m personally not in the least interested in settling down. This place doesn’t quite offer the lifestyle I crave, or any other sort of style, really.”

“Give it time. It’ll wear you down.”

“I wouldn’t put money on that. I’m not the village living type. One way or another I’m going to be headed back to society,” Geralhd said. He spoke in a stubborn tone that was as much for his own benefit as anyone else’s. He much preferred the finer things in life over the simpler parts. They tended to smell better for one thing.

The pair was passing by another shed when something caught Tannin’s eye. He turned and scowled at the base of the building. Geralhd followed his glance. Something had dug up under the wall and into the shed. The bottom of the wooden siding had been torn up as well and straw from inside had been dragged out.

“Gods damn it,” Tannin cursed.

“It’s just a little hole,” Geralhd replied calmly.

“That’s the third mess I’ve seen this morning alone. People keep reporting small thefts and pests getting into their supplies. We don’t have the resources for this type of nonsense. We need everything we have for when winter comes.”

“Is something causing this? What do you think it is?”

“Goblins. You can see the prints in the dirt there,” Tannin answered angrily as he pointed towards the hole in the wall. “The green pests get into everything, but it’s not usually this bad. A pack of the damned thieves must have denned-up somewhere nearby.”

A surprised cough escaped from Geralhd’s mouth and he turned away to hide his guilty expression. He had a fairly good idea what, or who, was causing Tannin’s problems. It was probably the goblins that had come with Blacknail. Geralhd wasn’t surprised that they were making trouble, although he had been hoping Blacknail would keep them under control. At least they were only stealing small things and food, and not something that would really anger the villagers, like children.

“Huh, weird. I have absolutely no idea what could be causing that sort of phenomenon, none what so ever. It must be just one of those weird little things in life that can’t be explained,” he said aloud.

Something in Geralhd’s voice drew Tannin’s attention, because he threw the man a suspicious look. After a second, he just grunted and looked back at the shed, though.

“Well, I’ll let you go. I’ve got to deal with this mess, among other things, and I know you’ve got your own things to do,” he said.

“Very true. I’ll see you later,” Geralhd replied as he started to hurry away. There was no point sticking around and Tannin was a little too perceptive.

Without looking back, Geralhd headed down the dusty dirt road that ran through the village and towards the homes that had been lent to the bandits. He soon reached his destination and stepped inside. It was a small house that looked worn down. Immediately, he was confronted with the sight of several people seated around a wooden table. They were all former members of Herad’s band, and they looked his way as he walked over to them.
“There you are. We were waiting for you. What took you so long?” one of the bandits asked. He was a blonde man with a sly smile.

“I was speaking to Master Tannin. He wanted to talk to me after he finished trying to get me interested in animal husbandry,” Geralhd answered with a shrug.

“About what?” a woman asked suspiciously.

“I think he was fishing to see what our plans were and whether we are going to stick around.”

“Then he knows about as much as we do, nothing. That’s what we’re here to discuss. So let’s get to it,” the blonde man said. “I for one have had enough of this place. They have me helping with the planting. I don’t plan on settling down to become a dirt farmer. I became a bandit for a reason.”

“They’re talking about getting work parties to cut the bush back at the edge of the clearing. That’ll be hard work and dangerous,” a tall bearded bandit agreed. “On top of the falling trees you have to worry about pissing off a mimic or just ending up in a hungry beast’s gullet. It’s no wonder they have lost some of their people and are looking to replace them.”

“It’s not really any more dangerous than serving under Herad. That wasn’t exactly safe. In fact, it was probably much less survivable, especially at the end there,” the woman countered.

“Maybe, but it paid a lot bloody more, as in more than nothing.”

“It’s far from perfect here, but it’s much better than anywhere else I’ve seen since leaving my family farm with a press gang right behind me,” a shorter bandit interjected. “I wouldn’t mind settling down here. There is a young widow that fancies me.”

“You should marry her. That sounds like a great way to waste away to nothing out here in the middle of nowhere,” Geralhd replied sarcastically. “I’m getting out of this pit the first chance I get.”

“Which brings us to the main point. Can we come up with a realistic plan to leave?” the bearded bandit told everyone. “We’re stuck here with no money, shabby equipment, and a horde of enemies laying in wait for us out there. I’m also worried about our guide going native if we leave him out there too long. He’s a hobgoblin so who knows what’s going through his head. Without human contact he might go feral and disappear on us. Then we will really be stuck.”

“Should we just leave right away and risk it all on the road? If we wait it doesn’t seem like that will improve our odds any,” the blonde bandit asked.

“I hate it here, but that trek through the woods sounds like suicide to me. Count me out,” the bearded bandit interjected stubbornly.

“I think you’re over exaggerating the risk. Werrick has no reason to spend so much effort chasing a few survivors like us, and once we get back to civilization we can earn some coin easily enough, Beardy,” another bandit laughed.

“My name is Ralph Livistanius, and I take great pride in my family lineage. If you use that bloody nickname again I’ll knock your teeth out of your skull. The hobgoblin may get away with calling me what he wants, but you’re not him,” the bearded man replied angrily. His face was red as he rose up from his chair.

“Alright, settle down. Let’s stay on topic. No one else here wants to listen to you argue about nicknames,” Geralhd told them. “Now, it doesn’t seem like a good idea to leave right away. I want out of here more than anyone. The thought of never again enjoying a good vintage of wine crushes my soul into nothingness, but we need to wait until we can gather some equipment and supplies at least.”

“What about the hobgoblin? What if he disappears?”

“Blacknail’s got Khita with him, and I have a hard time seeing him going feral,” Geralhd explained. “He’s too intelligent for that and he enjoys his little comforts as much as any of us, if not more. He certainly whines a lot if he runs out of cheese. No, I’m more worried about him getting bored and causing a ruckus here. Blacknail will be fine in the forest, where he is safely out of the way. How much trouble can he get into out in the bush?”






IEO 1











As Imp and Scamp slumbered and grew, Blacknail was hard at work. As the leader of the goblin tribe he had many important duties that he couldn’t ignore, like yelling at random goblins and glaring at everyone that tried to talk to him. Usually, when someone approached him they wanted him to do something annoying or answer a question he didn’t actually know anything about. Making up answers that satisfied his minions was a pain so Blacknail went out of his way to discourage such behavior. The goblins could figure out how to make tools and build stuff on their own now, or they could ask Gob. It wasn’t his job to help others; he was leader.

There were also more important things that Blacknail had to concentrate on, like eating, and preparing for the hobgoblins’ awakening. Someone had to focus on the big picture, someone intelligent and resourceful. Hobgoblins were dangerous and Blacknail wasn’t going to let them wander off or sleep unattended. Under his orders, the two sleeping goblins were moved into secure cages made from lashed together stakes. The cages would remain sealed until Blacknail could appraise the new hobgoblins and make sure they could be trained to obey orders. He had no use for them if they were unruly.

Hobgoblins made Blacknail uneasy. They were untrustworthy, and Blacknail was an expert on the subject because he was one. He knew exactly how twisted and dark their minds were. Gob wasn’t so bad and he had proven his loyalty, but Blacknail’s gut told him that Gob was a weirdo and that other hobgoblins would be much more difficult to deal with. As a young goblin, Gob must have fallen and hit his head against a rock or something.

Two days passed while Scamp and Imp slept and changed, and the goblin lair continued to develop. As more and more hides were tanned, the previously naked goblins began to wear fur and hide clothes which they decorated with feathers and trinkets. They also began carrying more stone tools such as spears and axes. Most significantly of all, Gob completed his longhouse. Dozens of goblins now slept inside the long dark building. It was far more comfortable than a cave and all the body heat warmed it at night. It didn’t smell great, though.

Ferrar had become obsessed with making clay bowls. He had a group of overseers forcing goblins to constantly bring him materials and refine it for him, and that suited Blacknail just fine. The goblin himself spent all day building and experimenting with different types of firing pits and shapes of bowls. His eyebrows grew singed from constantly standing next to the flames, but his efforts weren’t wasted. Dozens of crude clay bowls were now stacked up in the larder, where they wouldn’t be stolen or broken by curious goblins. There were even a few large pots meant for cooking. Blacknail wasn’t sure whose idea those had been, but it had been a good one. He would have to take credit for it.

The sun was just reaching its noonday peak on the third day, as Blacknail was sitting down by the cooking fire to make himself some lunch. Most of the camp ran fine without him now anyway. He was just about to start cooking the mix of meat and veggies he had cut up, when Elyias ran up next to him.

“Scamp is awake,” the man explained breathlessly.

Blacknail eyed his uncooked meal carefully for a few seconds before responding. It was tempting to let Scamp wait, but he decided he didn’t want to deal with this situation on a full stomach. That could get unpleasant.

“Fine, let’s go,” Blacknail muttered as he put his frying pan down on a rock. It was unlikely any goblin would be brave or suicidal enough to steal it.
The pair quickly walked over to the cages, which were right beside each other. Inside the one on the left there was movement. A tall shape slowly withdrew from the bars, as if it was trying to pretend hadn’t just been chewing on them. Blacknail wasn’t fooled, though. He was very observant and there were teeth marks clearly visible on the bars.

“Go get Gob,” Blacknail told Elyias.

Without another word, the human went off to do as he had been told. Blacknail focused on the cage’s occupant. The new hobgoblin inside was thin and gangly. His ribs were exposed by his thin flesh that lacked any sort of fat. Although, Blacknail could still recognize him, Scamp’s face had changed a lot. It had grown longer and less chubby looking. However, Scamp still had soft round eyes that made him seem almost friendly instead of vicious. It made Blacknail want to punch his dumb face.

Also, Scamp had always had a bit of messy black hair on his head, but now it looked like both the length of his hair and the area covered by it had grown out quite a bit over the past few days. The result was a mess of hair with patches of different lengths. Blacknail was glad he was naturally bald. Having hair seemed like a pointless inconvenience.

Pulling out his knife, Blacknail cut the cord holding one of the cage’s vertical bars in place. It fell away and opened up a space wide enough for a hobgoblin to step through. Blacknail took a step back out of the way, so Scamp cautiously stepped out of the cage.

The two hobgoblins faced each other. Blacknail kept his face neutral, but Scamp was clearly dealing with a confusing mix of emotions. He fidgeted and had difficulty meeting Blacknail’s eyes, like he was uncomfortable in his own skin. Neither of them said anything for a few moments, until Scamp broke the silence.
“Hey there, Blacknail. How’s it going?” he asked as he shifted his weight awkwardly.

That was when Blacknail punched him right in the face. Scamp squeaked as his nose was flattened against his face, and he fell over backward. The blow had taken him completely by surprise.

“That’s not what you should call me,” Blacknail hissed as he leaned over to stare menacingly into Scamp’s eyes. There hadn’t been nearly enough fear there before, but that could be fixed easily enough by gratuitous violence.

“Sorry, boss!” Scamp whined as he cowered on the ground in front of Blacknail.

“Who is your boss?”

“You are!”

“Are you going to do everything I tell you? And obey my every order?”

“Yes, boss!”

“Good!” Blacknail growled as he lunged forward, grabbed Scamp by the throat, and pinned him against the ground.

“If you don’t then I will rip your neck open!” Blacknail growled as he squeezed. “Remember this, you puny wimp. If you try and run away I will hunt you like prey and gut you while you scream. Fleeing through the forest won’t save you from me.”

Blacknail wasn’t messing around and his tone of voice made that clear. He sounded more like an enraged beast than a thinking being. Hobgoblin minions were an important part of Blacknail’s plan, but that didn’t mean he had to like them. If there were going to be other hobgoblins around then they were going to have two choices: submit completely or be torn apart. Blacknail wasn’t going to take as much as a single insubordinate look from another hobgoblin. He was the leader and it was going to stay that way. Challengers would be put down.

“Up, stand up,” Blacknail ordered Scamp after letting him go and stepping back.

The new hobgoblin rushed to obey and hurriedly climbed to his feet. Even standing, Scamp kept cowering in fear. Before Blacknail could give him another command someone else spoke up.

“Can you let me out too, great leader?” a familiar yet odd voice asked.

A twinge of irritation went through Blacknail. He turned towards the source of the voice and saw a figure stand up in the other cell. It was Imp. He was awake, and he had changed a lot. The goblin’s form had been stretched out into that of a hobgoblin. His long nose was pointier than Scamp’s but it was his eyes that stood out the most. They were narrower with red irises that shone with intelligence. He looked very different from Scamp.

“I promise to obey,” Imp remarked as he waited by the bars. He seemed perfectly respectful and in control of himself.

Blacknail considered his options. He didn’t feel like letting Imp out, but it was actually convenient for him to deal with both the hobgoblins at the same time. Blacknail got his knife out and opened up the cage. When Imp stepped out, Blacknail punched him in the face. There was a loud crack.

“Ow, why did you do that?” Imp asked as he held his bleeding nose. He had fallen onto his ass from the impact.

“Because I could. Now get up,” Blacknail hissed in answer. He hadn’t believed Imp was actually planning on being obedient for even a second. Even as a goblin he had been creepily good at hiding his thoughts, so Blacknail was just going to assume he was untrustworthy and keep hitting him.

Imp climbed to his feet and walked up next to Scamp. There was now a rebellious spark in his eyes that hadn’t been there before, and that cheered Blacknail up greatly. Now he could look forward to beating it out of him. Both Scamp and Imp glared at Blacknail as Gob and Elyias arrived.

Like Blacknail, Gob was taller and more heavily built than Scamp and Imp. However, both the newly transformed hobgoblins would quickly put on weight and grow a bit once they started eating.

“Our numbers grow,” Gob exclaimed happily. He eyed both the new hobgoblins with a mix of excitement and suspicion.

“Don’t kill either of them without permission,” Blacknail replied absently. That would be inconvenient.

“Yes, boss,” Gob said as he sheathed the dagger he had just drawn a second ago.

“You can hit them a lot, though. Discipline must be beaten into them,” Blacknail added.

He remembered how he had felt after becoming a hobgoblin. His paranoia and blood thirst had been difficult to suppress. He never would have managed it without his lost master. Even now, Blacknail could sense resentment and rebelliousness from Imp and Scamp.

“Both of you must do as Gob says. His words are mine,” Blacknail told Scamp and Imp. He glared at them until they reluctantly nodded back.
“I shall teach them proper respect, mighty leader,” Gob responded eagerly. “They won’t dare question you.”

“That’s all I ask,” Blacknail said as he nodded happily. Gob really understood him.

Just then, Scamp’s stomach grumbled loudly. Blacknail turned and gave the hobgoblin an appraising look. He should probably let the new hobgoblins eat something now. They looked really hungry, and they hadn’t eaten in days.

“You have my permission to go get some food. When you are done you will be given chores. If you try and run away I will hunt you down and carve out your hearts,” Blacknail told the two hobgoblins. It was important they knew the consequences of misbehavior.

“What if we both run in opposite directions?” Scamp asked.

Blacknail scowled at him and considered the question. Imp took a step away from Scamp.

“Why are you asking?” Blacknail inquired. He was surprised by the question. It was a stupid thing to ask, even for Scamp.

“I’m just curious.”

“If you both run then I will send Gob after one of you,” Blacknail answered.

Scamp glanced at Gob out of the corner of his eyes, as if he was weighing his chances. Gob sighed, stepped forward, and punched Scamp in the gut. The new hobgoblin gasped and fell to his knees. Blacknail watched and nodded approvingly. This was a successful learning moment.

“You are weak and I am strong. Do as our great master commands or suffer and die,” Gob hissed as he glared down at Scamp.

“Alright, fine. I will do everything you say.” Scamp replied after a few moments of painful sounding wheezing.

“Yes, me too. I live to obey,” Imp quickly added as Gob turned his way.

It seemed like they were under control for now, so Blacknail dismissed them. Imp and Scamp quickly retreated towards the larder.

“That went well,” Blacknail told Gob. The other mature hobgoblin nodded in agreement, not because he agreed, but so he didn’t get punched in the face by his chieftain.

Yep, everything looked in order. Now Blacknail just had to wait for Scamp and Imp’s inevitable attempt to kill him. There was no way both of them wouldn’t try it at least once. Scamp’s attempt would probably be pathetic and easily thwarted, but it was a good thing Blacknail had confiscated Imp’s bag. Magic explosive rocks would really have messed up Blacknail’s plan to survive with all his limbs intact. Killing Werrick would be difficult with only one leg.

Gob and Blacknail took a few minutes to discuss their plans as they waited for the new hobgoblins to finish eating. They could see the larder entrance from where they were standing and Blacknail kept an eye on it in case one of the hobgoblins tried to slip away. You couldn’t be too careful around the untrustworthy freaks.

Saeter had beaten discipline into Blacknail by teaching him swordsmanship. Only when it became very clear to Blacknail that his attempts to fight back were utterly futile and that his rage was weakening him had Blacknail began to learn to control himself. There was no reason to change a system that worked.

Blacknail was planning on personally training the other hobgoblins the same way. In preparation, he had already gone back to Shelter and acquired some wooden training blades. He had also taken the time to teach Gob the basics of sword fighting so that he had a head start on the other hobgoblins.

Imp and Scamp walked back out of the larder cave with a pile of food. They didn’t bother cooking any of it but instead immediately sat down and began eating. They shoved smoked meat and roots in their mouth as they sat on a pair of large grey rocks. When they were done Blacknail walked over. It was time to get them to work. They had to get used to following his orders.

Scamp was sent to help Gob build tools. Blacknail decided to oversee Imp himself. Imp was definitely the more dangerous of the two and Blacknail wanted to keep an eye on him. He led the hobgoblin over to where a mob of goblins was working on firing some clay. Ferrar was there leading the effort with the special enthusiasm he always showed when things near him were on fire. The goblin gibbered and pranced around the flames with his arms above his head.

The goblins stirred uneasily as Imp approached them. They threw careful glances between him and Blacknail. Some of the goblins seemed to expect a fight to break out at any second, and they weren’t wrong in thinking that. However, Ferrar immediately left the firing pits and approached the hobgoblins.

“Show Imp how to make pots,” Blacknail told the goblin. He was too lazy to do it himself.

Ferrar nodded at Blacknail and then exchanged a few squeaks and grunts with Imp. The goblin then led the hobgoblin over to the big flat rock where the clay was being strained. Imp followed him and studied everything with obvious interest. The pair quickly got to work.

That was exactly what Blacknail had wanted them to do, but he was still very annoyed. What kind of hobgoblin meekly took orders from a mere goblin! Why wasn’t Imp being more aggressive? This was no fun. He had been expecting to have to scream at Imp repeatedly to get anything done, but it was looking like he wasn’t going to have to do anything. With a sigh, Blacknail walked over to a nearby rock and laid down on top of it. At least it was a nice sunny day and the light was warm on his skin.

With Ferrar’s help, Imp began building a series of large pots. He seemed rather excited about it actually. From atop the rock he was resting on, Blacknail occasionally yelled things at them, but his heart wasn’t in it.

Eventually, it began to get dark and Blacknail got bored. It didn’t seem like the hobgoblin was going to misbehave so Blacknail had something much more important that he needed to do. He was going to throw a feast and finally cook up some stew. It would be a huge event in celebration of the two hobgoblins waking up, but mostly it would be about how amazing Blacknail was. They also finally had enough bowls to serve most of the goblins. Blacknail couldn’t wait. He was going to make the best stew ever, and everyone would know how great he was at everything. He had been the one to teach the tribe to hunt, fire clay, and to cook. He was also a really nice person.

The food for the feast had already been gathered by the goblins and was sitting in the larder. Blacknail sent out minions to gather the ingredients he needed and to drag the big iron pot over. It had gone unused until now. Once the pot was propped up above the fire, Blacknail threw the ingredients in and started the fire below it.

Soon, the stew was bubbling away and steam was rising up into the air. The smell attracted curious goblins who wandered over to see what was going on. Blacknail smiled to himself. His creation was almost done. Now, he just had to start handing out the bowls and then he would finally get to show everyone how great his stew was. Everything he cooked was tasty, especially his stew, and this batch in particular was turning out great. It had a nice spicy taste, which was probably from the purple leaves he had thrown in. He had never seen leaves like that before, but they had certainly looked tasty.

Suddenly, an eerie howl echoed out across the hills. It had come from out in the forest. Blacknail kept on stirring. It was probably nothing. Another louder howl rose up into the air. The goblins near Blacknail began to look nervous and started mumbling among themselves. Blacknail thought they were being jumpy cowards. It was probably nothing.

A terrified shriek suddenly erupted from somewhere near the edge of the hills. It was quickly followed by dozens of shrill goblin screams and beastly growls. That was probably something. Blacknail looked up and scanned the hills. It sounded like a mob of panicked goblins was headed his way, and judging from the growling, something hungry was chasing them.

Blacknail let out a deep breath. Of course, this was going to happen now, just as he was finishing up his cooking.










IEO 2











Blacknail stepped away from the pot of stew he had been cooking and drew his sword. The late afternoon sky overhead was dark and cloudy. The wind was still and quiet, but that only created an expectant atmosphere that filled Blacknail with unease and amplified the other noises. It sounded like the goblins’ base was under attack. Blacknail could hear howling and screams, and neither of those sounds usually meant anything good. Feeling concerned, Blacknail peered over the heads of the nearby mob of goblins, towards the rocky hills beyond them. It was good thing they were so short.

Across the clearing, three goblins ran out from behind a hill as if something dreadful was chasing them, because something was. There was a vicious snarl and a grey blur burst into sight. It tackled one of the goblins to the ground. The green critter screamed in pain and struggled to escape its attacker. Long jaws descended and there was a crunching noise as it bit down. The goblin was being mauled by a large grey wolf. It looked like it hurt.

One wolf wasn’t much of a threat to Blacknail, but there were probably more around. Wolves were cowards like that. Blacknail felt fury start to bubble up from within him. How dare this animal enter his territory with such impunity. It was an insult! Blacknail snarled and lunged forward toward the wolf. He was going to cut the mangy beast to pieces and eat it! He didn’t care how bad it tasted.

The nearby goblins reacted at the same time as their leader, and immediately fled in the opposite direction. Blacknail hadn’t been expecting anything else from them, but it still annoyed him. The cowardly creatures outnumbered the wolf ten to one. This was why you had to beat your goblins regularly.

The wolf looked up from its prey and noticed the charging hobgoblin. It studied him for a quick second, and then without a word, it bounded away back behind the hill. Blacknail hissed in frustration as he slowed down. The overgrown doggy was running!

Just as Blacknail came to a stop, he heard another growl from behind him. The hobgoblin glanced over his shoulder in time to see two new wolves dash in and pick off one of the fleeing goblins behind him. The nearby goblins shrieked in terror, and then one of them veered off to the side and ran straight into the firepit. There was a crash as the goblin smacked into the pot and sent it crashing over. The goblin rolled through the fire pit, scattering sparks and embers, and then jumped up and continued running.

“No, my stew!” Blacknail wailed in horror. As he watched, the food splashed out of the pot and spilled out across the ground. That was way more dirt than the recipe called for! His stew was ruined. He had put so much effort into making it… This wasn’t fair!

Blacknail stood there frozen, as the wolves that had pounced on the goblin turned and began to run off with their prize. Blacknail shook himself to clear his mind. Now wasn’t the time to focus on spilled stew. There were important things to do. The wolves were killing his minions, and he wasn’t going to let that happen. If he didn’t get any food then no one was!

Infuriatingly, the wolves were too far away for Blacknail to catch. They were fast bastards, and it was like they were working together to keep him off balance. Well, that wasn’t going to work. Blacknail was a genius and thus much smarter than them.

There was more than one way to hunt. Blacknail didn’t need to catch the wolves. He hurriedly sheathed his sword and drew his sling instead. A moment later, he sent a rock through the air towards the closest wolf. It yelped in pain when the rock hit its leg, and then it crumpled and rolled across the ground before coming to a stop. Blacknail was already running towards it. Its companion saw him coming and took off with the goblin’s corpse, but the wounded wolf wasn’t so lucky. Before it could get up, Blacknail dove on top of the wolf and grabbed its furry neck.

“Got you!” Blacknail yelled victoriously. His bloodthirst was in full swing now.

The hobgoblin pulled out a dagger with his other hand, as the beast struggled to escape. It rolled onto its back and raked the hobgoblin’s arm with its rear claws, but the pain just enraged Blacknail. His fury muted the feeling into irrelevance.

The wolf snapped at Blacknail and hot spittle splashed across his face, but the hobgoblin kept his grip on the beast’s neck and held it away. Blacknail snarled as he stabbed the wolf in the chest over and over again. A few seconds later, it went limp as blood began to pour out of its wounds. The hobgoblin relaxed but kept his grip on the beast as he stood up and looked around. He could still hear goblins screaming in panic but there were only a few stragglers left nearby. The others had fled towards safety, but that wasn’t the important thing. There were still more wolves that needed killing.

There were too many piles of rocks blocking his view, so Blacknail decided to get a better vantage point. He needed to know what was going on. He ran over to the nearest hill and began to climb. After scrambling hallway up the rocky incline, Blacknail stopped and looked around. Below him, mobs of goblins were still rampaging around aimlessly. The occasional wolf could also be seen darting around.

Off to one side, Gob was standing his ground outside the longhouse. A small formation of goblin overseers had formed up around him. Blacknail decided to head over there as well, but before he could, he heard something that caused him to jerk in surprise. A deep haunting howl washed over him. It was coming from his left and sounded far too close for comfort.

Alarmed, Blacknail quickly glanced to his left, and he saw a wolf jump up onto the top of another hill. The beast was huge and stood out from the others. Its furry grey body dwarfed that of the other wolves Blacknail had seen, but the most startling thing about it was the series of dark blue spikes that ran down its back. It was a mutant.

The vicious looking creature stared directly at Blacknail, and the hobgoblin met its eyes. For a few seconds neither of them moved. They just glared at each other. Blacknail didn’t like this new development. He hated mutants. They were trouble. There had been this one giant snake…

The wolf that had run away from Blacknail appeared behind the alpha and took up position beside it. It was still holding the dead goblin in its jaws in a way that was very suggestive. The bloody thing looked smug, and it seemed to smile as it turned to stare at Blacknail.

Well, two could play that game. The hobgoblin grinned as he lifted up the wolf he had killed. This seemed to anger the alpha wolf because it immediately growled. Blacknail growled back, but then realized he was at a disadvantage here. He was outnumbered and he didn’t really want to fight a mutant. They could be very tough.

Fighting would be a bad idea, but he wasn’t going to back down either. This was his territory and no giant wolf monster was going to show up and scare him. That would make Blacknail look bad in front of all his minions.

The hobgoblin and the beast continued to stare at each other hatefully from their respective hills. Blacknail couldn’t help but notice how massive the mutant was, and he began to feel his rage fall away. Self preservation was important after all. A lot of people depended on him.

The beast looked like it weighed well over twice his weight, and like most mutants it probably had some sort of magical power. Attacking the wolf would undoubtedly be ill-advised, but showing weakness might also invite an attack. This was a problem… Maybe if he glared at it hard enough it would go away. He couldn’t think of any better options so that was what he did. Blacknail made his best scary face and took a confident pose. He continued to hold the dead wolf up, even if his arm was starting to hurt. The mangy carcass was heavy.

The mutant wolf snarled and glared, but Blacknail didn’t back down at all, not that he had much choice. It would be strategically unwise to move too much.

Suddenly, there was a chorus of shouts from behind Blacknail and the stomping sound of a lot of small feet. Gob’s voice was recognizable among the others. The wolf alpha looked away from Blacknail and towards the noise, so the hobgoblin snuck a quick glance over his shoulder. What he saw cheered him up considerably. It looked like Gob had managed convince a small swarm of goblins to charge towards Blacknail’s location. Gob and several overseers were at the back of the mob, where they could drive the others forward. Blacknail was going to have to reward Gob somehow. He was a great minion.

The wolf threw a look back at Blacknail and snarled viciously, but it didn’t attack. Instead, it raised its head and let out another echoing howl. Right away, the scattered wolves began to turn away from the camp and run towards the forest. Their grey forms zoomed through the rocks and out of sight. The alpha wolf then jumped down the hill and darted off towards the forest. Its companion followed it.

“Ha, you’re not tough. Fear me!” Blacknail shouted after it as he dropped the wolf carcass. His arm muscles really hurt now.

“I’m here to help, supreme one! Let us drive the enemy away!” Gob said as his mob met up with their chief. The collected goblins looked nervous but they were all armed, so they probably felt safer together and wouldn’t flee.

“I already did that,” Blacknail replied proudly. “I just scared the enemy leader with my greatness, so they all ran. It was a huge and very dangerous mutant.”

“You are truly a mighty warrior,” Gob remarked in awe.

“I am,” Blacknail agreed as he nodded smugly to himself. He had sure shown that furry freak who the boss was. He was!

“The beast still lives, though. Should we chase it? It killed some of our tribe. Blood must pay for blood.”

A mental image of him trying to lead a mob of goblins through the forest after the wolf popped into Blacknail’s head. It didn’t seem like it would work very well, because they were so stupid and cowardly. The goblins would lose their confidence and desert in short order. That would leave Blacknail alone in the woods with the angry wolf pack, which didn't sound fun.

“No, I have a better plan. We will have another chance to kill the foul beasts,” Blacknail quickly replied.

He actually had several different schemes that could work. His first plan involved hoping the wolves went away and never came back. This was the optimal outcome. His second plan involved waiting, building up his forces, and hoping the wolves didn’t kill anyone important until he was ready for them. A dozen hobgoblins should even the odds enough. His third plan was to dig a big hole and hope they all fell in it. It wasn’t a very good plan.

“We need to build a wall,” Blacknail mused aloud.

He had a new appreciation for all the walls he had seen around human settlements. They had always seemed so useless to him, because they had been so easy for him to get through, but now he realized that keeping out amazing sneaks like him wasn’t their purpose. They were meant to keep less awesome things like giant wolves or other predators out. Really, there was nothing that would keep Blacknail out of somewhere he wanted to go, anyway. He was too amazing.

Yes, a wall was what he needed. Blacknail had thought that gathering a large tribe of goblins together would scare away most predators, or at least prevent them from coming right into camp where the important people were, but obviously that wasn’t the case. More goblins just meant more food to some beasts.

“What the bloody hells is going on?” Khita yelled as she ran up to Blacknail. The young redhead had her sword out and looked excited as she glanced in every direction.

“That mutant wolf I warned you about was real, and it attacked,” Blacknail told her. He was always right and she was always wrong.
“Really? Is it still here? Will it come back?” she asked him as she stared at the edge of the forest.

“No, it’s gone. I scared it away and it won’t dare come back. Now it knows that only death waits for it here.”

“Blast, I wanted to see it, and to get a chance to take it down,” Khita said as she sheathed her sword and sighed. She sounded really disappointed, and Blacknail rolled his eyes. If Khita had come face to the face with the wolf she would have been petrified from fear. She wasn’t brave like him.
“Where is Elyias?” Blacknail asked her.

“Cowering at the back of a cave with Scamp,” she answered dismissively.

“Ah, good.” Blacknail had been slightly concerned. He hadn’t seen them around, and losing them would be inconvenient. He still had a use for them.

Blacknail and Gob spent the next hour calming down the camp. The wolves had picked off a few goblins but they didn’t seem to have done any structural damage. Once everything was back under control, Blacknail put a few goblins on lookout. If the wolves returned and tore them apart their dying screams would give him a chance to prepare.

As he was working, Blacknail’s stomach suddenly rumbled. He had completely forgotten that he hadn’t eaten. The attacking wolves had rudely interrupted his cooking. Blacknail quickly headed back the firepit to see if there was anything left. He approached the toppled iron pot, knelt down, and peered within it. It was completely empty.

“You filth! I will find you!” Blacknail roared as he stood back up. He shook from rage as he glared in every direction for any sign of a convenient target.

It was obvious that some goblins had even taken advantage of the chaos and cleaned out the inside of the pot while he had been bravely facing down the alpha. What a bunch of thieving scum! Why did Blacknail even bother defending them! If they weren’t so easy to turn into menial laborers then he would have already left them all to die.

Grumbling to himself, Blacknail went to get some food from the larder. It wasn’t very satisfying and only reminded him of the hot meal that had been stolen from him. Goblins were scum. After finishing his food, Blacknail headed off to bed. He didn’t feel like staying up or doing anything useful. No one here appreciated the things he did for them.

The next morning Blacknail felt better. He immediately tossed Khita out of her bed and went to work. Or at least he went out and started to get other people working. He was the leader.

The first thing that needed done was to construct a wall. It was far too easy for dangerous forest creatures to get into the base and start munching down on goblins. The forests of the North contained an endless supply of slavering beasts, and Blackail was using these goblins. Every barrier between his cave and an attacker was also appreciated. You could never be too careful.

“The wall will be made of pointy sticks. It needs to go around the entire base and be too high to jump,” Blacknail explained to Gob.

He had just finished showing the other hobgoblin how he wanted the wall built. As Gob watched he had chopped down a several thin trees and stuck them in the ground. They were also tied together and supported by another piece of timber that was jammed in behind them on an angle. It was a crude copy of a design he had seen Herad use before.

“As you wish, I will make sure this wall encircles all the base, great master,” Gob said. The hobgoblin nodded along seriously and looked eager to get going.
Something about that reply bothered Blacknail. He took a second to think it through before replying. “Leave a gap for an entrance.”

Sometimes Gob took him too literally. There had been an incident a few days ago after Blacknail had asked someone to knock some sense into Elyias.

“Make that two entrances; I want one at the back as well. It’s too far to walk,” Blacknail added thoughtfully. “Round up all the overseers – and make some more - and get them to force every goblin they find that isn’t already working to start cutting down trees.”

As Gob started to get down to work, Blacknail went to track down the other two new hobgoblins. He felt like getting some early morning exercise, it was past time to start training them, and he felt like beating someone up. It sure was convenient that he could do all three at the same time. Maybe Scamp or Imp would even try to kill him! That would really amuse Blacknail. He couldn’t wait.








IEO 3











Imp was easy enough to find. The newly transformed hobgoblin was hanging out near the clay pits. He always seemed to be there, working on something that Blacknail didn’t understand. It was almost like he enjoyed it, which was unsettling. Why would he enjoy working? It was weird behavior for a hobgoblin. Even Gob spent most his time bossing goblins around instead of doing chores himself. Blacknail had considered making Imp work somewhere else, but he was too productive to waste. With Imp there, the clay pits were producing over twice as much as before.

On the other hand, Scamp was much more difficult to track down. Blacknail had to look around the base for a while before he found him. He wasn’t in the longhouse or the larder. Eventually, he located Scamp napping over by some rocks on the far side of the camp.

After a swift kick to the ribs, the sleeping hobgoblin yelped and jumped to his feet. When he calmed down and recognized Blacknail, Scamp smiled nervously and greeted his chieftain. Blacknail just snorted and told him to follow. He led Scamp over towards the center of the base, where Imp was waiting. Khita and Elyias were also lounging nearby and sitting in the shade at the base of a hill. Both of them had their swords at their hips, but they only looked up as the new arrivals approached and didn’t move.

“Well, this ought to be an amusing show. It’s usually very boring around here.” Elyias remarked as he grinned nastily at the hobgoblins.

“Now I will teach you how to use a blade,” Blacknail told the other two hobgoblins as he tossed them wooden practice blades. He picked up one for himself and took up position in front of his minions.

Imp didn’t look that impressed. He studied the sword for a second and then looked back towards where he had been working. Scamp smiled excitedly and waved his new weapon around a few times experimentally.

“I always wanted to get a shiny sword. When I learn this, will I get one?” Scamp asked. He looked hopeful, which amused Blacknail.

“Yes, when your training is done,” Blacknail told him. He had a small stash of extra blades he had taken from people who were incapable of using them anymore.

“Now, stand like this and hold the blade up,” Blacknail ordered Scamp and Imp as he showed them the proper stance and technique.

Both of the hobgoblins studied him and shifted their stances, but neither of them copied it correctly. They both looked off balance and open to attack. Blacknail showed them a few different techniques and watched them try them. Imp seemed to just be going through the motions without any real interest, and Scamp was goofing around instead of learning properly.

That was alright. Blacknail had a plan for motivating them. He ordered Scamp forward and told him to take up a defensive stance. Scamp obeyed and sloppily raised his blade up. A moment later, it was bashed aside and Blacknail’s wooden sword smashed into his shoulder.

“Ugh, that hurt!” Scamp yelped as he was knocked over sideways.

"Too slow,” Blacknail hissed coldly. “It was also weak. Are you a real hob or an overgrown goblin?”

“I’m a hobgoblin!” Scamp whined as he got back up. He was wincing from the pain and rubbing his shoulder.

“Then act like it, you runt. Step back and let Imp come over here.”

Both the hobgoblins quickly obeyed. Imp didn’t look very excited about taking his turn. He wasn’t stupid, so he’d already figured out what was coming next.

“Take a defensive stance,” Blacknail told him.

“Can you just show me how to do it?” Imp asked hopefully. “I don’t think I know the right way, but I’m sure a great teacher like you could show me.”

There was a nervous smile on his face as he met his instructor’s gaze. Blacknail grinned back, but it wasn’t a pleasant expression.
“Nope,” he laughed as he swung his blade. The weapon hit Imp in the stomach. He crumpled and fell to his knees.

“Ow,” Imp groaned.

“Pay attention next time, you arrogant runt. You aren’t smarter than anyone else. You’re just an arrogant prick of a hobgoblin,” Blacknail told him. His voice and expression were both harsh and unyielding.

That was how the rest of the training went. Blacknail would explain a technique to them, they would try to copy him, and then they would be tested.

Failure always resulted in pain, and neither of the hobgoblins ever passed a single one of Blacknail’s tests. His blade slipped through their defenses or pushed their own weapon aside every time.

Going on easy on them would defy the entire point of the exercise. It also wouldn’t be any fun. Blacknail was having a great time!

“Why are Khita and Elyias here?” Scamp asked as he stepped forward again. He was obviously trying to distract Blacknail and buy himself a few minutes of rest.

“To watch and prevent you from doing something stupid,” Blacknail replied as he glanced at Imp. “They are also here to remind you of all the people who could stab you to death, because you suck.”

The other hobgoblin glared back. He was seething with rage and red in the face. Clearly, the training was working. Blacknail was a great teacher!

“I can take over the training if you want, Scamp. I think I’d like a chance to knock a hobgoblin around, and I think Blacknail is going a little easy on you,” Khita said from over where she was sitting.

Scamp paused and looked uncertain. He clearly hadn’t expected Khita to say such a thing. However, before he could make up his mind, Blacknail spoke up.

“Not today, but maybe another time. I got this,” he said as he motioned Scamp forward again.

They continued to train for half an hour until Blacknail eventually stopped and addressed his tired out minions. “Alright, that’s enough for today.”

“Really?” Scamp asked hesitantly. He was favoring one leg and he had developed a few purple bruises. Imp was in a similar sorry state.

“Yes, unless either of you want a chance to hit me back.”

“What do you mean?” Imp asked. The hobgoblin sounded intrigued but also cautious. He suspected a trap. It had been that kind of day.
“We could spar,” Blacknail told him.

Imp’s beady red eyes stared intently at Blacknail for several long seconds. His hands were gripping the wooden practice blade so tightly they almost seemed to be shaking. He looked really tempted to give into his rage and take up the offer. Scamp quickly shook his head to signal he wasn’t interested. He was a coward, so that wasn’t surprising.

“No, I would never want to hurt you, wise leader,” Imp eventually hissed in reply. He didn’t sound like he really meant it.

“Too bad, because now your wise leader feels like sparring with you. We will keep going until I say so or you hit me. Maybe you will learn some of my wisdom,” Blacknail replied smugly as he grinned from ear to ear.

There was a hateful hiss from Imp as he raised his blade up in front of his face. It was an aggressive stance, but instead of charging, Imp cautiously inched forward.

Blacknail didn’t feel like waiting for him. He lunged, battered Imp’s sword aside, and then smashed his sword into the other hobgoblin’s ribs. Imp flinched but gritted his teeth and tried to strike back. However he aimed too high and Blacknail easily ducked under his slash.

Over the next few minutes, Blacknail demolished Imp. The newly transformed hobgoblin quickly descended into a blind rage and began swinging wildly.
“Hold still!” he screeched as Blacknail stepped back away from one of his attacks.

Imp continued to attack over and over again, but none of his attacks hit. Blacknail dodged and parried them all, while occasionally slipping in his own attacks. Imp’s complete loss of self control was deeply satisfying. Blacknail couldn’t stop himself from grinning widely in delight. Imp had been far too self-controlled as a goblin, so Blacknail had always wanted to beat the smugness out of him. He wasn’t so smart now was he!

Eventually, Imp screamed hatefully at the top of his lungs, dove forward, and was promptly smacked down. The flat of Blacknail’s blade crashed into the top of his head and knocked him down into the dirt. He coughed and didn’t get back up. Instead, Imp just lay there on the ground.

“Do you give up?” Blacknail asked the prone hobgoblin. Instead of replying, Imp let out a defeated groan that Blacknail assumed meant yes.

“Remember this lesson, weakling. Strength comes from obedience; not from rage,” Blacknail told Imp as he leaned down over him. “Defy me and you will stay weak and pathetic, and weakness leads to pain.”

It was important that Blacknail’s new hobgoblin minions not only learned to fight but also to fear him. Unquestioning obedience born from hopelessness was required. Blacknail couldn’t have disobedient hobgoblins running around. That would be too dangerous.

“Tomorrow will be your turn to spar,” Blacknail told Scamp as he turned and gave him a meaningful look. Scamp gulped in fear and Elyias laughed.
“That sure was interesting,” the young man remarked as he got up and walked over to Scamp. “I always wondered how Saeter trained you, so that you wouldn’t kill him in his sleep or anything.”

“I was a better learner than these two,” Blacknail told him. Memories of hanging from a tree and being beaten up by Saeter rose up in his mind, but he suppressed them.

“Come on, you look like shit. Let’s get you something to eat,” Elyias told Scamp as the pair walked away.

Khita followed Blacknail back over to where the wall was under construction. They left Imp alone on the ground.

The training continued over the next two days. For a few hours every afternoon, Blacknail taught Scamp and Imp how to use a sword and how to control their emotions. They weren’t very good at either yet, but Blacknail was having fun, so he wasn’t in too much of a hurry.

Over and over again, he showed them the basics of sword fighting and hit them when they failed to impress him. The objective was not only to motivate them to succeed but also to enrage them. During the sparring, when they lost control and tried to hit him, Blacknail simply countered using his vastly superior skills and then humiliated them. The point was to condition them to not give into their anger. The hobgoblins' violent instincts had to be suppressed, and Blacknail wanted them to know he was in charge. He was the leader, and he didn’t plan on stepping down or letting himself get killed.

He also took an hour every day to teach Gob, who he didn’t beat black and purple. However, Gob spent most of his time overseeing the construction of the wall around the base. The goblins needed to be watched at all times or they would slack off. Blacknail was fairly sure that most of them were only pretending to work anyway, but there wasn’t much he could do about it.

Still, the wall was starting to take form. Its rickety wooden length looked like garbage, but it would do its job and keep out most the nasty wildlife. Gangs of goblins led by overseers were constantly dragging timber out of the forest. Even goblins with stone axes could cut down slender young trees fairly easily, and there were a lot of goblins around. It was a good thing the larder was full of food because everyone was too busy to hunt or forage.

On the third morning, Blacknail decided to head back to the human village. He had grown bored of hanging around the goblin lair and wanted to talk to some other people. He was also out of cheese. Going without cheese for a few days was unthinkable.

“We need some supplies, so I’m going to lead a mission back to Shelter. It will be dangerous but I can handle it, no problem,” Blacknail told Gob as he smiled confidently.

“Thank you, most powerful of chiefs. Surely, only you could do this,” Gob replied as he gave a little bow.

“Pretty much,” Blacknail agreed as he nodded along happily in agreement. Gob sure said it like it was.

“I want to come,” Ferrar said as he scampered up to Blacknail’s side. The hobgoblin chief looked down at him and frowned thoughtfully.

“Why? All the things you want to burn are here. You’re not allowed to burn things there.”

“I need to learn something from humans,” Ferrar explained. “Humans know a lot about fire and clay that Imp and I want to know too.”

The idea didn’t immediately appeal to Blacknail. The creepy little goblin wanted to go and talk to some humans? That didn’t sound like a good idea. They’d probably kill him and then hunt down every other goblin they could find. Blacknail could barely resist the urge to do that himself.

“It will allow us to cook new tastier foods,” Ferrar added as he noticed his chieftain’s reluctance.

“Alright, let’s go!” Blacknail replied excitedly. He had grown tired of the simple fare available at the goblin camp. Good food made everything better!

“The goblin’s coming with us now?” Khita asked from where she was standing nearby. Half a dozen goblins were beside her. They had been chosen to join the mission.

“Yes, he has a very important task,” Blacknail told her.

“I wish I could go back to Shelter. It’s a pile of dung full of peasants, but I’m really getting sick of staying out here in the forest. The gods know I would do anything to get back to civilization,” Elyias whined.

The young man was also nearby, although he wasn’t joining the mission. He simply had nowhere better to be. Lately, he had been working under Gob a lot and helping out with the wall. Blacknail wasn’t sure if it was by choice or if Gob had conscripted him, and he didn’t really care.

“I told them you stole their coins and deserted so you can’t go back, but you can be the second in command while we’re gone. That’s a promotion for working so hard lately!” Blacknail told him.

“Oh, good,” Elyias replied as he scowled. He didn’t seem all happy about the wonderful promotion he’d just been given. Blacknail decided not to take that as an insult. Elyias had always been a miserable person. That was why annoying him was so fun.

“Just watch for Scamp and Imp while I’m gone,” Blacknail warned him. “They might go insane and start killing people at any time. If that happens you need to help Gob fight them off.”

“What? Is that a real possibility? You must be joking,” Elyias asked in alarm. He looked concerned and more than a little afraid. It was unbecoming of a second-in-command.

“That’s always a possibility with hobgoblins, even me,” Blacknail laughed as he walked away. Elyias was a funny guy.

Without wasting any more time, the group set off. Blacknail took the lead as they trudged through the forest. The mixed group passed between rows of towering trees and up and down rocky hills as they approached their destination. The familiar journey took them about an hour. Once they were near the village, they stopped among a thick clump of bushes at the edge of the fields.

“Can you sneak past the walls and rejoin us?” Blacknail asked Ferrar.

“Sure, I sneak in there all the time,” Ferrar replied with a confident smile and a excited nod.

This reply caught Blacknail off guard. What was this now? When did Ferrar have the time visit the humans? Why would he want to? After a few seconds of furious thinking Blacknail decided to let it go. This didn’t sound like it was his problem. As the leader, he needed to focus on the important things, like getting his cheese.

Khita and Blacknail left the goblins behind. They crossed the fields and went in through Shelter’s gate. The one old farmer that was serving as the guard let them in without any concern. They were familiar visitors now. The hooded hobgoblin even gave the man a friendly nod. Being polite was important.

The pair wandered through the streets until they got to where Geralhd had taken up residence. It was a small home that looked like it had seen better days, but it was clean and serviceable. Compared to Blacknail’s cave it was a mansion. Khita walked up to the door and called out, but no one answered.

“He doesn’t seem to be home,” she told Blacknail.

“I’m right here. I heard you’d come to visit my humble abode and decided to cut you off,” Geralhd answered from behind them. The both turned to see him walking towards them from down the street.

“Oh, where were you? I hope we aren’t interrupting anything,” Khita asked.

“I was simply out and about. It was nothing important. Now, to what do I owe the pleasure of your visit?” he asked in return. Blacknail was fairly sure it was question. Geralhd sometimes had a problem speaking clearly.

“I bet you were with a woman,” Khita laughed. There was an amused grin on her face.

“In this village? I prefer having relationships with less strings attached,” Geralhd replied with a grimace of distaste.

“Oh, like with Vorscha,” Blacknail observed. Geralhd and Vorscha had done everything together until Werrick’s attack. They had been forced to leave her behind when they fled the battle and she had died horribly. It was too bad. She had been strong and useful.

“Yes…” Geralhd replied with obvious awkwardness. He suddenly looked a little sad.

“That was utterly thoughtless. You don’t say things like that,” Khita quietly hissed at the hobgoblin.

Blacknail sighed and rolled his eyes. He had no idea what she was talking about. It must be a stupid human thing. Every time he thought he had them figured out he was proven wrong.

“Well, let’s not stand out here on the public street and under the sun. Come in and have some tea. It’s dreadful herbal stuff but it’s still better than the local swill,” Geralhd said as he walked over to the entrance of his home.

Blacknail didn’t think Geralhd looked too hurt by his words. Khita was probably being overdramatic. She did that a lot.

